Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB500.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. The State/Executive Branch Budget is as follows:
PART I
OPERATING BUDGET
(1) Funds Appropriations: There is appropriated out of the General Fund, Road Fund, Restricted Funds
accounts, Federal Funds accounts, or Bond Funds accounts for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2026, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, and for the fiscal year beginning
July 1, 2027, and ending June 30, 2028, the following discrete sums, or so much thereof as may be necessary.
Appropriated funds are included pursuant to KRS 48.700 and 48.710. Each appropriation is made by source of
respective fund or funds accounts. Appropriations for the following officers, cabinets, departments, boards,
commissions, institutions, subdivisions, agencies, and budget units of the state government, and any and all other
activities of the government of the Commonwealth, are subject to the provisions of Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48 of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes and compliance with the conditions and procedures set forth in this Act.
(2) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Appropriations identified as General Fund (Tobacco) in Part I, Operating
Budget, of this Act are representative of the amounts provided in Part X, Phase I Tobacco Settlement, of this Act and
are not to be appropriated in duplication.
A. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Units
1. OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 6,688,100 6,607,200
Restricted Funds 287,900 287,800
TOTAL 6,976,000 6,895,000
(1) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided on the base salary of the
Lieutenant Governor shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(4), the increment provided on the base salary of the Governor shall be the same
as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
2. OFFICE OF STATE BUDGET DIRECTOR
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,782,900 3,749,000
Restricted Funds 384,000 384,000
Federal Funds 62,000 -0-
TOTAL 4,228,900 4,133,000
(1) Participation in Transparent Governing - Full Disclosure of Inmate Population Forecasts and
Related Materials: The Office of State Budget Director shall provide the methodology, assumptions, data, and all
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
other related materials used to project biennial offender population forecasts conducted by the Office of State Budget
Director, the Kentucky Department of Corrections, and any consulting firms, to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue by October 1, 2027. This submission shall include but not be limited to the projected
state, county, and community offender populations for the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium and must coincide with the
budgeted amount for these populations. This submission shall clearly divulge the methodology and reasoning behind
the budgeted and projected offender population in a commitment to participate in transparent governing.
3. HOMELAND SECURITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,632,600 5,626,200
Restricted Funds 4,411,800 4,360,100
Federal Funds 9,955,400 9,983,700
TOTAL 19,999,800 19,970,000
(1) Next Generation 9-1-1 (NG9-1-1) Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is a
one-time allocation of $5,000,000 in each fiscal year to complete the statewide deployment of NG9-1-1 services. The
appropriation shall be used to implement a NG9-1-1 system that is compliant with the National Emergency Number
Association’s i3 Standard.
(2) School Safety: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and carry out
the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 165.
4. VETERANS' AFFAIRS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 37,487,300 38,976,800
Restricted Funds 107,228,800 108,377,900
Federal Funds 300,000 300,000
TOTAL 145,016,100 147,654,700
(1) Weekend and Holiday Premium Pay Incentive: The Kentucky Veterans Centers are authorized to
continue the weekend and holiday premium pay incentive for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(2) Congressional Medal of Honor Recipients - Travel and Per Diem: The Commissioner of the
Department of Veterans' Affairs may approve travel and per diem expenses incurred when Kentucky residents who
have been awarded the Congressional Medal of Honor attend veterans, military, or memorial events in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky.
(3) State Veterans Nursing Home: All state veterans' nursing homes must meet a combined 80 percent
bed occupancy rate before any future projects will be considered. Once the 80 percent threshold has been met, it is
the intent of the General Assembly that any future beds allocated from the United States Department of Veterans
Affairs or reallocated from the Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs be dedicated to a state veterans nursing
home in Magoffin County to serve that area.
(4) Brain Injury Association of America, Kentucky Chapter and the Epilepsy Foundation of
Kentuckiana Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $93,700 in each fiscal year for grants to
the Brain Injury Association of America, Kentucky Chapter and $93,700 in each fiscal year for grants to the Epilepsy
Foundation of Kentuckiana to be used solely for the purpose of working with veterans who have experienced brain
trauma and their families.
(5) Veterans' Service Organization Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$187,500 in each fiscal year for grants to Veterans' Service Organization programs.
(6) Kentucky Homeless Veterans Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$300,000 in each fiscal year to provide emergency financial assistance to Kentucky's homeless veterans.
(7) Bowling Green Veterans Center: Included in the above appropriation is $5,616,800 in General Fund
and $10,000,000 in Restricted Funds in each fiscal year to support the staffing and operations of the Bowling Green
Veterans Center.

CHAPTER 168 3
(8) Thomson-Hood Veterans Center Additional Positions: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $5,110,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,488,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for additional positions
at the Thomson-Hood Veterans Center.
(9) Western Kentucky Veterans Center Additional Positions: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $6,397,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $6,778,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for additional positions
at the Western Kentucky Veterans Center.
(10) HBOT for Kentucky Vets: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended funds authorized in 2024
Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, (3) to HBOT for Kentucky Vets shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
5. KENTUCKY INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,830,100 1,768,800
Restricted Funds 8,345,500 10,862,200
Federal Funds 440,051,600 288,578,900
TOTAL 450,227,200 301,209,900
(1) Debt Service: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $2,486,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $4,972,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for new debt service to support new bonds as set forth in Part II,
Capital Projects Budget, of this Act.
(2) Rural Infrastructure Improvement Fund: Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45A or any statute to the
contrary, any contract executed by the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority from the Rural Infrastructure Improvement
Fund prior to June 30, 2026, shall remain in effect for the purpose of paying claims; however, no additional contracts
may be entered into after this date. Notwithstanding 224A.1123(3)(c), unobligated funds as of June 30, 2026, or any
portion of General Fund not expended for this purpose shall lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705).
The Kentucky Infrastructure Authority shall provide a report detailing Rural Infrastructure Improvement Fund
reimbursements to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by October 1, 2026. This report shall
include but not be limited to a list of grant recipients, the amount of each reimbursement, the status of project
completion, and an explanation of any delays or challenges experienced as part of the reimbursement process.
(3) Area Development District Reporting and Compensation: Each area development district shall
submit a comprehensive financial report to the Kentucky Infrastructure Authority by September 1, 2026, detailing all
expenditures made during the preceding fiscal year to satisfy the requirements of any contract or agreement between
the district and the authority. This report shall include details concerning contracted water management planning
services and the maintenance of the Water Resource Information System (WRIS) and other relevant contracted
services.
The Kentucky Infrastructure Authority shall submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations
and Revenue by November 1, 2026. The report shall include information received from the area development districts
as well as financial information detailing funding distributed to the area development districts for WRIS and other
relevant contracted services.
6. MILITARY AFFAIRS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 29,252,300 28,669,500
Restricted Funds 21,449,500 21,566,600
Federal Funds 88,307,100 88,593,500
TOTAL 139,008,900 138,829,600
(1) Kentucky National Guard: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $4,500,000 in each
fiscal year to be expended, subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act, which are required as a
result of the Governor's declaration of emergency pursuant to KRS Chapter 39A, and the Governor's call of the
Kentucky National Guard to active duty when an emergency or exigent situation has been declared to exist by the
Governor. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any portion of the $4,500,000 not expended shall lapse to the Budget
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

4 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) at the end of each fiscal year. In the event that costs for Governor-
declared emergencies or the Governor’s call of the Kentucky National Guard for emergencies or exigent situations
exceed $4,500,000 annually, up to $100,000,000 for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium shall be deemed necessary
government expenses and shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve
Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(2) Disaster or Emergency Aid Funds: Subject to the conditions and procedures in this Act, in the event
of a presidentially declared disaster or emergency, the Department of Military Affairs may request from the Finance
and Administration Cabinet, as a necessary government expense, up to $25,000,000 in each fiscal year from the
General Fund to be used as required to match federal aid for which the state would be eligible. These necessary funds
shall be made available from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705).
All moneys reimbursed to the state by the Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA) for eligible
disaster-related expenditures shall be deposited into the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
The Department of Military Affairs shall provide a comprehensive list of anticipated FEMA reimbursements
to counties eligible for disaster-related expenditures to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
by June 1, 2026.
7. COMMISSION ON HUMAN RIGHTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,999,200 1,985,900
Restricted Funds 10,000 10,000
Federal Funds 445,000 445,000
TOTAL 2,454,200 2,440,900
8. COMMISSION ON WOMEN
(1) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 12.020, 12.023, 14.260, 15A.190, 214.554, and
344.510 to 344.530, no General Fund appropriation is provided for the Commission on Women in order to provide
additional funding for Domestic Violence Shelters, Rape Crisis Centers, and Children's Advocacy Centers.
9. DEPARTMENT FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 10,227,100 12,001,300
Restricted Funds 4,404,700 2,346,300
Federal Funds 242,402,800 242,437,200
TOTAL 257,034,600 256,784,800
(1) Appalachian Regional Commission Matching Funds: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $240,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $232,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Area Development
Districts to match increased Appalachian Regional Commission grants.
(2) Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $1,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority. Restricted
Funds shall be transferred from the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet from taxes collected pursuant to KRS
142.400(2).
(3) Area Development District Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $3,824,700
in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,705,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Joint Funding Administration Program in
support of the area development districts.
(4) Mary Kendall Homes and Gateway Juvenile Diversion: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $247,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $239,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the support of the Mary
Kendall Homes and $247,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $239,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the support of
Gateway Juvenile Diversion.

CHAPTER 168 5
(5) Local Government Operations: Notwithstanding KRS 65A.020(5)(a), included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the operations of the Department for
Local Government.
(6) Delta Regional Authority Matching Funds: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$240,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $232,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for area development districts to match
increased Delta Regional Authority grants.
10. LOCAL GOVERNMENT ECONOMIC ASSISTANCE FUND
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 27,926,700 25,211,600
(1) Allocation of the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund: Notwithstanding KRS
42.470(1)(a), 70 percent of moneys in the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund shall be distributed to each
coal producing county on the basis of the ratio of coal severed in each respective county to the coal severed
statewide. Notwithstanding KRS 42.470(1)(c), no allocation shall be distributed to non-coal producing counties.
(2) Coal Haul Road System: Notwithstanding KRS 42.455(2), no funds appropriated to the Local
Government Economic Assistance Fund are required to be spent on the coal haul road system.
(3) Jefferson County Mineral Severance: Notwithstanding KRS 42.450 to 42.495, all funds distributed to
Jefferson County in accordance with KRS 42.470(2)(a) shall be used by the Jefferson County Fiscal Court for Thrive
By Five Louisville.
11. LOCAL GOVERNMENT ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT FUND
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 20,494,800 15,059,100
(1) Coal Severance Tax Transfers: Notwithstanding KRS 42.450 to 42.495, 70 percent of the severance
and processing taxes on coal collected annually, except items described in subsection (2) below, shall be transferred
to the Local Government Economic Development Fund. Notwithstanding KRS 42.450 to 42.495, 30 percent of the
severance and processing taxes on coal collected annually, except items described in subsection (2) below, shall be
transferred to the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund. Transfers to the Local Government Economic
Development Fund and the Local Government Economic Assistance Fund shall be made quarterly in July, October,
January, and April based upon actual revenues from the prior quarter.
(2) Coal Severance Tax Collections Calculations and Transfers: The above appropriations from the
General Fund are based on the official estimate presented by the Office of State Budget Director. Notwithstanding
KRS 42.450 to 42.495, coal severance tax collections during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium shall first be allocated to
the following programs or purposes on a quarterly basis:
(a) Department for Local Government: An annual appropriation of $669,700 in each fiscal year is
appropriated as General Fund moneys to the Department for Local Government budget unit for Local Government
Economic Development Fund and Local Government Economic Assistance Fund project administration costs;
(b) Debt Service: An annual appropriation of 100 percent of the debt service necessary to support bonds
authorized in 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 156, 2005 Ky. Acts ch. 173, 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 252, 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 127, and 2010
(1st Extra. Sess.) Ky. Acts ch. 1, in the amount of $17,747,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $16,786,700 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 is appropriated for that purpose;
(c) Osteopathic Medicine Scholarship Program: Notwithstanding KRS 164.7891(11)(b), no transfers shall
be made to the Osteopathic Medicine Scholarship Program within the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance
Authority;
(d) Pharmacy Scholarships: Notwithstanding KRS 164.7890(11)(c), no transfers shall be made to the Coal
County Pharmacy Scholarship Program within the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority; and
(e) Kentucky Coal Fields Endowment Authority: Notwithstanding KRS 42.453(3), no transfers shall be
made to the Kentucky Coal Field Endowment Authority.
(3) Allocation of the Local Government Economic Development Fund: Notwithstanding KRS
42.4592(1), 50 percent of Local Government Economic Development Fund moneys shall be allocated in accordance
with KRS 42.4592(1)(a), and 50 percent shall be allocated in accordance with KRS 42.4592(1)(b).
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

6 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) Use of the Local Government Economic Development Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 42.450 to
42.495, all funds appropriated to Local Government Economic Development Fund Single-County Accounts shall be
allocated to projects with the concurrence of the respective county judge/executive, state senator(s), and state
representative(s) of each county. If concurrence is not achieved, the fiscal court of each county may apply for grants
through the Department for Local Government pursuant to KRS 42.4588.
12. AREA DEVELOPMENT FUND
(1) Area Development Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 42.345 to 42.370 and 48.185, or any statute to the
contrary, no funding is provided for the Area Development Fund.
(2) Area Development District Flexibility: Notwithstanding KRS 42.350(2) and provided that sufficient
funds are maintained in the Joint Funding Agreement program to meet the match requirements for the Economic
Development Administration grants, Community Development Block Grants, Appalachian Regional Commission
grants, or any federal program where the Joint Funding Agreement funds are utilized to meet nonfederal match
requirements, an area development district with authorization from its Board of Directors may request approval to
transfer funding between the Area Development Fund and the Joint Funding Agreement Program from the
Commissioner of the Department for Local Government.
13. REGIONAL DEVELOPMENT AGENCY ASSISTANCE FUND
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 6,000,000 6,000,000
14. EXECUTIVE BRANCH ETHICS COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 667,200 661,500
Restricted Funds 799,100 795,300
TOTAL 1,466,300 1,456,800
(1) Use of Restricted Funds: All penalties collected or received by the Executive Branch Ethics
Commission shall be deposited in the State Treasury and credited to a trust and agency fund account to the credit of
the Commission to be used by the Commission for the cost of conducting administrative hearings pursuant to KRS
Chapter 13B. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, these funds shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
15. SECRETARY OF STATE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 6,669,600 6,758,200
(1) Use of Restricted Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 14.140(1) and (3), the above Restricted Funds may be
used for the continuation of current activities within the Office of the Secretary of State.
(2) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided on the base salary of the
Secretary of State shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
16. BOARD OF ELECTIONS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 7,710,600 7,543,100
Restricted Funds 111,800 106,700
Federal Funds 1,829,800 1,829,800
TOTAL 9,652,200 9,479,600
(1) Cost of Elections: Up to $100,000 of costs associated with special elections, KRS 117.345(2) costs
associated with additional precincts with a voting machine, KRS 117.343 costs for additional registered voters, and
KRS 116.145 costs for additional new registered voters shall be deemed a necessary government expense and shall be
paid from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705). Any reimbursements authorized as a necessary government expense according to the above provisions shall
be at the same rates as those established by the State Board of Elections.

CHAPTER 168 7
17. REGISTRY OF ELECTION FINANCE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,811,300 1,845,600
18. ATTORNEY GENERAL
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 150,000 150,000
General Fund 47,464,000 44,874,100
Restricted Funds 82,805,700 82,464,900
Federal Funds 66,540,000 63,655,400
TOTAL 196,959,700 191,144,400
(1) State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), included in the above General
Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $150,000 in each fiscal year for the state’s diligent enforcement of noncompliant
nonparticipating manufacturers.
(2) Expert Witnesses: In addition to such funds as may be appropriated, the Office of the Attorney
General and the Unified Prosecutorial System, on behalf of the Commonwealth's Attorneys, may request from the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, as a necessary government expense, such funds as may be necessary for expert
witnesses. Upon justification of the request, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide up to $3,000,000
for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium for this purpose to the Office of the Attorney General and the Unified
Prosecutorial System from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund
Account (KRS 48.705). Without charge, the Department of Insurance shall provide the Office of the Attorney
General any available information to assist in the preparation of a rate hearing pursuant to KRS 304.17A-095.
Expenditures under this subsection shall be reported to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
by August 1 of each year.
(3) Annual and Sick Leave Service Credit: Notwithstanding any statutory or regulatory restrictions to the
contrary, any former employee of the Unified Prosecutorial System who has been appointed to a permanent full-time
position under KRS Chapter 18A shall be credited annual and sick leave based on service credited under the
Kentucky Retirement Systems solely for the purpose of computation of sick and annual leave. This provision shall
only apply to any new appointment or current employee as of July 1, 1998.
(4) Operations of the Office of the Attorney General: Notwithstanding KRS 367.478(2), 367.805(3), and
367.905(5), funds may be expended in support of the operations of the Office of the Attorney General.
(5) Legal Services Contracts: The Office of the Attorney General may present proposals to state agencies
specifying legal work that is presently accomplished through personal service contracts that indicate the Office of the
Attorney General's capacity to perform the work at a lesser cost. State agencies may agree to make arrangements with
the Office of the Attorney General to perform the legal work and compensate the Office of the Attorney General for
the legal services.
(6) Civil Action Representation: To ensure adequate representation of the interest of the Commonwealth
and to protect the financial condition of the Kentucky Retirement Systems, it has been determined that it is necessary
to allow the Attorney General appropriate authority to engage private lawyers as co-counsel in Franklin Circuit Court
Civil Action Nos. 17-CI-01348 and 20-CI-00590. Due to the highly complex and specialized nature of that litigation,
KRS Chapter 45A, et seq. would prevent the Attorney General from engaging counsel of his choice. Accordingly, to
protect the interest of the Commonwealth, and notwithstanding the requirements of KRS Chapter 45A, et seq., which
are hereby waived in with respect to the Attorney General retaining private lawyers to prosecute Civil Action Nos.
17-CI-01348 and 20-CI-00590, and any other civil action regarding the same subject matter or seeking the same relief
as Civil Action Nos. 17-CI-0138 and 20-CI-00590, the Attorney General is vested with the authority to hire and pay
counsel of his choice on any contractual basis the Attorney General deems advisable.
(7) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided on the base salary of the
Attorney General shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
(8) Office of Medicaid Fraud and Abuse Control: Included in the above appropriations is $1,278,700 in
General Fund and $801,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,193,700 in General Fund and $546,000
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

8 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Office of Medicaid Fraud and Abuse Control. The Office of
the Attorney General shall submit an annual report beginning December 1, 2026, to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue. The report shall include the number of reported fraud incidents, the types of fraud
reported, the number of reported fraud incidents investigated by the office, the monetary amount involved in the
fraudulent activity, and the resolution of the reported fraud incidents.
(9) Administrative Hearings: Included in the above appropriations is $3,241,200 in Restricted Funds and
$1,939,700 in Federal Funds in each fiscal year to support the cost of Administrative Hearings held by the Office of
the Attorney General for the Cabinet for Health and Family Services. The Attorney General shall bill the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services on a quarterly basis for the cost, not to exceed $5,180,900 each fiscal year.
(10) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
(11) Body Armor Grant Program: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $10,000,000 in
each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 biennium for grants to law enforcement and first responders for the purchase of
body armor, duty weapons, ammunition, electronic-control devices, and body-worn cameras. Notwithstanding KRS
15.430 and 15.470, excess Restricted Funds from the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to
the Attorney General for this purpose.
(12) Child Support Services: Included in the above appropriation is $5,380,000 in General Fund and
$10,443,500 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,880,000 in General Fund and $7,531,800 in Federal
Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support child support services.
(13) Create Digital Forensics Lab: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $905,100 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $587,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to create a new computer forensics laboratory in Western
Kentucky.
(14) Upgrade Communications Equipment: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$569,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to upgrade communications equipment. Notwithstanding KRS 15.430 and 15.470,
excess Restricted Funds from the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to the Attorney
General for this purpose.
(15) Data Privacy Protections: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and
carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 72.
(16) Opioid Abatement Trust Fund Report: The General Assembly recognizes the need for clear and
coordinated planning to deliver effective and outcome driven substance use disorder (SUD) treatment and recovery
services and the opportunities to achieve that goal through a strategic leveraging of Kentucky’s opioid abatement
settlement funds. Beginning November 1, 2026, the Office of the Attorney General shall provide a quarterly report to
the Legislative Research Commission on the SUD activities undertaken with the opioid abatement settlement funds
as authorized pursuant to KRS 15.291 to 15.295. The report shall include:
(a) Grants made by the Kentucky Opioid Abatement Advisory Commission (commission) established in
KRS 15.291 to subrecipients;
(b) Attestations made to the commission by any county, consolidated local government, urban-county
government, or city in receipt of opioid abatement settlement funds as required under KRS 15.293(4)(c)2.a.; and
(c) Current and future anticipated settlements realized as a result of ongoing opioid litigation.
19. UNIFIED PROSECUTORIAL SYSTEM
(1) Prosecutors Advisory Council Administrative Functions: The Prosecutors Advisory Council shall
approve compensation for employees of the Unified Prosecutorial System subject to the appropriations in this Act.
a. Commonwealth's Attorneys
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 83,479,100 84,313,500
Restricted Funds 6,488,000 6,124,900
Federal Funds 359,200 359,200
TOTAL 90,326,300 90,797,600

CHAPTER 168 9
(1) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 15.755, no increment shall be provided on the base salary of
the Commonwealth's Attorneys and staff.
(2) Rocket Docket Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,416,700 in each
fiscal year to support the Rocket Docket Program.
(3) Salary Compensation Standardization: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$1,758,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,250,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Salary Compensation
Standardization for Commonwealth’s Attorneys.
(4) Cloud Storage Cost: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $794,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $409,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for additional cloud storage costs for Commonwealth's Attorneys.
b. County Attorneys
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 86,248,300 87,108,900
Restricted Funds 901,200 905,800
Federal Funds 115,100 115,100
TOTAL 87,264,600 88,129,800
(1) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 15.765, no increment shall be provided on the base salary of
the County Attorneys and staff.
(2) County Attorney Retirement Costs: Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991, included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $1,590,600 in each fiscal year to support each County Attorney's Office's share of the
anticipated increase over each County Attorney’s Office’s fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline contribution as adjusted
and posted under the 2026 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission's website.
(3) Rocket Docket Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $549,800 in each fiscal
year to support the Rocket Docket Program.
(4) Salary Compensation Standardization: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$2,455,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,864,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Salary Compensation
Standardization for County Attorneys.
TOTAL - UNIFIED PROSECUTORIAL SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 169,727,400 171,422,400
Restricted Funds 7,389,200 7,030,700
Federal Funds 474,300 474,300
TOTAL 177,590,900 178,927,400
20. TREASURY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,986,300 3,958,200
Restricted Funds 2,086,600 2,058,600
Federal Funds 1,206,700 1,206,700
TOTAL 7,279,600 7,223,500
(1) Unclaimed Property Fund: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $2,086,600 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,058,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from the Unclaimed Property Fund to provide funding
for services performed by the Unclaimed Property Division of the Department of the Treasury.
(2) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided on the base salary of the
State Treasurer shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

10 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(3) Operations of the Department of the Treasury: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$300,000 in each fiscal year to support operations.
21. AGRICULTURE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 35,426,900 32,739,700
General Fund 20,949,800 22,945,700
Restricted Funds 14,505,100 12,323,200
Federal Funds 12,173,200 12,173,200
TOTAL 83,055,000 80,181,800
(1) Use of Restricted Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 217.570, 217B.580, and 438.335, included in the
above Restricted Funds appropriation is $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support the operations of the
Department of Agriculture.
(2) Farms to Food Banks: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $886,500 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $819,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Farms to Food Banks Program. The use
of the moneys provided by this appropriation shall be restricted to purchases of Kentucky-grown produce and protein
from Kentucky farmers who participate in the Farms to Food Banks Program.
(3) Kentucky Grape and Wine Council: Notwithstanding KRS 260.175(2), no General Fund is provided
for the Kentucky Small Farm Wineries Support Fund for use by the Kentucky Grape and Wine Council.
(4) Counties Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $11,777,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $10,884,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the counties
account as specified in KRS 248.703(1)(a).
(5) State Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $21,876,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $20,216,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the state account
as specified in KRS 248.703(1)(b).
(6) Tobacco Settlement Funds - Allocations: Notwithstanding KRS 248.711(2), and from the allocation
provided therein, counties that are allocated in excess of $20,000 annually may provide up to four percent of the
individual county allocation, not to exceed $15,000 annually, to the county council in that county for administrative
costs.
(7) Kentucky Rural Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety Program: Included in the
above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $886,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $819,300 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to support the Kentucky Rural Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety Program known as the
Raising Hope Initiative. The Department of Agriculture shall enhance awareness of the National Suicide Prevention
Lifeline (988) in rural communities in Kentucky, improve access to information on rural mental health issues and
available treatment services, provide outreach, and provide other necessary services to improve the mental health
outcomes of rural communities in Kentucky. The Farm Safety and Rural Health Division, at its discretion, may
receive, accept, and solicit grants, contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value from any
governmental agency, individual, nonprofit organization, or private business to be used for the Kentucky Rural
Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety Program. The Department of Agriculture may utilize up to
$150,000 of the appropriation amount in each fiscal year for program administration purposes. The Department of
Agriculture shall coordinate with the Raising Hope Initiative to take custody of and maintain any intellectual property
assets that were created or developed by any state agency in connection with the Raising Hope Initiative.
The Department of Agriculture’s Office of Agricultural Marketing shall submit a comprehensive annual report
to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund
Oversight Committee no later than November 1 of each fiscal year. At a minimum, the report shall include:
(a) An accounting of all expenditures by fund source;
(b) A detailed accounting of all administrative expenses;
(c) The total amount expended on grants, loans, and benefits;
(d) A detailed accounting of all expenses not otherwise classified;
(e) Identification of any unexpended funds and the reason why the funds were not expended; and

CHAPTER 168 11
(f) An explanation of how all expenditures align with program objectives.
The Division Director of the Farm Safety and Rural Health Division and the Executive Director of the
Kentucky Office of Agricultural Marketing shall provide a program update to the Tobacco Settlement Agreement
Fund Oversight Committee in November of each fiscal year.
(8) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
(9) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided on the base salary of the
Commissioner of Agriculture shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
(10) Agricultural Economic Development: In accordance with KRS Chapter 154, the Secretary of the
Cabinet for Economic Development shall coordinate with and seek guidance from the Commissioner of the
Department of Agriculture in considering any projects for economic incentives related to agricultural economic
development, agribusiness, or production facilities of sustainable aviation fuel.
(11) County Fair Grants: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $720,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $697,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support capital improvement grants to the Local Agricultural
Fair Aid Program.
22. AUDITOR OF PUBLIC ACCOUNTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 11,074,100 10,874,200
Restricted Funds 29,365,500 29,563,700
TOTAL 40,439,600 40,437,900
(1) Audit Services Contracts: Notwithstanding KRS 45.149, no state agency shall enter into any contract
with a nongovernmental entity for audit services unless the Auditor of Public Accounts has declined in writing to
perform the audit or has failed to respond within 30 days of receipt of a written request for such services. The
agency’s request for audit services shall include a comprehensive statement of the scope and nature of the proposed
audit.
(2) Financial Audit Receipts: The Auditor of Public Accounts shall provide a listing of fee receipts for all
audits and special examinations, itemized by type, agency, or unit of government, as well as billing methodology to
the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by August 1 of each fiscal year.
(3) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 64.480(2), the increment provided on the base salary of the
Auditor of Public Accounts shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees in Part IV of this Act.
(4) Ombudsman: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $18,292,400 in each fiscal year
to support the operation of the Commonwealth Office of the Ombudsman within the Auditor of Public Accounts. The
Auditor of Public Accounts may bill the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for this amount on a prorated
monthly basis.
(5) Jefferson County Public Schools Audit: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any portion of the General
Fund appropriation balance from 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part I, A., 22., (9) shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(6) Kentucky Communications Network Authority and Kentucky Wired Audit: Notwithstanding KRS
45.229, the General Fund appropriation balance from 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 117 sec. 41 shall not lapse and shall carry
forward.
(7) Artificial Intelligence Initiative: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $639,500 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $439,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 as a one-time allocation to support the purchase of new
artificial intelligence auditing software.
(8) Audit Billings: Within a reasonable time after the Auditor of Public Accounts has completed and
distributed a report of a state entity audit, examination, investigation, or any other action resulting in a report relating
to a state entity, the Auditor of Public Accounts shall bill the audited, examined, investigated, or acted upon state
entity for the Auditor's expenses incurred related to that audit, examination, investigation, or other action, and a copy
of the bill shall be forwarded to the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. If the state entity, within 60
days following receipt of said bill, determines the charge to be excessive or otherwise improper, it shall submit its
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

12 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
objection to the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and to the State Treasurer for resolution of the
controversy in accordance with this subsection. If the amount billed has not been paid within 60 days from the date of
billing, and no objection has been filed, the Auditor shall notify the Secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet who shall cause said amount to be paid. When an objection to the bill has been filed with the Secretary of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet and the State Treasurer, the amount found to be equitable and just shall become
payable immediately upon the entry of the final decision. Any controversy over the amount of the bill for the actual
expenses incurred shall be submitted by the state entity to the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet
and the State Treasurer for a decision as to the proper amount. In the event these two arbitrators fail to agree, then the
controversy shall be submitted to the Attorney General, whose decision shall be final.
(9) School Board Audits: The Auditor of Public Accounts shall perform both random and targeted audits
of school district finances to ensure compliance with Department of Education established policies, procedures, and
Kentucky Revised Statutes. Notwithstanding KRS 156.265(4), the actual expense of any audit shall be borne by the
district board of education.
23. PERSONNEL BOARD
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 11,400 10,200
Restricted Funds 25,000 1,394,700 1,149,400
TOTAL 25,000 1,406,100 1,159,600
(1) Hearing Officer Hourly Rate: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $80,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $50,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to increase the hearing officer hourly rate from $125 to
$200 per hour.
(2) Equipment Upgrade: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $60,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 to upgrade the video and audio equipment in the hearing rooms.
(3) Case Management Software: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $25,000 in fiscal
year 2025-2026, $100,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and $50,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to purchase a new case
management system for the Board’s operations.
(4) Soundproofing: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $120,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 to purchase soundproofing for the boardroom and two hearing rooms.
24. KENTUCKY PUBLIC PENSIONS AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 128,315,500 51,426,200
(1) Kentucky Employees Retirement System Nonhazardous Pension Fund: Pursuant to KRS 42.205,
included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $78,504,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027, to be applied to the
unfunded pension liability of the Kentucky Employees Retirement System Nonhazardous pension fund.
(2) Pension Administration System Modernization: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $750,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the
modernization of the pension administration system.
25. OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS
a. Accountancy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 738,700 749,900
b. Certification of Alcohol and Drug Counselors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 405,400 405,400
c. Applied Behavior Analysis Licensing
2026-27 2027-28

CHAPTER 168 13
Restricted Funds 70,800 70,800
d. Architects
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 485,500 493,200
e. Certification for Professional Art Therapists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 11,200 11,200
f. Barbering
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 510,900 519,200
g. Chiropractic Examiners
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 301,900 301,900
h. Dentistry
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 1,000,000 1,012,900
i. Licensed Diabetes Educators
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 29,300 29,300
j. Licensure and Certification for Dietitians and Nutritionists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 94,100 94,100
k. Embalmers and Funeral Directors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 642,300 652,000
l. Licensure for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 2,239,500 2,270,500
m. Certification of Fee-Based Pastoral Counselors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 3,600 3,600
n. Registration for Professional Geologists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 109,000 109,000
o. Hairdressers and Cosmetologists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 3,605,900 2,657,900
p. Specialists in Hearing Instruments
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

14 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 77,900 77,900
q. Interpreters for the Deaf and Hard of Hearing
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 51,800 51,800
r. Examiners and Registration of Landscape Architects
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 92,800 95,300
s. Licensure of Marriage and Family Therapists
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 141,300 141,300
t. Licensure for Massage Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 150,700 150,700
u. Medical Imaging and Radiation Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 512,500 521,000
v. Medical Licensure
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 4,697,000 4,751,300
w. Nursing
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 10,879,800 11,069,400
x. Licensure for Nursing Home Administrators
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 101,100 101,100
y. Licensure for Occupational Therapy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 241,600 241,600
z. Ophthalmic Dispensers
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 71,200 71,200
aa. Optometric Examiners
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 312,700 316,500
ab. Pharmacy
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 3,255,300 3,308,600
ac. Physical Therapy

CHAPTER 168 15
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 753,500 766,100
ad. Podiatry
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 58,100 58,100
ae. Private Investigators
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 113,700 113,700
af. Licensed Professional Counselors
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 460,800 460,800
ag. Prosthetics, Orthotics, and Pedorthics
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 46,300 46,300
ah. Emergency Medical Services
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,652,800 2,684,600
Restricted Funds 3,055,100 3,057,800
Federal Funds 345,200 348,500
TOTAL 6,053,100 6,090,900
ai. Examiners of Psychology
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 431,000 431,000
aj. Respiratory Care
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 345,400 350,800
ak. Social Work
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 653,500 663,700
al. Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 225,500 225,500
am. Veterinary Examiners
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 62,000 816,900 813,600
TOTAL - OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 2,652,800 2,684,600
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

16 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Restricted Funds 62,000 37,793,600 37,266,000
Federal Funds -0- 345,200 348,500
TOTAL 62,000 40,791,600 40,299,100
26. KENTUCKY RIVER AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 394,300 389,900
Restricted Funds 6,076,400 5,951,500
Federal Funds 4,300 -0-
TOTAL 6,475,000 6,341,400
27. SCHOOL FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 104,962,400 107,195,800
(1) Debt Service: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $983,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027
and $1,966,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for new debt service to support new bonds as set forth in Part II, Capital
Projects Budget, of this Act.
(2) Additional Offers of Assistance: Notwithstanding KRS 157.611 to 157.665, the School Facilities
Construction Commission is authorized to make an additional $40,000,000 in offers of assistance during the 2026-
2028 fiscal biennium in anticipation of debt service availability during the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium. No bonded
indebtedness based on the above amount is to be incurred during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(3) Use of Restricted Funds for Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS 157.618, Restricted Funds in the
amount of $8,453,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 are hereby transferred to the Debt Service Fund to pay debt service on
previously issued bonds.
(4) Offers of Assistance Eligibility Requirements: Notwithstanding KRS 157.611 to 157.635 and 750
KAR 1:010, the School Facilities Construction Commission shall not make an offer of assistance to any local school
district during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium until the information required under Part I., C., 2., (9) of this Act has
been received. A local school district shall not be eligible for an offer of assistance during the 2026-2028 fiscal
biennium unless the district’s facilities have been evaluated in the Kentucky Facilities Inventory and Classification
System (KFICS).
28. TEACHERS' RETIREMENT SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,225,339,000 1,277,624,600
Restricted Funds 21,915,700 23,008,100
TOTAL 1,247,254,700 1,300,632,700
(1) Dependent Subsidy for All Retirees under age 65: Pursuant to KRS 161.675(4), health insurance
supplement payments made by the retirement system shall not exceed the amount of the single coverage insurance
premium.
(2) Retiree Health Insurance: Pursuant to KRS 161.550(2)(b) and notwithstanding any statute to the
contrary, included in the above General Fund appropriation is $96,606,400 and excess state funding for retiree health
insurance in the amount of $3,993,600 from fiscal years 2022-2023, 2023-2024, and 2024-2025 totaling
$100,600,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $112,400,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the state's contribution
for the cost of retiree health insurance for members not eligible for Medicare who have retired on or after July 1,
2010. Notwithstanding KRS 161.675, the Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees shall provide health
insurance supplement payments towards the cost of the single coverage insurance premium based on age and years of
service credit of eligible recipients of a retirement allowance, the cost of which shall be paid from the Medical
Insurance Fund. Notwithstanding KRS 161.675, the Teachers' Retirement System Board of Trustees shall authorize
eligible recipients of a retirement allowance from the Teachers' Retirement System who are less than age 65 to be
included in the state-sponsored health insurance plan that is provided to active teachers and state employees under
KRS 18A.225. Notwithstanding KRS 161.675(4)(a), the contribution paid by retirees who are less than age 65 who

CHAPTER 168 17
qualify for the maximum health insurance supplement payment for single coverage shall be no more than the sum of
(a) the employee contribution paid by active teachers and state employees for a similar plan, and (b) the standard
Medicare Part B premium as determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Notwithstanding KRS
161.675(4)(a), the contribution paid by retirees who are less than age 65 who do not qualify for the maximum health
insurance supplement payment for single coverage shall be determined by the same graduated formula used by the
Teachers' Retirement System for Plan Year 2026.
(3) Medical Insurance Fund Employee Contributions: Notwithstanding KRS 161.540(1), the employee
contribution to the Medical Insurance Fund shall not be changed in each fiscal year.
(4) Sick Leave Liability Reporting: The Teachers' Retirement System shall provide a report on the full
actuarial cost of member sick leave, including the total actuarial liabilities of the sick leave and the total actuarial
costs to annually finance the sick leave as a percentage of payroll and in total dollars by fund source, to the Public
Pension Oversight Board no later than December 1, 2027.
(5) Actuarially Determined Employer Contribution: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $1,076,889,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,160,459,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide the full
actuarially determined employer contribution. The Teachers' Retirement System shall provide a report on the
actuarially determined employer contribution to the Public Pension Oversight Board no later than December 1, 2027.
(6) Update and Maintain Pathway System: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$900,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,700,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to update and maintain the Pathway
system.
(7) SEEK Employer Contribution Shortfall: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$47,220,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 for the deficit between estimated SEEK employer match and the actual SEEK
employer match required during the 2024-2026 fiscal biennium.
(8) Legacy Benefits Costs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $191,800 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $334,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide funds for actuarially determined increases in legacy
benefit enhancements.
29. APPROPRIATIONS NOT OTHERWISE CLASSIFIED
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 16,750,300 16,750,300
(1) Repayment of Awards or Judgments: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $245,200
in each fiscal year for the repayment of awards or judgments made by the Office of Claims and Appeals against
departments, boards, commissions, and other agencies funded with appropriations out of the General Fund. However,
awards under $5,000 shall be paid from funds available for the operations of the agency.
(2) Guardian Ad Litem Fees: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $12,348,300 in each
fiscal year for fees to be paid to each guardian ad litem appointed by the court pursuant to KRS 26A.140(1)(a),
199.502(3)(b), 202B.210, 311.732(3)(c), 403.100, 403.727(2), 456.035(2), 620.100, 625.0405, 625.041, and 625.080.
The fee shall be fixed by the court and shall not exceed $500.
(3) Reissuance of Uncashed Checks: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $2,461,800 in
each fiscal year to reissue checks written by the State Treasurer and not cashed within the statutory period pursuant to
KRS 41.370.
(4) Police Officer, Firefighter, and Active Duty National Guard and Reserve Survivor Benefits:
Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $690,900 in each fiscal year for payment of benefits for
survivors of state and local police officers, firefighters, and active duty National Guard and Reserve members
pursuant to KRS 61.315 and for the cost of insurance premiums for firefighters pursuant to KRS 95A.070.
(5) Attorney General Expense: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $370,700 in each
fiscal year for expenses associated with representation of the Commonwealth and payments for expert witnesses
pursuant to KRS 12.215.
(6) Prior Year Claims: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $253,000 in each fiscal year
to allow the Finance and Administration Cabinet to pay any valid expense incurred during the two preceding fiscal
years pursuant to KRS 45.231.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

18 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) Involuntary Commitments: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $63,400 in each
fiscal year to provide funding for legal representation for persons requiring involuntary hospitalization pursuant to
KRS 202B.210.
(8) Frankfort In Lieu of Taxes: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $200,000 in each
fiscal year for payment to the City of Frankfort in lieu of property taxes normally owed annually pursuant to KRS
45.021.
(9) Medical Malpractice Liability Insurance Reimbursement: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $77,900 in each fiscal year to reimburse clinics and small, regional health care providers for medical
malpractice insurance premiums pursuant to KRS 304.40-075.
(10) Blanket Employee Bonds: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $39,100 in each fiscal
year to cover damages the Commonwealth might incur as the result of a criminal action by an employee when
securing bonds.
(11) Funding Sources for Appropriations Not Otherwise Classified: Funds required to pay the costs of
items included within Appropriations Not Otherwise Classified are appropriated. Any required expenditure over the
above amounts up to $8,249,700 in each fiscal year shall be paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS
48.700), if available, or from any available balance in either the Judgments budget unit or the Budget Reserve Trust
Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
The above appropriation is for the payment of Attorney General Expense, Office of Claims and Appeals
awards, Guardian Ad Litem, Prior Year Claims, Unredeemed Checks Refunded, Involuntary Commitments -
ICF/MR, Frankfort in Lieu of Taxes, Frankfort Cemetery, Police Officer, Firefighter, and National Guard and
Reserve Survivor Benefits, Medical Malpractice Liability Insurance Reimbursement, and Blanket Employee Bonds.
30. JUDGMENTS
(1) Payment of Judgments and Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance:
Notwithstanding KRS 45A.275, the payment of judgments that exceed the above appropriation, as may be rendered
against the Commonwealth by courts and orders of the State Personnel Board, where applicable, shall be subject to
KRS Chapter 45 and shall not be deemed a necessary governmental expense. Notwithstanding KRS 45A.270(1),
funds required to pay any award or judgment against any department or agency of the state in excess of the above
appropriation, shall be paid out of the funds created or collected for the maintenance and operation of such
department or agency and otherwise paid pursuant to KRS 45A.270(2). Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General
Fund appropriation in fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
31. KENTUCKY COMMUNICATIONS NETWORK AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 40,886,900 40,931,900
Restricted Funds 10,254,100 10,254,100
TOTAL 51,141,000 51,186,000
(1) Availability Payments: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $39,200,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $40,179,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for availability payments.
(2) Capital Project Reporting: On a quarterly basis, the Kentucky Communications Network Authority
shall submit a report detailing the following for each capital project authorized:
(a) Project scope, including a definition of what project components are critical; costs related to each
project component; information regarding which network location node, core equipment site, or end-user location is
impacted; project milestones; and any changes or modifications from previous reports;
(b) Financial status, including how much has been spent of the authorization, cost overruns and/or savings,
and impact on the Authority’s operating budget;
(c) Project timeline detailing progress towards project milestones and project completion status; and
(d) Procurement and contracts, including status of procurement activities detailing contracts awarded and
pending, and any changes to contract terms or conditions.
The Authority shall present this quarterly report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
TOTAL - GENERAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 168 19
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 35,576,900 32,889,700
General Fund -0- 1,799,708,900 1,849,367,500
Restricted Funds 87,000 502,004,800 424,351,500
Federal Funds -0- 864,097,400 710,026,200
TOTAL 87,000 3,201,388,000 3,016,634,900
B. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CABINET
Budget Unit
1. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 26,731,900 27,490,900
Restricted Funds 5,637,200 4,286,300
Federal Funds 436,000 401,000
TOTAL 32,805,100 32,178,200
(1) Funding for Commercialization and Innovation: Notwithstanding KRS 154.12-278, interest income
earned on the balances in the High-Tech Construction/Investment Pool and loan repayments received by the High-
Tech Construction/Investment Pool shall be used to support the Office of Entrepreneurship and are appropriated in
addition to amounts appropriated above.
(2) Lapse and Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance for Bluegrass State Skills
Corporation: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation balance for Bluegrass State Skills
Corporation training grants for fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry
forward. The amount available to the Corporation for disbursement in each fiscal year shall be limited to the
unexpended training grant allotment balance at the end of each fiscal year combined with the additional training grant
allotment amounts in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, less any disbursements. If the required
disbursements exceed the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation training grants allotment balance, notwithstanding KRS
154.12-278, Restricted Funds may be expended for training grants.
(3) Science and Technology Program: Notwithstanding KRS 164.6011 to 164.6035 and any other statute
to the contrary, the Cabinet for Economic Development shall have the authority to carry out the provisions of KRS
164.6013 to 164.6035.
(4) Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General
Fund appropriation in fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Cabinet for Economic Development,
Science and Technology Program, shall not lapse and shall carry forward in the Cabinet for Economic Development.
(5) Executive Officers' Compensation: Notwithstanding KRS 154.10-050(2), any additional executive
officers as described in KRS 154.10-050(2) shall not be paid a salary greater than the salary of the Governor of the
Commonwealth.
(6) Training Grants: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $2,400,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $2,325,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Bluegrass State Skills Corporation to make training grants to
support manufacturing-related investments. The Corporation shall utilize these funds for a manufacturer designated
by the United States Department of Commerce, United States Census Bureau North American Industry Classification
System code of 336111, 336112, 336120, or 336211 that employs at least 10,000 full-time persons at the same
facility or at multiple facilities located within the same county to help offset associated costs of retraining its
workforce. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation balance for Bluegrass State Skills
Corporation training grants for fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry
forward.
(7) Kentucky Product Development Initiative: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the balance of the General
Fund appropriation authorized in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part I, B., 1., (12) shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

20 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(8) KEDFA Forgivable Loan-Carry Forward of Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229,
the balance of the General Fund appropriation authorized in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part I, B., 1., (11) shall not lapse
and shall carry forward.
(9) Agricultural Economic Development: In accordance with KRS Chapter 154, the Secretary of the
Cabinet for Economic Development shall coordinate with and seek guidance from the Commissioner of the
Department of Agriculture in considering any projects for economic incentives related to agricultural economic
development, agribusiness, or production facilities of sustainable aviation fuel.
(10) State Trade and Export Promotion: Included in the above Federal Funds appropriation is $135,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to expand the federal State Trade and Export Promotion
(STEP) program.
(11) Certified Child Care Community Designation Program: Included in the above appropriations is
sufficient funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 88.
(12) Financial Assistance Program for Nuclear Energy-Related Projects: Included in the above
appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 169.
(13) Pilot Tax Increment Financing Program: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding
to implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 98.
(14) Kentucky Film Office: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $500,000 in each fiscal
year to support staff and operational costs for the Kentucky Film Office. Notwithstanding KRS 142.406, for fiscal
year 2027-2028, 2.5% of the transient room tax collected pursuant to KRS 142.400 up to a maximum amount of
$500,000 shall be transferred to the Kentucky Film Office.
C. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Budget Units
1. SUPPORT EDUCATION EXCELLENCE IN KENTUCKY (SEEK) PROGRAM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,533,921,800 3,565,170,200
(1) Common School Fund Earnings: Accumulated earnings for the Common School Fund shall be
transferred in each fiscal year to the SEEK Program.
(2) Allocation of SEEK Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 157.360(2)(c), the above General Fund
appropriation to the base SEEK Program is intended to provide a base guarantee of $4,626 per student in average
daily attendance in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,792 per student in average daily attendance in fiscal year 2027-
2028, as well as to meet the other requirements of KRS 157.360. Notwithstanding KRS 157.360(2), each district’s
base funding level shall be adjusted for the number of students demonstrating limited proficiency in English language
skills, multiplied by 0.096.
Funds appropriated to the SEEK Program shall be allotted to school districts in accordance with KRS 157.310
to 157.440, except that the total of the funds allotted shall not exceed the appropriation for this purpose, except as
provided in this Act. The total appropriation for the SEEK Program shall be measured by, or construed as, estimates
of the state expenditures required by KRS 157.310 to 157.440. If the required expenditures exceed these estimates,
the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, upon the written request of the Commissioner of Education
and with the approval of the Governor, may increase the appropriation by such amount as may be available and
necessary to meet, to the extent possible, the required expenditures under the cited sections of the Kentucky Revised
Statutes, but any increase of the total appropriation to the SEEK Program is subject to Part III, General Provisions, of
this Act and KRS Chapter 48. If funds appropriated to the SEEK Program are insufficient to provide the amount of
money required under KRS 157.310 to 157.440, allotments to local school districts may be reduced in accordance
with KRS 157.430.
(3) SEEK Lapse: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any General Fund amounts appropriated to the SEEK
Program that are not necessary to meet the requirements set forth in KRS 157.310 to 157.440 in each fiscal year shall
lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(4) Base SEEK Allotments: Notwithstanding KRS 157.420(2), included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,043,023,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,098,833,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the base
SEEK Program as defined by KRS 157.360. Funds appropriated to the SEEK Program shall be allotted to school

CHAPTER 168 21
districts in accordance with KRS 157.310 to 157.440, except that the total of the funds allotted shall not exceed the
appropriation for this purpose, except as provided in this Act.
(5) Tier I Component: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $248,291,300 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $237,494,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Tier I component as established by KRS 157.440.
Notwithstanding KRS 157.440(1)(a), the board of education of each school district may levy an equivalent tax rate as
defined in KRS 160.470(9)(a) which will produce up to 17.5 percent of those revenues guaranteed by the SEEK
Program. The levy shall be made no later than October 1 of each odd numbered year, and revenue generated by this
levy shall be equalized at 150 percent of the statewide average per pupil assessment.
(6) Vocational Transportation: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $7,833,100 in each
fiscal year for vocational transportation.
(7) Teachers' Retirement System Employer Match: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$529,410,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $541,260,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to enable local school districts to
provide the employer match for qualified employees.
(8) Salary Supplements for Nationally Certified Teachers: Notwithstanding KRS 157.395, included in
the above General Fund appropriation is $4,000,000 in each fiscal year for the purpose of providing salary
supplements for public school teachers attaining certification by the National Board for Professional Teaching
Standards. Notwithstanding KRS 157.395, if the appropriation is insufficient to provide the mandated salary
supplement for teachers who have obtained this certification, the Department of Education is authorized to pro rata
reduce the supplement.
(9) SEEK Adjustment Factors: Funds allocated for the SEEK base and its adjustment factors that are not
needed for the base or a particular adjustment factor may be allocated to other adjustment factors, if funds for that
adjustment factor are not sufficient.
(10) Facilities Support Program of Kentucky/Equalized Nickel Levies: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $137,176,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $126,577,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide
facilities equalization funding pursuant to KRS 157.440 and 157.620.
(11) Growth Levy Equalization Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$54,370,400 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $46,449,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide facilities equalization
funding pursuant to KRS 157.440 and 157.620 for districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(1)
and (4). Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(1)(b)2., a school district that imposes the levy authorized by KRS
157.621(1)(b)1. shall be equalized for that levy, in addition to the equalization funding appropriated in accordance
with KRS 157.621(1)(b)2., and all funds for this purpose shall be committed to debt service, new facilities, or major
renovations in accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that any local
school district receiving equalization under this subsection shall receive full calculated equalization until the earlier
of 20 years of the effective date of this Act, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this
equalization are retired, in accordance with KRS 157.621(2).
(12) Retroactive Equalized Facility Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$75,574,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $70,808,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide equalized facility funding
pursuant to KRS 157.440 and 157.620 to districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(2) and (4). In
addition, a local board of education that levied a tax rate subject to recall by January 1, 2014, in addition to the five
cents levied pursuant to KRS 157.440(1)(b) and that committed the receipts to debt service, new facilities, or major
renovations of existing facilities shall be eligible for equalization funds from the state at 150 percent of the statewide
average per pupil assessment. Revenue to generate the five cent equivalent levy may be obtained from levies on
property, motor vehicles, or the taxes authorized by KRS 160.593 to 160.597, 160.601 to 160.633, and 160.635 to
160.648 if the levy was dedicated to facilities funding at the time of the levy. The equalization funds shall be used as
provided in KRS 157.440(1)(b). Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(2)(a) and (4), for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium,
school districts that levied the tax rate subject to recall prior to January 15, 2024, shall be equalized at 100 percent of
the calculated equalization funding, school districts that levied the tax rate subject to recall after January 15, 2024,
and before January 1, 2026, shall be equalized at 25 percent of the calculated equalization funding, and all funds for
this purpose shall be committed to debt service, new facilities, or major renovations in accordance with KRS
157.440(1)(b). It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that any local school district receiving equalization
under this subsection shall receive full calculated equalization until the earlier of 20 years from the effective date of
this Act or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this equalization funding are retired, in
accordance with KRS 157.621(2). It is also the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that any local school district that
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

22 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
levies a tax rate subject to recall after January 1, 2026, shall not receive equalization in the 2028-2030 fiscal
biennium and thereafter.
(13) Equalized Facility Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $18,746,800 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $17,186,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide equalized facility funding pursuant to
KRS 157.440 and 157.620 to districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(3) and (4).
Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(3)(c), a school district meeting the criteria of KRS 157.621(3)(a) and (b) shall be
equalized at 100 percent of the calculated equalization funding in each fiscal year, and all funds for this purpose shall
be committed to debt service, new facilities, or major renovations in accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). In addition,
notwithstanding KRS 157.621(1) and (3), a school district that has levied a five-cent equivalent rate authorized by
KRS 157.621(1)(a) and is not receiving state equalization funding for that levy under KRS 157.621(1)(b),
157.621(3), or any other provision of this Act, shall be equalized at 100 percent of the calculated equalization funding
in each fiscal year, and all funds for this purpose shall be committed to debt service, new facilities, or major
renovations in accordance with KRS 157.440(1)(b). It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that any local
school district receiving equalization under this subsection shall receive full calculated equalization until the earlier
of 20 years of the effective date of this Act, or the date the bonds for the local school district supported by this
equalization are retired, in accordance with KRS 157.621(3).
(14) BRAC Equalized Facility Funding: Notwithstanding KRS 157.621(1)(c)2., included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $3,162,200 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,749,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to
provide equalized facility funding to school districts meeting the eligibility requirements of KRS 157.621(1)(c)1.
pursuant to KRS 157.440 and 157.620. It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that the district receiving
equalization under this subsection shall not receive equalization after the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium.
(15) Equalization Funding for Critical Construction Needs Schools: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $10,136,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $9,781,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to school districts in
accordance with KRS 157.621(5).
(16) Hold-Harmless Guarantee: A hold-harmless guarantee is established in each fiscal year which
provides that every local school district shall receive at least the same amount of SEEK state funding per pupil as was
received in fiscal year 1991-1992. If funds appropriated to the SEEK Program are insufficient to provide the amount
of money required under KRS 157.310 to 157.440, and allotments to local school districts are reduced in accordance
with KRS 157.430, allocations to school districts subject to this provision shall not be reduced.
(17) Residential Youth-at-Risk Programs: In accordance with KRS 157.360, no funds from the SEEK
Program shall be distributed to the programs operated by the Kentucky Guard Youth Challenge Division of the
Department of Military Affairs. Notwithstanding KRS 157.350, 157.360, 157.410, and any other statute to the
contrary, any school district providing educational services to students enrolled in programs operated by the
Kentucky Guard Youth Challenge Division of the Department of Military Affairs shall be paid for those services
solely from the General Fund appropriation in Part I, A., 6. of this Act, and students enrolled in such programs shall
not be included in the average daily attendance for purposes of SEEK Program funding.
(18) Salary Supplements for Certified Audiologists and Speech Language Pathologists: Included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $2,312,000 in each fiscal year for the purpose of providing a $2,000 salary
supplement each year for full-time public school Audiologists and Speech Language Pathologists that have active
Certificates of Clinical Competence, as offered by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association.
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, if the appropriation is insufficient to provide all full-time public school
American Speech-Language-Hearing Association certified Audiologists and Speech Language Pathologists with the
$2,000 stipend, then the Department of Education is authorized to pro rata reduce the supplement.
(19) Full-Day Kindergarten: Notwithstanding KRS 157.320 or any other statute or regulation to the
contrary, the Department of Education shall count each kindergarten pupil in full for that respective school year, for
the purpose of determining SEEK funds and any other state funding based in whole or in part on average daily
attendance for the district, except that a district shall receive an amount equal to one-half of the state portion of the
average statewide per pupil guaranteed base funding level for each student who graduated early under the provisions
of KRS 158.142.
(20) SEEK Transportation: Notwithstanding KRS 157.370 and 157.360(2)(c), included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $398,884,500 in each fiscal year to support pupil transportation.
(21) Legislative Policy Requirement: The 2026 General Assembly provides the following requirement to
local boards of education and the Kentucky Department of Education:

CHAPTER 168 23
(a) Local school districts that receive state funding from the Support Education Excellence in Kentucky
Program shall:
1. Prominently display, in not less than 16-point type, on the local board of education’s internet landing
page, the district’s percentage of students scoring Proficient in Reading, the district’s percentage of students scoring
Distinguished in Reading, the district’s percentage of students scoring Proficient in Mathematics, and the district’s
percentage of students scoring Distinguished in Mathematics on the most recent Kentucky Summative Assessment,
as defined by KRS 158.6453;
2. Prominently display a web link to the detailed results of the district’s performance on the most recent
Kentucky Summative Assessment on the local board of education’s internet landing page;
3. Display the same information specified in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph at the top of each page of
the board’s website in a banner format;
4. Prominently display, in not less than 16-point type, on each school’s internet landing page, the school’s
percentage of students scoring Proficient in Reading, the school’s percentage of students scoring Distinguished in
Reading, the percentage of students scoring Proficient in Mathematics, and the percentage of students scoring
Distinguished in Mathematics on the school’s most recent Kentucky Summative Assessment;
5. Prominently display on each school’s internet landing page, a link to the detailed results of the school’s
results on the most recent Kentucky Summative Assessment; and
6. Display the same information specified in subparagraph 4. of this paragraph in banner format on each
page of the school’s website;
(b) The Kentucky Department of Education shall post a rank order by overall academic performance of all
schools on its website;
(c) The Kentucky Department of Education shall ensure compliance with this subsection by every district,
and offer assistance, as needed;
(d) The 2026 General Assembly is aware of the intention of surrounding states to set increased minimum
salaries for classroom teachers in those states by statute or regulation. The General Assembly also recognizes the fact
that the local economy heavily affects the salary schedules of classified employees; and
(e) The 2026 General Assembly directs each local board of education to consider the actions of other states
and the local economy and the related effect on recruitment and retention when establishing the salary schedules for
classroom teachers and classified employees. Additional funds have been made available to local school districts
through increases in SEEK resources. The 2026 General Assembly encourages local school districts to provide
certified and classified staff a salary or compensation increase.
(22) Star Charter Academy: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,000,000 in each fiscal
year as a one-time allocation to support a pilot program of Star Academy schools within existing public schools
throughout the state.
(23) SEEK Per Pupil Reporting: Publicly available reports published or distributed by the Kentucky
Department of Education related to the SEEK Program disbursements to districts shall include adjustments that
capture the total state funding per student by aggregating all state appropriations made on behalf of school districts,
including Teachers’ Retirement System payments and insurance payments, and express the totals on a per pupil basis
using the district’s prior year statewide average daily attendance. These calculations shall be separate from and shall
not be incorporated into the SEEK formula or used to determine SEEK allotments.
(24) Academic Academies: Notwithstanding KRS 157.310 to 157.440 and 157.621, students enrolled in the
Craft Academy for Excellence in Science and Mathematics, the Gatton Academy for Excellence in Science and
Mathematics in Kentucky, and the Votruba Young Scholars Academy shall not be included in the average daily
attendance of the students’ districts of residence for the purpose of calculating SEEK program funding in each fiscal
year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(25) Model Laboratory School SEEK Calculation Adjustment: Notwithstanding KRS 164.380(5),
adjustments to SEEK Program funding for students attending the Eastern Kentucky University Model Laboratory
School shall be reduced by $900,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,800,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028. It is the
intent of the 2026 General Assembly to eliminate the adjustment in subsequent fiscal years.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

24 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(26) Transportation Calculation Flexibility: Notwithstanding KRS 157.370 and 702 KAR 5:020, a school
district may request that the Commissioner of Education use the second preceding year’s days transported in place of
the prior year’s days transported for purposes of the calculation under KRS 157.370 and 702 KAR 5:020 if the
district calendar was negatively impacted by new construction or major renovations. Nothing in this provision shall
require a school district to use a number of days transported that would reduce the funding calculated under KRS
157.370.
2. OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 62,072,200 60,564,500
Restricted Funds 4,751,300 5,612,800
Federal Funds 565,770,700 565,989,000
TOTAL 632,594,200 632,166,300
(1) Advanced Placement and International Baccalaureate Exams: Notwithstanding KRS 160.348(3),
included in the above General Fund appropriation is $960,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $930,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028 to pay the cost of Advanced Placement and International Baccalaureate examinations for those students
who meet the eligibility requirements for free or reduced-price meals.
(2) Employee Reporting: The Kentucky Department of Education shall provide a report by August 1 of
each year to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. At a minimum, the report shall include:
(a) A count and list, by name, of all full-time, part-time, and interim employees employed under KRS
Chapter 18A;
(b) A count and list, by name, of all contract employees;
(c) The position title, Kentucky Department of Education office served, and primary work location of every
employee;
(d) The employees’ level of compensation, on an annualized basis, including the percentage of all fund
sources used to compensate the employee; and
(e) For contract employees, the start and end date of the relevant contract, as well as the name of any entity
involved in administering the contract.
(3) Certified and Classified Staff Compensation Increase Reporting: The Kentucky Department of
Education shall provide a report by September 1 of each year to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue detailing certified and classified staff compensation increases for the current school year by each local
school district. At a minimum, the report shall include:
(a) A brief description of the type of staff compensation increases adopted, such as percentage-based or flat
rate, if applicable;
(b) The average percentage rate or dollar amount of the compensation increases, by classification, if
applicable;
(c) The effective date of the compensation increases, if applicable;
(d) The manner in which the compensation increases were delineated, such as universally or by job
classification, if applicable;
(e) Any monetary compensation in addition to that provided through the district’s single salary schedule,
such as one-time payments, if applicable;
(f) The date the local board of education adopted the compensation increases, if applicable; and
(g) Any changes to the local school district’s certified and/or classified staff single salary schedule(s), if
applicable.
(4) Blind/Deaf Residential Travel Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$472,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $457,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Blind/Deaf Residential Travel
Program.

CHAPTER 168 25
(5) Educators Employment Liability Insurance Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $4,800,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,650,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the
educators employment liability insurance program pursuant to KRS 161.212.
(6) School and Community Nutrition Programs: Included in the above Federal Funds appropriation is an
additional $100,181,200 in each fiscal year to support increased spending on school and community nutrition
programs.
(7) Special Examination: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and
carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 118.
(8) Local School District Insurance Coverage Report: The Kentucky Department of Education shall
submit a report detailing each local school district’s insurance coverage to the Department of Insurance no later than
October 1, 2026. The report shall at a minimum include, for each district, the insurer and level of insurance coverage,
as required under 702 KAR 3:030.
(9) School District Project and Indebtedness Report: The Kentucky Department of Education, with
assistance from the School Facilities Construction Commission, shall compile and submit a report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by June 30, 2027. The report shall be submitted in a format set forth by
the Legislative Research Commission and shall include, at a minimum, a list of every local school district’s existing
bonded projects, the date and amount of any additional tax levy enacted by a school board for each project, any
equalization provisions provided for each project, the total amount of debt service payments made by each district,
and the amount of debt service remaining and anticipated retirement dates of the debt service associated with each
project.
3. LEARNING AND RESULTS SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,526,964,400 1,729,548,700
Restricted Funds 36,143,000 43,692,000
Federal Funds 621,154,200 619,729,900
TOTAL 2,184,261,600 2,392,970,600
(1) Kentucky Education Technology System: Notwithstanding KRS 157.650 to 157.665, the School for
the Deaf and the School for the Blind shall be fully eligible, along with local school districts, to participate in the
Kentucky Education Technology System in a manner that takes into account the special needs of the students of these
two schools.
(2) Family Resource and Youth Services Centers: Funds appropriated to establish and support Family
Resource and Youth Services Centers shall be transferred in each fiscal year to the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services consistent with KRS 156.496. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services is authorized to use, for
administrative purposes, no more than two percent of the total funds transferred from the Department of Education
for the Family Resource and Youth Services Centers. If a certified person is employed as a director or coordinator of
a Family Resource and Youth Services Center, that person shall retain his or her status as a certified employee of the
school district.
(3) Health Insurance: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,076,821,500 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,277,823,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for employer contributions for health insurance and the
contribution to the health reimbursement account for employees waiving coverage. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229,
General Fund in the amount of $98,310,700 in fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into
fiscal year 2026-2027.
(4) Program Flexibility: Notwithstanding KRS 158.070(8) and 158.446, local school districts shall be
provided additional flexibility in the utilization of funds for Extended School Services and Safe Schools. Local
school districts shall continue to address the governing statutes and serve the intended student population but may
utilize funds from these programs for general operating expenses in each year of the fiscal biennium. Local school
districts that utilize these funds for general operating expenses shall report to the Kentucky Department of Education
and the Interim Joint Committee on Education the amount of funding from each program utilized for general
operating expenses.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

26 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) Center for School Safety: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $15,000,000 in each
fiscal year for the Center for School Safety. Notwithstanding KRS 158.446, the Center for School Safety shall allot
these moneys for the purposes described in KRS 158.440, 158.441, 158.4415, 158.4416, 158.442, 158.445, and
158.446 at both public and private school buildings, campuses, grounds, recreational areas, or athletic fields, except
that no more than $2,000,000 in each fiscal year may be retained for operating and administrative purposes.
(6) Allocations to School-Based Decision Making Councils: Notwithstanding KRS 160.345(8), for each
fiscal year, a local board of education may reduce the allocations to individual schools within the district as outlined
in 702 KAR 3:246, secs. 6, 7, and 8. The allocation under 702 KAR 3:246, sec. 6 shall not be less than $100 per pupil
in average daily attendance.
(7) Kentucky School for the Blind and Kentucky School for the Deaf: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $8,289,100 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky School for the Blind and $11,291,800 in each
fiscal year for the Kentucky School for the Deaf.
(8) Career and Technical Education: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $127,115,900
in each fiscal year for career and technical education. Of this amount, $70,063,400 in each fiscal year shall be
distributed as supplemental funding to support qualifying locally operated career and technical education centers,
state-operated area technology centers, and programs based on enrollment and incentive criteria, pursuant to KRS
157.069.
The General Assembly recognizes that supplemental funding for locally operated career and technical
education centers and state-operated area technology centers is recurring, and it is the intent of the 2026 General
Assembly to evaluate those funding needs before January 1, 2028.
(9) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 156.095, 156.553, 156.555, 157.390, 158.070,
158.770, 158.775, 158.805, 161.027, 161.028, 161.030, 161.165, and 161.167, no General Fund is provided for the
Professional Development Program, the Commonwealth School Improvement Fund, the Leadership and Mentor
Fund, the Middle School Academic Center, the Teacher's Professional Growth Fund, the Teacher Academies
Program, the Writing Program, the Kentucky Principal Internship Program, the Kentucky Teacher Internship
Program, and the Kentucky Academy for Equity in Teaching in order to increase funding for school-based mental
health services providers.
(10) Learning and Results Services Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the
following allocations for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, but no portion of these funds shall be utilized for state-level
administrative purposes:
(a) $1,900,000 in each fiscal year for AdvanceKentucky;
(b) $1,850,000 in each fiscal year for the Community Education Program;
(c) $3,000,000 in each fiscal year for Dataseam;
(d) $23,916,300 in each fiscal year for the Extended School Services Program;
(e) $48,889,000 in each fiscal year for the Family Resource and Youth Services Centers Program;
(f) $10,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Gifted and Talented Program;
(g) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the Hearing and Speech Center;
(h) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the Heuser Hearing and Language Academy;
(i) Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), $1,675,500 in each fiscal year for the Jobs for America’s
Graduates Program;
(j) $500,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Alliance of Boys & Girls Clubs;
(k) $12,500,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Educational Collaborative for State Agency Children;
(l) $1,391,000 in each fiscal year for Local School District Life Insurance;
(m) $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for Math Nation;
(n) $5,019,000 in each fiscal year for the Mathematics Achievement Fund;
(o) $84,481,100 in each fiscal year for the Preschool Program;
(p) $12,261,100 in each fiscal year for the Read to Achieve Program. Notwithstanding KRS
154A.130(3)(b), included in the above appropriation is $1,124,500 from lottery proceeds;

CHAPTER 168 27
(q) $11,000,000 in each fiscal year for the Read to Succeed Program;
(r) $2,000,000 in each fiscal year for Save the Children;
(s) $1,200,000 in each fiscal year for the Statewide Reading Research Center;
(t) $700,000 in each fiscal year for Teach for America. Teach for America shall submit a report on the
outcomes of the program to the Interim Joint Committee on Education by August 1, 2027;
(u) $500,000 in each fiscal year for the Visually Impaired Preschool Services Program; and
(v) $1,500,000 in each fiscal year for We Lead CS.
It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly to reevaluate each Learning and Results Services Program, both
individually and collectively, to optimize funding and support for Kentucky students.
(11) School-Based Mental Health Services Providers: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $7,412,500 in each fiscal year to fund school-based mental health services provider full-time equivalent positions
on a reimbursement basis. The Kentucky Center for School Safety, in consultation with the Office of the State School
Security Marshal, shall develop criteria to determine which districts shall receive funding to meet the requirements of
KRS 158.4416(3)(a). The criteria shall include:
(a) A local district’s use of Medicaid funding to supplement General Fund;
(b) An equitable and balanced statewide distribution; and
(c) Any other criteria to support a trauma-informed approach in schools.
(12) School Resource Officers: Included in the above appropriations is $11,500,000 in General Fund and
$11,500,000 in Restricted Funds in each fiscal year to assist local school districts and nonpublic schools in funding
salaries for school resource officers. The Kentucky Department of Education shall reimburse local school districts
and nonpublic schools up to $20,000 for each full-time certified school resource officer. Notwithstanding KRS
15.430 and 15.470, excess Restricted Funds from the Department of Criminal Justice Training shall be transferred to
the Kentucky Department of Education for this purpose.
(13) Federal Remedial Education Grants: It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly that the Kentucky
Department of Education shall apply for all federal grants available for remedial education.
(14) Principal Leadership Development Practicum: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
a one-time allocation of $1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support a new program, overseen by the Kentucky
Department of Education, to develop and mentor new school principals.
TOTAL - DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,122,958,400 5,355,283,400
Restricted Funds 40,894,300 49,304,800
Federal Funds 1,186,924,900 1,185,718,900
TOTAL 6,350,777,600 6,590,307,100
D. EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 1,063,800 983,200
General Fund 13,593,600 13,262,100
Restricted Funds 23,082,900 22,889,600
Federal Funds 5,641,200 5,675,400
TOTAL 43,381,500 42,810,300
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

28 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Early Childhood Development: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$1,063,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $983,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Early Childhood Advisory
Council.
(2) Heuser Hearing Institute: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,920,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $1,860,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Heuser Hearing Institute to support programs
developed to close the education and achievement gaps for deaf and hard-of-hearing adults.
(3) The Hope Center: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $96,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $93,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Hope Center.
(4) Lapse and Reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund Appropriations: Notwithstanding
KRS 194A.055, 200.151, 248.654, and any statute to the contrary, $6,500,000 in General Fund (Tobacco) settlement
agreement funds previously appropriated from the Early Childhood Development Fund to the General Administration
and Program Support budget unit within the Education and Labor Cabinet for the benefit of the Early Childhood
Advisory Council shall lapse to the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund established in KRS 248.654.
2. PROPRIETARY EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 542,300 547,300
3. DEAF AND HARD OF HEARING
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,075,400 1,067,600
Restricted Funds 1,360,200 1,326,700
TOTAL 2,435,600 2,394,300
4. KENTUCKY EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 17,425,000 17,771,600
Restricted Funds 2,038,900 2,038,900
TOTAL 19,463,900 19,810,500
5. ENVIRONMENTAL EDUCATION COUNCIL
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 524,000 521,700
Federal Funds 429,800 429,800
TOTAL 953,800 951,500
(1) Environmental Education Council: Notwithstanding KRS 224.43-505(2)(b), the Council may use
interest received to support the operations of the Council.
6. LIBRARIES AND ARCHIVES
a. General Operations
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 5,959,200 6,389,100
Restricted Funds 2,922,300 2,358,800
Federal Funds 3,038,300 3,071,000
TOTAL 11,919,800 11,818,900
b. Direct Local Aid
2026-27 2027-28

CHAPTER 168 29
General Fund 5,574,700 5,574,700
Restricted Funds 1,046,900 1,046,900
TOTAL 6,621,600 6,621,600
(1) Per Capita Grants: Notwithstanding KRS 171.201, no General Fund is provided for nonconstruction
state aid.
(2) Public Library Facilities Construction: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$3,074,700 in each fiscal year for the Public Library Facilities Construction Fund. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229 and
171.027 to 171.223, any expired debt service payments shall lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705).
(3) Dolly Parton's Imagination Library: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $2,500,000
in each fiscal year for the Imagination Library of Kentucky Program. The General Assembly hereby directs the
Department for Libraries and Archives and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to collaborate on researching
ways to increase enrollment in Dolly Parton's Imagination Library Program for children from low-income households
and children living in foster care. The Department for Libraries and Archives and the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall submit a joint report detailing their findings, identified strategies, and cost of implementation to the
Governor and the Legislative Research Commission by November 1, 2026.
TOTAL - LIBRARIES AND ARCHIVES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 11,533,900 11,963,800
Restricted Funds 3,969,200 3,405,700
Federal Funds 3,038,300 3,071,000
TOTAL 18,541,400 18,440,500
7. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 40,226,200 39,771,200
Restricted Funds 12,965,600 12,911,900
Federal Funds 480,160,800 481,629,200
TOTAL 533,352,600 534,312,300
(1) Cafeteria Service Contracts: No state agency shall enter into any contract with a nongovernmental
entity for the operation of food services provided in the cafeterias located in the Kentucky Transportation Cabinet
office building and/or the Cabinet for Human Resources office building in Frankfort unless the Office of Vocational
Rehabilitation has declined in writing to provide such services.
(2) Adult Education: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are sufficient funds in each fiscal
year to support the Office of Adult Education. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the General Fund appropriation for the
Office of Adult Education in each fiscal year shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(3) Unemployment Insurance System Replacement: Notwithstanding KRS 341.243(8), the Service
Capacity Upgrade Fund may collect up to $68,000,000 for the purpose of funding the Replace Unemployment
Insurance System project authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, D., 4., 005. The Office of Unemployment
Insurance shall prepare a report detailing the replacement of the unemployment insurance system. The report shall
include a description of how the allocated Restricted Funds are being utilized and a timeline of expected completion
and implementation of a new system. This report shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue quarterly, beginning May 1, 2026.
(4) Vocational Rehabilitation: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $3,500,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $3,600,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Office of Vocational Rehabilitation to support an
increase in the match and maintenance of effort requirement for the Vocational Rehabilitation Grants to States (Basic
Support) federal award.
8. WORKPLACE STANDARDS
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

30 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,694,800 1,676,000
Restricted Funds 8,448,300 8,357,600
Federal Funds 4,200,000 4,291,500
TOTAL 14,343,100 14,325,100
(1) Youth Employment Programs: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 119.
(2) Court-Awarded Expenses: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement
and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 105.
9. WORKERS' CLAIMS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 60,812,900 59,744,500
10. OCCUPATIONAL SAFETY AND HEALTH REVIEW COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 780,800 772,100
11. WORKERS' COMPENSATION FUNDING COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 88,165,200 86,108,500
12. WORKERS' COMPENSATION NOMINATING COMMITTEE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 1,100 1,100
13. DISABILITY DETERMINATIONS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 823,600 814,300
Federal Funds 66,308,700 67,256,300
TOTAL 67,132,300 68,070,600
TOTAL - EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 1,063,800 983,200
General Fund 85,548,900 85,512,300
Restricted Funds 203,515,000 199,439,900
Federal Funds 559,778,800 562,353,200
TOTAL 849,906,500 848,288,600
E. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
Budget Units
1. SECRETARY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 4,188,400 4,149,400
Restricted Funds 4,882,300 4,821,900
Federal Funds 1,330,900 1,361,100

CHAPTER 168 31
TOTAL 10,401,600 10,332,400
2. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 6,145,600 6,112,100
Restricted Funds 6,270,600 6,286,500
Federal Funds 3,695,000 3,751,600
TOTAL 16,111,200 16,150,200
3. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 28,315,000 28,464,200
Restricted Funds 84,816,000 82,962,100
Federal Funds 39,597,300 40,153,800
TOTAL 152,728,300 151,580,100
(1) Public and Private Dam Rehabilitation: The Department for Environmental Protection shall submit a
report to the Legislative Research Commission, Office of Budget Review, by September 1, 2027, recommending the
priority ranking and funding mechanisms for rehabilitating public and private high hazard dams within the
Commonwealth. The Department may work collaboratively with the Soil and Water Conservation Commission (KRS
146.110).
(2) Pollutants of Kentucky Waterways: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 105.
(3) Long-term Post-mining Water Treatment Permits: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient
funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 119.
4. NATURAL RESOURCES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 2,659,600 2,457,900
General Fund 40,384,500 40,416,000
Restricted Funds 24,671,200 23,800,500
Federal Funds 176,361,500 176,912,900
TOTAL 244,076,800 243,587,300
(1) Emergency Forest Fire Suppression: Not less than $2,500,000 of the above General Fund
appropriation in each fiscal year shall be set aside for emergency forest fire suppression. Notwithstanding KRS
45.229, any portion of the $2,500,000 not expended for emergency forest fire suppression shall lapse to the Budget
Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) at the end of each fiscal year. There is appropriated from the General
Fund the necessary funds, subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act, which are required as a result
of emergency fire suppression activities in excess of $2,500,000 in each fiscal year. Fire suppression costs in excess
of $2,500,000 annually shall be deemed necessary government expenses and shall be paid, up to $4,000,000 in each
fiscal year, from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705).
(2) Environmental Stewardship Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation
is $1,773,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,638,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Environmental Stewardship
Program.
(3) Conservation District Local Aid: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$886,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $819,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Division of Conservation to provide
direct aid to local conservation districts.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

32 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
5. ENERGY POLICY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,617,400 1,572,700
Restricted Funds 613,100 607,100
Federal Funds 62,541,200 62,555,900
TOTAL 64,771,700 64,735,700
6. KENTUCKY NATURE PRESERVES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,650,800 1,633,900
Restricted Funds 2,640,900 2,622,900
Federal Funds 275,100 278,200
TOTAL 4,566,800 4,535,000
7. PUBLIC SERVICE COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 14,622,900 14,481,000
Restricted Funds 2,967,500 2,914,400
Federal Funds 1,108,300 1,119,900
TOTAL 18,698,700 18,515,300
(1) Siting and Construction of Nuclear Energy Facilities: Included in the above appropriations is
sufficient funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 29.
(2) Energy Planning and Inventory Commission: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient
funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 172.
(3) Additional Personnel: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $797,500 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $822,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel and operating expenses.
TOTAL - ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 2,659,600 2,457,900
General Fund 96,924,600 96,829,300
Restricted Funds 126,861,600 124,015,400
Federal Funds 284,909,300 286,133,400
TOTAL 511,355,100 509,436,000
F. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 9,803,700 13,468,900
Restricted Funds 45,074,400 41,161,500
TOTAL 54,878,100 54,630,400
(1) Kentucky Affordable Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $5,100,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,600,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support projected
tuition payments and refunds through fiscal year 2025-2026.

CHAPTER 168 33
2. CONTROLLER
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 4,216,900 5,378,100
Restricted Funds 19,672,600 18,109,700
TOTAL 23,889,500 23,487,800
(1) Social Security Contingent Liability Fund: Any expenditures that may be required by KRS 61.470
are hereby deemed necessary government expenses and shall be paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account
(KRS 48.700), if available, or from any available balance in the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705),
subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
(2) Controller Operations: Notwithstanding KRS 61.470, included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriations is $560,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $140,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the operations
of the Office of the Controller.
3. DEBT SERVICE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 14,100,200 13,880,800
General Fund 596,104,400 816,242,400
TOTAL 610,204,600 830,123,200
(1) Kentucky State Police Two-Way Radio Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS 150.021(2), the
Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall transfer $599,200 in each fiscal year to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to partially support debt service on the Kentucky State Police Two-Way Radio System
project.
(2) Debt Service: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $42,383,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $103,824,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for new debt service to support new bonds as set forth in Part II,
Capital Projects Budget, of this Act.
(3) Carry Forward of General Fund Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229 and 48.720,
General Fund in the amount of $18,500,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into
fiscal year 2026-2027.
(4) Use of Restricted Funds for Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS 218B.080(3), $12,000,000 in each
fiscal year; notwithstanding KRS 286.1-485(3), $9,000,000 in each fiscal year; notwithstanding KRS 42.4582,
$6,500,000 in each fiscal year; notwithstanding KRS 243.025(3), $6,000,000 in each fiscal year; and notwithstanding
KRS 14.140, $5,000,000 in each fiscal year, are hereby transferred to the Debt Service Fund to be used to pay debt
service on General Fund supported bonds previously issued by the Commonwealth.
4. FACILITIES AND SUPPORT SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 9,100,200 9,000,500
Restricted Funds 57,654,700 57,117,600
TOTAL 66,754,900 66,118,100
(1) Capitol Annex Renovation: Notwithstanding KRS 42.425 and any statute to the contrary, the
administration and management of the Capitol Annex Renovation project authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part
II, F., 2., 009. shall be approved by the Director of the Legislative Research Commission or his designee.
5. COUNTY COSTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 29,243,500 29,243,500
Restricted Funds 1,702,500 1,702,500
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

34 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
TOTAL 30,946,000 30,946,000
(1) County Costs: Funds required to pay county costs are appropriated and additional funds may be
allotted from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS
48.705) by the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, subject to the conditions and procedures
provided in this Act.
(2) Reimbursement to Sheriffs’ Offices for Court Security Services: Notwithstanding KRS 64.092(6),
the sheriff or other law enforcement officer serving a Circuit or District Court shall be compensated at the rate of $15
per hour of service. To be eligible for this enhanced rate, deputies providing services must be paid at least $10 per
hour.
6. COMMONWEALTH OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 136,597,800 134,398,500
Federal Funds 1,716,600 1,716,600
TOTAL 138,314,400 136,115,100
(1) Computer Services Fund Receipts: The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall
provide a listing of fee receipts from the Executive, Judicial, and Legislative Branches of government itemized by
appropriation units, cost allocation methodology, and a report detailing the rebate of excess fee receipts to the
agencies to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by August 1 of each fiscal year.
(2) Legacy Modernization: The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall prepare a report for the
Legacy Modernization capital project authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, F., 3., 001. The report shall
include a list of legacy IT systems that have been completed, the date in which they were completed, the state agency
the IT system was for, and a status report for the completion percentage of all other ongoing modernization projects.
This report shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by October 31 of each
fiscal year.
(3) Security Enhancements: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $625,800 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $1,719,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support security enhancements in key areas such as email
integrity, data classification, directory resilience, and incident response and training.
(4) Centralized Registry of Artificial Intelligence Systems: Included in the above appropriations is
sufficient funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 66.
7. REVENUE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 250,000 250,000
General Fund 123,420,800 125,474,400
Restricted Funds 12,448,900 12,448,900
Federal Funds 50,000 50,000
TOTAL 136,169,700 138,223,300
(1) Operations of Revenue: Notwithstanding KRS 132.672, 134.552(2), 136.652, and 365.390(2), funds
may be expended in support of the operations of the Department of Revenue.
(2) State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of $250,000 of the Tobacco
Settlement payments received in each fiscal year is appropriated to the Finance and Administration Cabinet,
Department of Revenue, for the state's diligent enforcement of noncompliant nonparticipating manufacturers.
8. PROPERTY VALUATION ADMINISTRATORS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 64,978,600 64,663,500
Restricted Funds 4,786,400 4,786,000
TOTAL 69,765,000 69,449,500

CHAPTER 168 35
(1) Management of Expenditures: Notwithstanding KRS 132.590 and 132.597, the property valuation
administrators are authorized to take necessary actions to manage expenditures within the appropriated amounts
contained in this Act.
(2) Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 132.590(3)(b), the increment provided on the base salary or
wages of each eligible property valuation administrator shall be the same as that provided for eligible state employees
in Part IV of this Act. The placement and advancement on the proper step of the salary schedule for property
valuation administrators as set forth in 132.590(2) shall continue to apply. The increment changes should be applied
to the salary schedule for property valuation administrators for the duration of this biennial budget.
**[(3) Use of Statewide Aerial Mapping System: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, each Property
Valuation Administrator shall utilize the Commonwealth’s statewide aerial imagery and mapping program,
KyFromAbove, as the source for aerial mapping and imagery services used in the administration of property tax
assessment functions. All Property Valuation Administrators shall transition to use of the statewide system on or
before June 30, 2028. The Commonwealth Office of Technology shall ensure coordination, technical assistance, and
implementation support to facilitate compliance with this requirement.]**
TOTAL - FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 14,350,200 14,130,800
General Fund 836,868,100 1,063,471,300
Restricted Funds 277,937,300 269,724,700
Federal Funds 1,766,600 1,766,600
TOTAL 1,130,922,200 1,349,093,400
G. HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 8,116,000 7,857,600
Restricted Funds 80,657,000 79,204,200
Federal Funds 68,600,000 69,010,700
TOTAL 157,373,000 156,072,500
(1) Human Service Transportation Delivery: Notwithstanding KRS 281.010(28), the Kentucky Works
Program shall not participate in the Human Service Transportation Delivery Program or the Coordinated
Transportation Advisory Committee.
(2) Federally Funded Positions: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.010(2) and any provisions of this Act to the
contrary, direct service units of the Office of Inspector General, Department for Income Support, Office for Children
with Special Health Care Needs, Department for Community Based Services, Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, Department for Family Resource Centers and Volunteer Services,
Department for Aging and Independent Living, and the Department for Public Health shall be authorized to establish
and fill such positions that are 100 percent federally funded for salary and fringe benefits.
(3) Special Olympics: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $144,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $139,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the operations of Special Olympics.
(4) Office of Medical Cannabis: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $7,140,800 in
each fiscal year to support the operations of the Office of Medical Cannabis. The Office may increase fees as
necessary to ensure continued operation and functions.
(5) Parkinson’s Disease Registry: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement
and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 85.
2. MEDICAID SERVICES
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

36 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Medicaid Administration
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 82,619,300 74,094,600
Restricted Funds 34,129,700 32,706,900
Federal Funds 241,290,600 224,326,100
TOTAL 358,039,600 331,127,600
(1) Transfer of Excess Administrative Funds for Medicaid Benefits: If any portion of the above General
Fund appropriation in either fiscal year is deemed to be in excess of the necessary expenses for administration of the
Department for Medicaid Services, the amount may be used for Medicaid Benefits in accordance with statutes
governing the functions and activities of the Department for Medicaid Services. In no instance shall these excess
funds be used without prior written approval of the State Budget Director to:
(a) Establish a new program;
(b) Expand the services of an existing program; or
(c) Increase rates or payment levels in an existing program.
Any transfer authorized under this subsection shall be approved by the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet upon recommendation of the State Budget Director.
(2) H.R. 1 - Community Engagement Program Implementation: Included in the above appropriations is
$8,137,900 in General Fund, $700,000 in Restricted Funds, and $26,663,700 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $1,532,900 in General Fund and $9,498,700 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support
implementation of a community engagement program and other needs as required by House Resolution 1, Pub. L.
No. 119-21. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall expend any federal grant funding received to assist
with implementation activities prior to expending the funds appropriated above.
b. Medicaid Benefits
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 3,009,535,200 3,014,808,900
Restricted Funds 167,183,800 2,322,812,600 2,251,485,200
Federal Funds 405,900,000 18,277,466,700 18,253,375,400
TOTAL 573,083,800 23,609,814,500 23,519,669,500
(1) Intergovernmental Transfers (IGTs): Any funds received through an Intergovernmental Transfer
(IGT) agreement between the Department for Medicaid Services and other governmental entities, in accordance with
a federally approved State Plan amendment, shall be used to provide for the health and welfare of the citizens of the
Commonwealth through the provision of Medicaid Benefits. Revenues from IGTs are contingent upon agreement by
the parties, including but not limited to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Medicaid
Services, and the appropriate government entity. The Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall
make the appropriate interim appropriations increase requests pursuant to KRS 48.630.
(2) Medicaid Benefits Budget Deficit: If Medicaid Benefits expenditures are projected to exceed available
funds, the Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may recommend and implement that
reimbursement rates, optional services, eligibles, or programs be reduced or maintained at levels existing at the time
of the projected deficit in order to avoid a budget deficit. The projected deficit shall be confirmed and approved by
the Office of State Budget Director. No rate, service, eligible, or program reductions shall be implemented by the
Cabinet for Health and Family Services without prior written notice of such action to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the State Budget Director. Such actions taken by the Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall be reported, upon request, at the next meeting of the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue.
(3) Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH) Program: Hospitals shall report the uncompensated care for
which, under federal law, the hospital is eligible to receive disproportionate share payments. Disproportionate share
payments shall equal the maximum amounts established under federal law. The Department for Medicaid Services
shall compile for each fiscal year a report on the total amount of disproportionate share payments made to hospitals.
The report shall identify the hospital receiving the DSH payment, the amount of the payment, and the fund source of

CHAPTER 168 37
the payment. The report shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the
Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board by November 15 of each fiscal year.
(4) Hospital Indigent Patient Billing: Hospitals shall not bill patients for services if the services have
been reported to the Cabinet and the hospital has received disproportionate share payments for the specific services.
(5) Provider Tax Information: Any provider who posts a sign or includes information on customer
receipts or any material distributed for public consumption indicating that it has paid provider tax shall also post, in
the same size typeset as the provider tax information, the amount of payment received from the Department for
Medicaid Services during the same period the provider tax was paid. Providers who fail to meet this requirement
shall be excluded from the Disproportionate Share Hospital and Medicaid Programs. The Cabinet for Health and
Family Services shall include this provision in facilities' annual licensure inspections.
(6) Critical Access Hospitals: Beginning on the effective date of this Act through June 30, 2028, no acute
care hospital shall convert to a critical access hospital unless the hospital has either received funding for a feasibility
study from the Kentucky Office of Rural Health or filed a written request by January 1, 2026, with the Kentucky
Office of Rural Health requesting funding for conducting a feasibility study.
(7) Appeals: An appeal from denial of a service or services provided by a Medicaid managed care
organization for medical necessity, or denial, limitation, or termination of a health care service in a case involving a
medical or surgical specialty or subspecialty, shall, upon request of the recipient, authorized person, or provider,
include a review by a board-eligible or board-certified physician in the appropriate specialty or subspecialty area;
except in the case of a health care service rendered by a chiropractor or optometrist, for which the denial shall be
made respectively by a chiropractor or optometrist duly licensed in Kentucky as specified in KRS 304.17A-
607(1)(b). The physician reviewer shall not have participated in the initial review and denial of service and shall not
be the provider of the service or services under consideration in the appeal.
(8) Medicaid Prescription Benefits Reporting: Notwithstanding KRS 205.647, the Department for
Medicaid Services shall submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the
Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board by October 31 of each fiscal year on the dispensing of prescription
medications to persons eligible under KRS 205.560. The report shall include:
(a) The total Medicaid dollars paid to the state pharmacy benefit manager by a managed care organization;
(b) The total amount of Medicaid dollars paid to the state pharmacy benefit manager by a managed care
organization which were not subsequently paid to a pharmacy licensed in Kentucky;
(c) The average reimbursement by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, and any other fee paid by the state
pharmacy benefit manager to licensed pharmacies with which the state pharmacy benefit manager shares common
ownership, management, or control; or which are owned, managed, or controlled by any of the state pharmacy benefit
manager's management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies
otherwise affiliated by a common owner, manager, or holding company; or which share any common members on the
board of directors; or which share managers in common;
(d) The average reimbursement by drug ingredient cost, dispensing fee, or any other fee paid by the state
pharmacy benefit manager to pharmacies licensed in Kentucky which operate 10 locations, 10 or fewer locations, or
10 or more locations; and
(e) All common ownership, management, common members of a board of directors, shared managers, or
control of the state pharmacy benefit manager, or any of the state pharmacy benefit manager's management
companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or companies otherwise affiliated by a
common owner, manager, or holding company with any managed care organization contracted to administer
Kentucky Medicaid benefits, any entity which contracts on behalf of a pharmacy, or any pharmacy services
administration organization, or any common ownership management, common members of a board of directors,
shared managers, or control of a pharmacy services administration organization that is contracted with the state
pharmacy benefit manager, with any drug wholesaler or distributor or any of the pharmacy services administration
organizations, management companies, parent companies, subsidiary companies, jointly held companies, or
companies otherwise affiliated by a common owner, common members of a board of directors, manager, or holding
company.
(9) Kentucky Access Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 304.17B-021, funds are transferred from this source to
Medicaid Benefits in each fiscal year.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

38 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(10) Michelle P. Waiver Slots: Included in the above appropriations is $1,064,700 in General Fund and
$2,484,300 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support 65 additional slots and $1,801,800 in General Fund
and $4,204,200 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support 45 additional slots for a total of 110 slots over
the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(11) Supports for Community Living Waiver Slots: Included in the above appropriations is $3,091,500 in
General Fund and $7,213,500 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support 90 additional slots and $4,637,300
in General Fund and $10,820,300 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support 45 additional slots for a total
of 135 slots over the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(12) Home and Community Based Waiver Slots: Included in the above appropriations is $1,404,200 in
General Fund and $3,276,400 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support 115 additional slots and
$1,953,600 in General Fund and $4,558,400 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support 45 additional slots
for a total of 160 slots over the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
(13) Medicaid Benefits Program Support: Included in the above appropriation is $55,983,800 in
Restricted Funds in fiscal year 2025-2026 to support program needs.
(14) Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinics (CCBHC): Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,441,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to maintain services at the existing clinics participating in the
CCBHC demonstration program, of this amount $1,000,000 is a one-time allocation.
(15) Pharmacist Payment Parity: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $128,100 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 to support the costs of administrative activities, including creation of a new pharmacist provider type
for implementation of pharmacist payment parity in the Kentucky Medicaid and the Kentucky Children’s Health
Insurance Programs. Reimbursement for clinical services performed by pharmacists within their scope of practice
shall be paid at a rate no less than the rate paid to other nonphysician practitioners for the delivery of similar services.
The Department for Medicaid Services shall submit a report on the implementation of pharmacist payment parity
within the Medicaid Program including a timeline of activities, expenditures related to any required system updates
and other administrative activities undertaken, and expenditures associated with coverage of pharmacists’ services by
fund source by November 1 of each fiscal year to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(16) MCO Payments: The Department for Medicaid Services or the Finance and Administration Cabinet
shall make 12 monthly payments in each fiscal year to Medicaid managed care vendors contracted to provide services
for the Medicaid program. All payments due during a fiscal year shall be issued within that same fiscal year and shall
not be deferred, delayed, or transferred to a subsequent fiscal year.
(17) Medicaid Service Reductions: If it is deemed necessary to make reductions in Medicaid services, a
priority shall be made to reduce services not expressly authorized by the General Assembly.
(18) Substance Use Disorder Programs: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 68.
(19) Behavioral and Mental Health Services: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to
implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 107.
(20) Medicaid Managed Care Organization Contracts: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient
funding to implement and carry out the provisions of 2025 Ky. Acts ch. 110.
(21) MCO Payments Reduction: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the Department for Medicaid
Services or the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall effectuate a 2.50 percent reduction in payments in Plan
Year 2028 to Medicaid managed care vendors contracted to provide services for the Medicaid Program. No reduction
shall be made in provider reimbursement rates. Any savings realized from the reduction in MCO payments shall be
used to increase reimbursement rates for services provided to Medicaid fee-for-service (FFS) beneficiaries. All state
directed payment programs approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) pursuant to 42
C.F.R. sec. 438.6 shall be excluded from the above payment reduction.
(22) Community Intervener Services: The Department for Medicaid Services shall promulgate any
necessary administrative regulations or amend existing waiver service definitions or policy to facilitate access to
intervener services for deaf-blind participants within the Michelle P. waiver program. These services shall be
designed to support the independence and community integration of eligible participants.
(23) Appalachian Regional Hospital: Included in the above appropriations is $14,600,000 in General Fund,
$6,800,000 in Restricted Funds, and $85,000,000 in Federal Funds in each fiscal year to support contracted
psychiatric services provided within Hospital District IV under KRS 210.300 and the Kentucky Community Access

CHAPTER 168 39
and Rural Engagement (KCARE) managed care incentive program operated by the Appalachian Regional Hospital as
authorized under 42 C.F.R. sec. 438.6(b)(2). The Department for Medicaid Services shall seek federal approval of the
KCARE program by the earlier of its next managed care contract submission to the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services (CMS) or within 90 days upon enactment of this legislation. The Department shall specify a
contract effective date of July 1, 2026, when submitting the application for federal approval of the KCARE Program.
The General Assembly encourages the Appalachian Regional Hospital KCARE Program to collaborate to the fullest
extent possible with other mental health providers in the region as it endeavors to expand and improve access to the
behavioral health system of eastern Kentucky.
(24) Medicaid State Directed Payments Program: Included in the above appropriations is an additional
$76,500,000 in Restricted Funds and $305,900,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2025-2026, $153,000,000 in
Restricted Funds and $611,700,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $145,300,000 in Restricted Funds
and $581,000,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support Medicaid state directed payments.
(25) Dental Services Reimbursement Rebasing Efforts: The General Assembly recognizes the importance
of oral health in ensuring an individual’s overall wellbeing and the need to address current reimbursement rates for
dental services in the Kentucky Medicaid Program. Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2), included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $8,000,000 in each fiscal year and included in the above Federal Funds
appropriation is $31,600,000 in each fiscal year to support an increase in reimbursement rates for dental services
provided to Medicaid eligible individuals. The Technical Advisory Committee on Dental Care, authorized pursuant to
KRS 205.590(1)(c), shall provide recommendations to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services regarding the
dental procedures to be given priority for increased Medicaid reimbursement rates.
(26) Hospital-Based Ventilator Dependent Facilities: Included in the above appropriations is an additional
$2,700,000 in General Fund and $6,300,000 in Federal Funds in each fiscal year to support an increase in the all-
inclusive daily payment rate for hospital-based ventilator dependent facilities that operate a distinct part ventilator
unit with more than 100 beds and a dedicated pediatric unit with 12 or more beds. It is the intent of the 2026 General
Assembly that these funds be used to increase the all-inclusive daily payment rate from $982 to $1,220, effective
January 1, 2026. Reimbursement for drugs shall be established pursuant to 907 KAR Chapter 23 and shall not be
included in calculation of the all-inclusive daily payment rate. The Department for Medicaid Services shall amend
907 KAR 1:025(6) and seek any necessary federal approval to implement this rate increase.
(27) Medicaid Cost Settlements: Included in the above appropriations is an additional $28,700,000 in
Restricted Funds and $86,000,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2025-2026 to support Medicaid cost settlements
related to the Department for Community Based Services and the Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental
and Intellectual Disabilities within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
(28) Medicaid DSH Payments: Included in the above appropriations is an additional $6,000,000 in
Restricted Funds and $14,000,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2025-2026, $3,000,000 in Restricted Funds and
$4,000,000 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027, and $3,000,000 in Restricted Funds and $4,000,000 in Federal
Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support Medicaid DSH payments related to the Department for Behavioral Health,
Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities within the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.
TOTAL - MEDICAID SERVICES
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund -0- 3,092,154,500 3,088,903,500
Restricted Funds 167,183,800 2,356,942,300 2,284,192,100
Federal Funds 405,900,000 18,518,757,300 18,477,701,500
TOTAL 573,083,800 23,967,854,100 23,850,797,100
3. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH, DEVELOPMENTAL AND INTELLECTUAL
DISABILITIES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 1,152,500 1,065,100
General Fund 191,048,300 189,372,200
Restricted Funds 268,266,000 269,350,900
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

40 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Federal Funds 98,751,200 98,921,400
TOTAL 559,218,000 558,709,600
(1) Disproportionate Share Hospital Funds: Pursuant to KRS 205.640(3)(a)2., mental health
disproportionate share funds are budgeted at the maximum amounts permitted by Section 1923(h) of the Social
Security Act. Upon publication in the Federal Register of the Annual Institutions for Mental Disease (IMD)
Disproportionate Share Hospital (DSH) limit, 92.3 percent of the federal IMD DSH limit goes to the state-operated
mental hospitals. If there are remaining funds within the psychiatric pool after all private psychiatric hospitals reach
their hospital-specific DSH limit, state mental hospitals may exceed the 92.3 percent limit but may not exceed their
hospital-specific DSH limit.
(2) Lease Payments for Eastern State Hospital: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$9,807,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $9,808,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to make lease payments to the
Lexington-Fayette Urban County Government to retire its debt for the construction of the new facility.
(3) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$1,152,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,065,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for substance abuse prevention and
treatment for pregnant women with a history of substance abuse problems.
(4) Substance Abuse Funding Report: The Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and
Intellectual Disabilities shall compile for each fiscal year a report on the funding received by the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services to provide substance abuse prevention, treatment, and recovery services in the Commonwealth.
The report shall include the amount, source, and duration of the funding, the purpose of the funding, the number of
individuals served, and any available information on outcomes demonstrated as a result of the funding provided for
substance abuse prevention, treatment, and recovery services. The report shall be submitted to the Legislative
Research Commission, Office of Budget Review, by September 1 of each fiscal year.
(5) The Healing Place: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,440,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,395,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support direct services to clients provided by The Healing
Place.
(6) Residential Facilities Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $20,000,000 in
each fiscal year to support increased costs related to staffing and an increased patient census in state run psychiatric
and ICF/ID facilities.
(7) Lee Specialty Clinic: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $720,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $697,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support specialty medical services for individuals with moderate
developmental and intellectual disabilities living in residential and community settings.
(8) Barren River Area Development District: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended funds
authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, (187) to establish a regional substance use disorder services pilot
program shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
4. PUBLIC HEALTH
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 9,379,700 8,668,100
General Fund 84,190,200 83,154,700
Restricted Funds 148,707,500 152,411,600
Federal Funds 510,150,900 499,317,300
TOTAL 752,428,300 743,551,700
(1) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$5,301,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,899,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Health Access Nurturing
Development Services (HANDS) Program, $620,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $573,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028
for the Healthy Start Initiatives, $620,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $573,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Early
Childhood Mental Health, $620,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 for Early Childhood Oral Health, $443,300 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $983,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Lung Cancer Screening Program, and $1,773,100 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,638,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Smoking Cessation. Included in the above
Restricted Funds appropriation is $573,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 from interest income from the Kentucky
Healthcare Improvement Fund for Early Childhood Oral Health.

CHAPTER 168 41
(2) Local and District Health Department Fees: Notwithstanding KRS 211.170 and 211.186, local and
district health departments shall retain 90 percent of the fees collected for delivering foundational public health
program services to fund the costs of operations, services, and the employer contributions for the Kentucky
Employees Retirement System.
(3) Kentucky Pediatric Cancer Research Trust Fund: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $5,000,000 in each fiscal year to the Kentucky Pediatric Cancer Research Trust Fund for general pediatric cancer
research and support of expansion of clinical trials at the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville.
(4) Lung Cancer Screening MCO: Each Medicaid Managed Care Organization that has a participating
contract with the Commonwealth for the next contract renewal cycle shall provide services for lung cancer
screenings, which may include genetic prescreen testing.
(5) Area Health Education Centers: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $2,400,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,325,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the operations of the Commonwealth’s
eight regional Area Health Education Centers.
(6) Rural Health Transformation Fund: Included in the above Federal Funds appropriation is
$212,905,600 in each fiscal year from the Rural Health Transformation Fund. The Cabinet for Health and Family
Services shall prepare a report, including but not limited to expenditures from the Rural Health Transformation Fund,
a description of the activities and methods being implemented within each identified area of focus, a list delineating
subrecipients of grant funds, and any entities being contracted to perform services. The Cabinet shall submit this
report on a quarterly basis to the Medicaid Oversight and Advisory Board beginning November 1, 2026.
(7) Kentucky Poison Control Center: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,000,000 in
each fiscal year to support the Kentucky Poison Control Center.
(8) Kentucky Colon Cancer Screening Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$480,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $465,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Kentucky Colon Cancer
Screening Program.
(9) Vital Statistics: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $1,640,800 in each fiscal year
to support increased operating costs within the Office of Vital Statistics.
(10) Drug and Supplement Testing: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $2,000,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,750,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support mandated medical marijuana and edible
analysis and testing.
(11) Ryan White Program: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,000,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $6,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support participation growth in the Ryan White Program
and to address increased medication costs.
5. FAMILY RESOURCE CENTERS AND VOLUNTEER SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 26,617,200 26,660,700
Federal Funds 12,568,000 12,577,800
TOTAL 39,185,200 39,238,500
(1) Family Resource and Youth Services Centers Funds: No more than two percent of the total funds
transferred from the Department of Education to the Family Resource and Youth Services Centers, as consistent with
KRS 156.496, shall be used for administrative purposes in each fiscal year.
6. COMMUNITY BASED SERVICES
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 10,195,200 9,421,900
General Fund 746,196,400 751,284,800
Restricted Funds 187,229,700 182,967,400
Federal Funds 935,267,400 922,672,800
TOTAL 1,878,888,700 1,866,346,900
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

42 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) Tobacco Settlement Funds: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$8,422,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,783,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Early Childhood Development
Program and $1,773,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,638,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Early Childhood
Adoption and Foster Care Supports Program.
(2) Fostering Success: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $480,000 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $465,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Fostering Success Program.
(3) Dually Licensed Pediatric Facilities: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $528,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $511,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide supplemental payments to dually licensed
pediatric facilities for emergency shelter services for children.
(4) Child Care Assistance Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $10,176,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $9,858,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to provide services to families at or below 160 percent
of the federal poverty level as determined annually by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. The
Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue no later than November 1, 2026, detailing payment timelines to child care providers participating in the
Child Care Assistance Program. The report shall include, but not be limited to the average number of calendar days
between the receipt of a completed claim and the issuance of payment to the provider; the total number of claims
where payment was beyond 30 days from the date of submission; and a detailed justification for any claims
exceeding the 30-day threshold, categorized by administrative, technical, or investigative delays.
(5) Personal Care Homes: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $12,000,000 in each fiscal
year to support reimbursements provided to personal care homes.
(6) Children's Services Contractors: Notwithstanding KRS Chapter 45A, no contracts awarded for the
use and benefit of the Department for Community Based Services shall interfere with the contractor’s freedom of
religion as set forth in KRS 446.350. Any such contracts shall contain a provision allowing a contractor to allow a
substitute contractor who is also licensed or approved by the Cabinet to deliver the contracted services if the
contractor cannot perform a contracted service because of sincerely held religious beliefs as outlined in KRS 446.350.
(7) Victims Advocacy Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $10,557,700 in
each fiscal year for the Children's Advocacy Centers, $13,912,700 in each fiscal year for the Domestic Violence
Shelters, and $7,776,100 in each fiscal year for the Rape Crisis Centers to support operational costs.
(8) Employee Child Care Assistance Partnership: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$1,000,000 in each fiscal year to support the Employee Child Care Assistance Partnership for matching contributions.
There shall be a two percent cap on administrative costs for the oversight of this program. Notwithstanding KRS
45.229, any General Fund amounts appropriated for matching contributions in fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year
2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(9) Volunteers of America - Family Recovery Court: Included in the above General Fund appropriation
is $480,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $465,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the operations of the
Volunteers of America - Family Recovery Court.
(10) Family Scholar House: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $960,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $930,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the operations of the Family Scholar House.
(11) Maryhurst: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,350,000 in each fiscal year to
provide a reimbursement rate increase for children in the 5 Specialized Programs.
(12) Foster Care Independent Living: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,920,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,860,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for independent living supports to children aging out
of the foster care system.
(13) Child Care Assistance Program (CCAP) Initiatives: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $18,680,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $18,065,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the CCAP
initiative.
The appropriations shall be allocated to the individual programs as follows:
(a) $17,240,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $16,670,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support an income
exclusion from eligibility determinations for child care providers; and
(b) $1,440,000 in General Fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,395,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to
support a six-month transition for families no longer eligible for CCAP benefits.

CHAPTER 168 43
(14) Early Childhood Development Scholarship Program: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $2,400,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,325,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Early
Childhood Development Scholarship Program.
(15) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) Administration: Included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $43,500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $58,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to
support the increased state share of SNAP administrative cost responsibility from 50 percent to 75 percent, as
required by H.R. 1 of the 119th Congress.
(16) Adoption Records: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and carry
out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 43.
(17) Child Care Benefits: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and carry
out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 84.
(18) Relative and Fictive Kin Caregivers: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $6,000,000
in each fiscal year**[ to provide sufficient funding for the maintenance of effort necessary to maximize available
federal funds to implement the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 85]**. Federal funds shall include but are not limited
to funds available through foster care maintenance payments in Title IV-E of the Social Security Act and the
Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant under Title IV-A of the Social Security Act.
Pursuant to KRS 620.142(4), the custodial, permanency, and service options provided to relative and fictive
caregivers shall reflect nationally recognized best practices. The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall include
Title IV-E compliant provisional licensing for relatives and fictive kin through revised administrative regulation (922
KAR) in order to maximize federal funding available for relative or fictive kin foster parent payments. Such
provisional licensing shall include provisional approval within five days of placement, immediate satisfaction of all
federal safety requirements, a 120-day window to complete non-safety requirements (training, home study), and a
provisional approval process to qualify these homes for Title IV-E foster care maintenance payment purposes.
Pursuant to KRS 620.142(3), within 120 days of receiving temporary custody of a child or upon the
occurrence of a verifiable qualifying event, a relative or fictive kin caregiver may submit a request to the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services for the purpose of pursuing a change in custody of the child in his or her care. Upon
preliminary approval of the request, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services may request that the court place the
child in the custody of the Cabinet for the purpose of allowing the relative or fictive kin caregiver to pursue approval
as a relative or fictive kin foster parent. Upon placement of the child in the custody of the Cabinet, the relative or
fictive kin caregiver shall pursue foster parent approval.
For purposes of KRS 620.142(3), a "qualifying event" shall include the death or incapacitation of a caregiver;
loss of income due to disability; early or unplanned retirement due to a documented hardship, including medical
necessity or employer-mandated separation, resulting in a substantial loss of income; loss of a home or employment
due to a natural disaster or fire; a change in household structure due to divorce or legal separation; or a significant
change in the child's medical or behavioral health needs requiring substantial caregiver involvement.
Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to relieve a child’s biological or legal parents of their continuing
statutory and legal duty to support and provide for the child. For any child involved in a juvenile court proceeding
who is in state custody or placed by the Cabinet in an out-of-home setting, including but not limited to placement
with fictive kin or relatives, the Cabinet shall immediately initiate proceedings to establish a child support order in
favor of the Commonwealth and shall take all necessary steps to enforce such order for the duration of the child’s
placement or state custody.
The Cabinet shall coordinate, as appropriate, with the state agency responsible for child support enforcement
to ensure timely establishment, modification, and enforcement of support obligations. Any support collected by the
state shall be applied in accordance with state law for the benefit of the child.
Efforts to establish or enforce child support shall not delay permanency planning or placement decisions made
in the best interests of the child.
(19) Dependency, Neglect, or Abuse of a Child: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding
to implement and carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 133 and 144.
(20) Truancy: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and carry out the
provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 163.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

44 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(21) Out of Home Care: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $22,000,000 in each fiscal
year from the Out of Home Care Replacement Fund to maintain existing support for foster care and kinship care
programs to enhance specialized services for children with exceptional needs to assist in identifying and securing
supportive placements. The Department of Community Based Services shall utilize federal funds from the Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families block grant**[ to the fullest extent possible]** and shall expend any additional
available reserves before expending the Restricted Funds from the Out of Home Care Replacement Fund. The
Department shall submit a quarterly report detailing the expenditures and fund sources for all out of home care
services beginning November 1, 2026, to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(22) Kentucky United Methodist Children’s Homes: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$102,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to reimburse the Kentucky United Methodist Children’s Homes Independent
Living Program for providing therapeutic services to youth in state custody.
(23) Sunrise Children’s Services: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $2,200 in fiscal year
2026-2027 to reimburse the Sunrise Children’s Services Independent Living Program for providing therapeutic
services to youth in state custody.
(24) Youth Villages Intercept Program: Included in the above appropriations is $6,378,600 in General
Fund and $6,396,400 in Federal Funds in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,792,300 in General Fund and $8,997,700 in
Federal Funds in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Youth Villages Intercept Program.
7. AGING AND INDEPENDENT LIVING
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 49,046,900 47,865,500
Restricted Funds 4,069,800 4,030,300
Federal Funds 38,575,700 38,625,600
TOTAL 91,692,400 90,521,400
(1) Local Match Requirements: Notwithstanding KRS 205.460, entities contracting with the Cabinet for
Health and Family Services to provide essential services under KRS 205.455 and 205.460 shall provide local match
equal to or greater than the amount in effect during fiscal year 2025-2026. Local match may include any combination
of materials, commodities, transportation, office space, personal services, or other types of facility services or funds.
The Secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall prescribe the procedures to certify the local match
compliance.
(2) Hart-Supported Living Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $6,288,100 in
each fiscal year to support the Hart-Supported Living Program.
TOTAL - HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 20,727,400 19,155,100
General Fund -0- 4,197,369,500 4,195,099,000
Restricted Funds 167,183,800 3,045,872,300 2,972,156,500
Federal Funds 405,900,000 20,182,670,500 20,118,827,100
TOTAL 573,083,800 27,446,639,700 27,305,237,700
H. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
Budget Units
1. JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 2,881,200 2,662,700
General Fund 44,784,200 45,448,000
Restricted Funds 3,241,300 2,998,900
Federal Funds 34,895,200 34,883,700

CHAPTER 168 45
TOTAL 85,801,900 85,993,300
(1) Operation UNITE: (a) Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,440,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $1,395,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Operation UNITE Program.
(b) For the periods ending June 30, 2026, and June 30, 2027, the Secretary of the Justice and Public Safety
Cabinet, in coordination with the Chief Executive Officer of Operation UNITE, shall prepare reports detailing for
what purpose and function the funds were utilized. The reports shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue by September 1 of each fiscal year.
(2) Office of Drug Control Policy: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$2,659,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,457,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Office of Drug Control Policy.
(3) Court-Appointed Special Advocate Funding: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$3,000,000 in each fiscal year for grants to support Court-Appointed Special Advocate (CASA) funding programs.
No administrative costs shall be paid from this appropriation.
(4) Restorative Justice: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $221,600 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $204,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Restorative Justice Program administered by
the Volunteers of America.
(5) Northern Kentucky Regional Medical Examiner's Office: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any
unexpended funds from the $1,800,000 authorized in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part I, H., 1., (11) to reestablish the
Northern Kentucky Regional Medical Examiners Office shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(6) Substance Abuse Treatment Programs: The Secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall
compile for each fiscal year a report on funding received by the Cabinet to provide substance abuse treatment,
prevention, and recovery programs in the Commonwealth. The report shall include the amount, source, and duration
of the funding, the purpose of the funding, the number of individuals served, and any available information on
program outcomes. The Secretary shall submit the report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue by September 1 of each year.
(7) Rocket Docket Program: Notwithstanding KRS 196.288(5)(b)8., included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $1,940,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,860,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028, which shall be
allocated annually in quarterly payments, to support the Rocket Docket Program at the Prosecutors Advisory Council.
(8) Northern Kentucky Medical Examiner's Office: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$1,618,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the staffing of the Northern Kentucky Medical Examiner's Office.
2. CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 140,458,200 129,117,900
(1) Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $136,842,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $141,362,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Kentucky
Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund.
(2) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1) and 15.420(2)(a)1.a., included in the
above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
each full-time participant for training incentive payments, and $2,327 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,373 in fiscal
year 2027-2028 for each part-time participant for training incentive payments. KRS 15.460(1)(b) to (f) shall remain
applicable, except that the administrative expense reimbursement cap under KRS 15.460(1)(c)3. shall not exceed
$1,000,000.
(3) Administrative Reimbursement: Notwithstanding KRS 15.450(3), the Department of Criminal Justice
Training shall not receive reimbursement for the salaries and other costs of administering the fund, to include the
Kentucky Law Enforcement Council operations and expenses, Peace Officers Professional Standards Office, attorney
positions in Justice Administration, the Professional Development and Wellness Branch, Office of the State School
Security Marshal, Office of Kentucky Law Enforcement Council Support, debt service, capital outlay, and
Department personnel costs and expenses in excess of $42,551,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $43,000,700 in
fiscal year 2027-2028. The Department shall submit a report detailing reimbursed expenditures for the prior fiscal
year to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by August 1 of each fiscal year.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

46 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(4) Criminal Justice Council: Pursuant to KRS 15.410 to 15.518, the Department of Criminal Justice
Training shall not transfer funds from the Kentucky Law Enforcement Foundation Program Fund to support the
Criminal Justice Council.
(5) Kentucky Law Enforcement Council Funding: Notwithstanding KRS 15.450 and any other statute to
the contrary, funding to support the operations of the Kentucky Law Enforcement Council shall not exceed $622,900
in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $603,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028.
(6) Operating Cost Increases: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $864,100 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $764,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support various operating cost increases.
(7) Additional Staff: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $106,100 in fiscal year 2026-
2027 and $110,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for additional staff.
(8) Middletown Firing Range: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $15,000,000 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to be paid to the city of Middletown to construct a
firing range for statewide law enforcement training use.
(9) Louisville Driving Track: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $5,000,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 to be paid to the city of Louisville to construct a driving track for statewide law enforcement training
use.
3. JUVENILE JUSTICE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 173,572,500 182,026,800
Restricted Funds 13,731,900 13,892,100
Federal Funds 10,951,700 10,951,700
TOTAL 198,256,100 206,870,600
(1) Evidence-Based Programming: The Department of Juvenile Justice shall prepare a report detailing
expenditures for evidence-based programming provided by the Department, as well as the number of youth served by
each program, the number of filled positions providing services and the number of program vacancies, the number of
youth on waitlists for services, and any other key performance indicators deemed appropriate by the Department. The
Department of Juvenile Justice shall submit this report on a quarterly basis to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue and the Juvenile Justice Oversight Council beginning November 1, 2026.
(2) Louisville Detention Center Renovation: The Department of Juvenile Justice shall submit a report to
the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by September 1, 2026, detailing the status, progress, and
current expenditures of the Renovate Louisville Detention Center project authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part
II, H., 3., 002.
(3) Juvenile High-Acuity Mental Health Treatment Services: (a) Notwithstanding any statute to the
contrary, The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, in coordination with the Department of Juvenile Justice, shall, no
later than July 1, 2026, issue a Request for Information to solicit input and assess feasibility regarding the planning,
development, and delivery of high-acuity mental health treatment services for juveniles, including the potential
construction of a treatment facility. In reviewing responses, the Cabinet shall consider only healthcare providers that
qualify for enhanced Medicaid reimbursement, including those eligible for a prospective payment system rate, an all-
inclusive rate, or an equivalent reimbursement methodology.
(b) The Request for Information shall require submissions to address, at a minimum, the following:
evidence-based practices for high acuity behavioral health services; demonstrated expertise and operational capacity;
cost-effectiveness and long-term sustainability; the proposed service delivery model; partnership structure and
accountability measures; and plans for data collection, performance metrics, and outcome evaluation.
(c) The Cabinet shall submit a report by November 1, 2026, to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue, including a summary of all responses to the Request for Information, an overview of
the evaluation process, and any resulting findings or recommendations. It is the intent of the General Assembly to
authorize the use of funds from the Budget Reserve Trust Fund if the Request for Information results in a viable
project, including a defined cost estimate and a feasible timeline for the implementation of the project for the delivery
of services.

CHAPTER 168 47
(4) Jefferson Detention Facilities' Personnel and Operating: Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $6,515,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $12,019,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the
Jefferson Regional Detention Center in Lyndon and the Jefferson County Youth Detention Center in downtown
Louisville.
(5) Design-Build Project Delivery Method: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the design-build
project delivery method, as defined in KRS 45A.030(13), may be used to maximize cost savings for projects
authorized in Part II, H., 3., 001. of this Act.
4. STATE POLICE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 244,138,500 250,930,200
Restricted Funds 35,475,300 34,828,700
Federal Funds 23,274,500 23,216,300
Road Fund 55,582,600 57,940,100
TOTAL 358,470,900 366,915,300
(1) Call to Extraordinary Duty: There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Kentucky State Police, subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act, funds which are required as a
result of the Governor's call of the Kentucky State Police to extraordinary duty when an emergency situation has been
declared to exist by the Governor. Funding is authorized to be provided from the General Fund Surplus Account
(KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705).
(2) Restricted Funds Uses: Notwithstanding KRS 24A.179, 42.320(2)(h), 65.7631, 189A.050(3)(a),
237.110(18), and 281A.160(2)(b), funds are included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation to maintain the
operations and administration of the Department of Kentucky State Police.
(3) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
(4) Support for Statewide Law Enforcement Purposes: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $1,036,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 for the acquisition of mobile data terminals and docking
stations. Notwithstanding 2017 Ky. Acts ch. 130, excess proceeds from the sale of state-owned real property and
improvements in Owensboro, Kentucky operated by the Department of Juvenile Justice shall be transferred to the
Department of Kentucky State Police for this purpose. Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any portion of these funds that
have not been expended by the end of fiscal year 2026-2027 shall not lapse and shall carry forward into fiscal year
2027-2028.
(5) Capitol Campus Security Personnel: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $125,600
in each fiscal year to support two Trooper R contracts designated specifically for the Capitol campus.
(6) Background Check Fees: Pursuant to KRS 7.111, 7.112, and 11.160(1)(e), the Department of
Kentucky State Police shall not charge a fee for the cost of background checks requested by the Legislative Research
Commission during investigation processes related to confirmations of appointments or reappointments to boards and
commissions and administrative law judges.
(7) Statutory Salary Schedule Adjustments: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$3,802,000 in General Fund and $1,817,900 in Road Fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,430,500 in General Fund
and $3,728,400 in Road Fund in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the statutory adjustment to the salary schedule
based on the consumer price index for troopers and commercial vehicle enforcement officers.
(8) Kentucky Emergency Warning System Leases: The Department of Kentucky State Police shall
prepare a report detailing by county, including but not limited to the number of leases contracted, the cost of each
lease, and the number of leases yet to be contracted. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall submit this
report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on a quarterly basis beginning November 1,
2026.
(9) Fleet Vehicles: The Department of Kentucky State Police shall prepare a report detailing fleet vehicle
purchases, including but not limited to total expenditures, price per vehicle, the timing of purchases, the distribution
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

48 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
of new vehicles purchased, as well as the assigned use for each vehicle purchased. The Department of Kentucky State
Police shall submit this report on a quarterly basis to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
beginning November 1, 2026.
(10) Recruitment and Retention Reporting: The Department of Kentucky State Police shall prepare a
report detailing recruitment, retention, and demographic statistics, including but not limited to age, gender, race,
education-level, and geography, for trooper cadet classes occurring in fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-
2028. The Department of Kentucky State Police shall submit this report on a quarterly basis to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue beginning November 1, 2026.
(11) Sworn Trooper Detail: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, beginning with fiscal year 2025-
2026, no more than 25 percent of sworn troopers and officers, excluding those positions established in KRS 16.187
and 16.196, shall be assigned to detail other than a post.
(12) Land Acquisition Authorization: Notwithstanding KRS 56.040, the Department of Kentucky State
Police may directly acquire, on behalf of the Commonwealth, any land required for tower sites related to the
Kentucky Emergency Warning System or the Emergency Radio System Replacement project authorized in 2024 Ky.
Acts ch. 175, Part II, H., 4., 007.
(13) Northern and Central Kentucky Crime Labs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$609,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $770,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the relocation of the Northern
Kentucky Crime Lab, as well as four forensic biologist positions at the Central Kentucky Crime Lab in fiscal year
2026-2027 and two forensic biologist positions at the Northern Kentucky Crime Lab in fiscal year 2027-2028.
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, qualified retirees may be recruited and given due consideration in filling
these positions.
(14) Compensatory Time and Overtime: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $5,500,000
in each fiscal year to support the conversion of compensatory time to paid overtime for nonexempt sworn personnel.
Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, all overtime work must be authorized by a supervisor in advance, not to
exceed 100 hours annually, and any nonexempt employee who works overtime without prior authorization will be
paid for all hours worked in accordance with federal and state law but may be subject to disciplinary action.
(15) Driver Testing Offices: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $1,302,900 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $1,570,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support staffing and operations for driver testing at three
existing regional driver's licensing offices.
5. CORRECTIONS
a. Corrections Management
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 19,043,300 19,130,000
Restricted Funds 399,400 149,000
Federal Funds 100,000 304,300
TOTAL 19,542,700 19,583,300
(1) Local Correctional Facilities: Notwithstanding KRS 441.420, no funds are provided for
reimbursement to counties for design fees for architectural and engineering services associated with any new local
correctional facility approved by the Kentucky Local Correctional Facilities Construction Authority.
(2) Facility Reporting: (a) The Department of Corrections shall continuously monitor its bed utilization
of county jails, halfway houses, Recovery Kentucky drug treatment centers, and all other community correctional
residential facilities that are under contract with the Department. This monitoring shall include periodic review of its
classification system to ensure that all offenders are placed in the least restrictive housing that provides appropriate
security to protect public safety and provide ample opportunity for treatment and successful reentry.
(b) On a monthly basis, the Department shall submit a report detailing the average occupancy rate for each
of these facility types outlined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, as well as a projection of bed utilization one year
from the reported period, to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
(3) Operational Costs for Inmate Population and Excess Local Jail Per Diem Costs: In the event that
actual operational costs and/or actual local jail per diem payments exceed the amounts appropriated to support the
budgeted average daily population of state felons for each fiscal year, the additional payments, up to $10,000,000 in

CHAPTER 168 49
each fiscal year, shall be deemed necessary government expenses and shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus
Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to notification as to
necessity and amount by the State Budget Director who shall report any certified expenditure to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
b. Adult Correctional Institutions
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 482,932,900 494,692,100
Restricted Funds 22,069,100 21,373,800
Federal Funds 30,000 95,600
TOTAL 505,032,000 516,161,500
(1) Transfer to State Institutions: Notwithstanding KRS 532.100(8), state prisoners, excluding the Class
C and Class D felons qualifying to serve time in county jails, may be transferred to a state institution within 90 days
of final sentencing, if the county jail does not object to the additional 45 days.
(2) Little Sandy Correctional Complex: The Department of Corrections shall prepare a report, including
but not limited to the expenditures related to the expansion, the number of full-time positions filled and vacant, the
number of offenders housed, and the number of offenders transferred from other facilities by facility. The Department
of Corrections shall submit this report on a quarterly basis to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue beginning November 1, 2026.
(3) Institutional Support: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $4,000,000 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $9,000,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support increased medical costs.
c. Community Services and Local Facilities
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 250,628,300 254,327,800
Restricted Funds 16,173,000 15,094,000
Federal Funds 874,200 874,200
TOTAL 267,675,500 270,296,000
(1) Local Jails Funding: Notwithstanding KRS 441.605 to 441.695, funds in the amount of $8,847,300 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,742,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 shall be expended from the Kentucky Local
Correctional Facilities Construction Authority for local correctional facility and operational support.
(2) Participation in Transparent Governing - Full Disclosure of Inmate Population Forecasts and
Related Materials: The Office of State Budget Director shall provide the methodology, assumptions, data, and all
other related materials used to project biennial offender population forecasts conducted by the Office of State Budget
Director, the Kentucky Department of Corrections, and any consulting firms, to the Interim Joint Committee on
Appropriations and Revenue by October 1, 2027. This submission shall include but not be limited to the projected
state, county, and community offender populations for the 2028-2030 fiscal biennium and must coincide with the
budgeted amount for these populations. This submission shall clearly divulge the methodology and reasoning behind
the budgeted and projected offender population in a commitment to participate in transparent governing.
(3) Program Completion and Sentence Credit Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 197.045(6), payments
for program completions resulting in sentencing credit shall not expire and shall continue through the 2026-2028
fiscal biennium. Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $13,500,000 in each fiscal year to support
payments for program completions resulting in sentencing credit as prescribed in KRS 197.045(6)(a), (b), and (c).
The Department of Corrections shall prepare a report annually, including but not limited to the number of program
completions, the cost of payments for each category of sentencing credit, and the programmatic impact on recidivism.
The Department of Corrections shall submit this report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and
Revenue by October 1 of each year.
(4) Substance Abuse, Mental Health, and Reentry Service Centers: (a) Notwithstanding any statute
to the contrary, for each fiscal year, the Department of Corrections shall pay each contracted provider of substance
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

50 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
abuse, mental health, and reentry centers a minimum of 65 percent of the contracted beds monthly. Any contracted
but unfilled beds as of the effective date of this Act may, at the discretion of the provider, be terminated.
(b) Each contracted provider, as provided for in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall report 100 percent of
their occupancy to the Department of Corrections. The report shall detail the total number of beds, the number of
beds available, and the type of individual occupying bed space, and shall be submitted in a method and at a frequency
established by the Department's discretion.
d. Local Jail Support
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 16,788,600 16,788,600
(1) Local Corrections Assistance Fund Allocation: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$4,630,200 in each fiscal year to be distributed to counties pursuant to the provisions of House Bill 757 of the 2026
Regular Session.
(2) Life Safety or Closed Jails: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $860,000 in each
fiscal year to provide a monthly payment of an annual amount of $20,000 to each county with a life safety jail or
closed jail. The payment shall be in addition to the payment required by KRS 441.206(2).
(3) Inmate Medical Care Expenses: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $792,800 in
each fiscal year for medical care contracts to be distributed, upon approval of the Department of Corrections, to
counties by the formula codified in KRS 441.206, and $851,800 in each fiscal year, on a partial reimbursement basis,
for medical claims in excess of the statutory threshold pursuant to KRS 441.045. The funding support for medical
contracts and catastrophic medical expenses for indigents shall be maintained in discrete accounts. Any medical
claim that exceeds the statutory threshold may be reimbursed for that amount in excess of the statutory threshold.
TOTAL - CORRECTIONS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 769,393,100 784,938,500
Restricted Funds 38,641,500 36,616,800
Federal Funds 1,004,200 1,274,100
TOTAL 809,038,800 822,829,400
6. PUBLIC ADVOCACY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 96,695,100 96,571,700
Restricted Funds 4,368,100 4,282,800
Federal Funds 2,312,300 2,350,700
TOTAL 103,375,500 103,205,200
(1) Attorney Compensation: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $3,610,600 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $5,404,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support an annual salary increase for attorneys with a
caseload in the Department of Public Advocacy who are reclassified pursuant to the provisions of House Bill 762 of
the 2026 Regular Session.
(2) Technology Needs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $800,000 in each fiscal year
to support service fees and contracts for various software and technology supports.
TOTAL - JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 2,881,200 2,662,700
General Fund 1,328,583,400 1,359,915,200
Restricted Funds 235,916,300 221,737,200
Federal Funds 72,437,900 72,676,500

CHAPTER 168 51
Road Fund 55,582,600 57,940,100
TOTAL 1,695,401,400 1,714,931,700
J. PERSONNEL CABINET
Budget Units
1. GENERAL OPERATIONS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 32,390,400 31,962,300
(1) Public Employee Health Insurance Trust Fund Actuarial Projections: The Department of
Employee Insurance shall prepare a report that includes actuarial projections of the operating net gain or loss,
recommended reserves, and remaining balance after reserves, by plan year, for all active plan years and a minimum
of two upcoming plan years for the Public Employee Health Insurance Trust Fund, as of September 30 of each fiscal
year. This report shall be submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by December 1 of
each year.
(2) Monthly Reporting Requirement: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the Personnel Cabinet
shall, on a monthly basis, and no later than 45 days after the last working day of each month, submit to the
Legislative Research Commission and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue data and reports
related to the operation and performance of the Kentucky Employees' Health Plan. The monthly submission shall
include, at a minimum:
(a) Claims and Enrollment Report, including:
1. A breakdown of all plan enrollments;
2. Medical claims lag;
3. Prescription claims lag;
4. Medical claims on a paid basis; and
5. Prescription claims on a paid basis;
(b) A trust fund cash transactions listing;
(c) A trust fund summary report; and
(d) Any other data or reports necessary to monitor the operation and performance of the Kentucky
Employees' Health Plan.
(3) State Health Plan Actuarial Reporting: The Personnel Cabinet shall, on or before May 1, 2026,
provide to the General Assembly actuarial reports, studies, and recommendations related to the development and
implementation of benefits, enrollment rules, and premium rates for Plan Years 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, and
2028.
The cabinet shall also provide documentation of changes in expected claim costs resulting from benefit
changes implemented or projected for Plan Years 2026, 2027, and 2028, including the actuarial basis and
methodology used for such projections.
In addition, the cabinet shall provide documentation of actuarially projected income and expenses for Plan
Years 2026, 2027, and 2028, including the actuarial basis and methodology used for such projections. Such
documentation shall include, at a minimum, prior plan experience and the source of that experience, adjustments
attributable to plan or rate changes, claim reserve details, the inflationary trend utilized, and the rationale supporting
the selected inflationary trend.
All reports and documentation required by this subsection shall also be posted on the Personnel Cabinet’s
website in a publicly accessible location.
2. PUBLIC EMPLOYEES DEFERRED COMPENSATION AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 8,112,800 7,928,800
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

52 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
3. WORKERS' COMPENSATION BENEFITS AND RESERVE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 23,618,700 23,061,000
4. FIXED ALLOCATION NON-HAZARDOUS PENSION FUND
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 63,858,000 63,858,000
(1) Quasi-State Agency Subsidy Distributions: (a) Included in the above General Fund
appropriation is $332,100 in each fiscal year to maintain each Non-P1 state agency's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline
subsidy.
(b) Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $18,882,100 in each fiscal year to maintain each
Regional Mental Health Unit's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline subsidy.
(c) Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $25,151,300 in each fiscal year to maintain each
health department's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline subsidy.
(d) The distribution of the baseline subsidy to each employer classification identified in paragraphs (a), (b),
and (c) of this subsection shall be distributed in the following manner: In July and January of each year, the Office of
State Budget Director shall obtain the total creditable compensation reported by each employer to the Kentucky
Public Pensions Authority and utilize that number to determine how much of each total appropriation shall be
distributed to each employer within its own unique employer classification. Payments to each employer shall be made
on September 1 and April 1 of each fiscal year. The Office of State Budget Director shall provide a report to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by May 1 of each fiscal year. The report shall detail the
disbursement of funds in this subsection and include the creditable compensation, by employer, for which
disbursements are made.
(e) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991(6)(b), included in the above General Fund appropriation is $19,492,500
in each fiscal year to support each employer's share of the anticipated retirement costs over each employer's fiscal
year 2019-2020 baseline contribution as adjusted and posted under the 2026 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative
Research Commission's website.
TOTAL - PERSONNEL CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 63,858,000 63,858,000
Restricted Funds 64,121,900 62,952,100
TOTAL 127,979,900 126,810,100
K. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
Budget Units
1. COUNCIL ON POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 6,165,900 5,745,500
General Fund 14,217,900 17,696,700
Restricted Funds 11,709,700 9,025,900
Federal Funds 6,128,800 6,190,100
TOTAL 38,222,300 38,658,200
(1) Interest Earnings Transfer from the Strategic Investment and Incentive Trust Fund Accounts:
Notwithstanding KRS 164.7911 to 164.7927, included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $3,077,300 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 from the interest earnings on the Research Challenge and Comprehensive University
Excellence trust funds to support the operations of the Council on Postsecondary Education.
(2) Cancer Research and Screening: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$6,165,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,745,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for cancer research and screening to be

CHAPTER 168 53
shared equally between the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville. Of these amounts, $625,000 in
each fiscal year is from the lapse and reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund appropriations set forth in
Part X of this Act.
(3) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 164.028 to 164.0282, no General Fund is
provided for Professional Education Preparation.
(4) Postsecondary Education Debt: Notwithstanding KRS 45.750 to 45.810, in order to lower the cost of
borrowing, any university that has issued or caused to be issued debt obligations through a not-for-profit corporation
or a municipality or county government for which the rental or use payments of the university substantially meet the
debt service requirements of those debt obligations is authorized to refinance those debt obligations if the principal
amount of the debt obligations is not increased and the rental payments of the university are not increased. Any funds
used by a university to meet debt obligations issued by a university pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to
interception of state-appropriated funds pursuant to KRS 164A.608.
(5) Disposition of Postsecondary Institution Property: Notwithstanding KRS 45.777, a postsecondary
institution’s governing board may elect to sell or dispose of real property or major items of equipment and proceeds
from the sale shall be designated to the funding sources, on a proportionate basis, used for acquisition of the
equipment or property to be sold.
(6) Spinal Cord and Head Injury Research: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$1,920,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,860,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for spinal cord and head injury
research. In accordance with KRS 211.500 to 211.504, the appropriation in each fiscal year shall be shared between
the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville.
(7) Immunity for Postsecondary Institutions: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, a public
postsecondary institution, including any affiliated corporation, its officers, employees, and agents, shall be immune
from all claims, including class action claims for damages, a declaratory judgment, and equitable relief based on an
act or omission if:
(a) The claim arises out of or in connection with tuition paid to the public postsecondary institution for an
academic term that included the months of March, April, and May 2020;
(b) The claim alleges losses or damages arising from an act or omission by the public postsecondary
institution during or in response to the COVID-19 emergency; and
(c) The alleged act or omission of the public postsecondary institution was related to protecting public
health and safety interests in response to the COVID-19 emergency in compliance with federal, state, or local
guidance, including but not limited to:
1. Transition to online or otherwise remote instruction;
2. Pause or modification to instruction available through the institution of higher education;
3. Closure of, or modification to, operation of on-campus facilities of the public postsecondary institution;
or
4. The public postsecondary institution offered online and otherwise remote learning options that allowed
students to complete the coursework in the academic term that included the months of March, April, and May 2020
and receive academic credit.
(8) Ovarian Cancer Screening: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $960,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $930,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Ovarian Cancer Screening Outreach Program at the
University of Kentucky.
(9) Southern Regional Education Board Dues: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$224,800 in each fiscal year for Southern Regional Education Board dues.
2. KENTUCKY HIGHER EDUCATION ASSISTANCE AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 384,709,400 384,529,400
Restricted Funds 62,270,900 62,292,900
Federal Funds 86,000 86,000
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

54 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
TOTAL 447,066,300 446,908,300
(1) College Access Program: The following is appropriated for the College Access Program in each fiscal
year:
(a) Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), $179,344,800 in General Fund;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 164.7891, $1,100,000 in Restricted Funds; and
(c) $450,000 in Restricted Funds from the collection of loans related to the Minority Educator Recruitment
and Retention Scholarship.
(2) Kentucky Tuition Grant Program: Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $45,975,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Tuition Grant Program.
(3) Kentucky National Guard Tuition Award Program: Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), included in
the above General Fund appropriation is $7,398,100 in each fiscal year for the National Guard Tuition Award
Program.
(4) Kentucky Educational Excellence Scholarships (KEES): The following is appropriated for KEES in
each fiscal year:
(a) Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), $93,656,600 in General Fund;
(b) $12,269,100 in Restricted Funds from previous fiscal years' excess Lottery funds; and
(c) $12,300,000 in Restricted Funds from Unclaimed Lottery Prize revenue.
Notwithstanding KRS 164.7874(7)(c) and 164.7879(2)(a), for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, an eligible high
school student shall only be eligible for a Kentucky Educational Excellence Scholarship base award for an academic
year in which the student has attained at least a 2.75 grade point average.
(5) Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program: Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), included in the
above General Fund appropriation is $12,000,500 in each fiscal year for the Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship
Program. It is the intent of the General Assembly for Work Ready Kentucky Scholarships to only be awarded to
recipients that complete eligible courses.
(6) Dual Credit Scholarship Program: (a) Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $21,149,500 in each fiscal year for the Dual Credit Scholarship Program. Included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $6,290,100 in each fiscal year from previous years’ excess Lottery funds
held in trust and agency account for the Dual Credit Scholarship Program.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 164.786(1)(f) and 164.787(2)(d), the dual credit tuition rate ceiling shall be one-
half of the per credit hour tuition amount charged by the Kentucky Community and Technical College System for in-
state students. Notwithstanding KRS 164.786(4)(c), eligible high school students may receive a dual credit
scholarship for two career and technical education dual credit courses per academic year and four general education
dual credit courses over the junior and senior years, up to a maximum of 12 approved dual credit courses.
(7) Veterinary Medicine Contract Spaces: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$5,800,400 in each fiscal year for the Veterinary Medicine Contract Spaces Program. For students receiving an initial
award in fiscal year 2027-2028 or thereafter, as a condition of the contract space support each recipient shall enter
into a written agreement with the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority to practice veterinary medicine in
the Commonwealth of Kentucky for at least one year for each year the contract space is received. If a recipient fails
to complete the required service within the timeframe established by the Authority, the total amount of the contract
space support received shall convert to a loan and shall be repaid to the Commonwealth. For any support converted to
a loan, interest shall be assessed and shall accrue on the principal balance beginning on the date of the first
disbursement. The rate of interest shall be determined by the Authority through the promulgation of administrative
regulations. All repayments, including principal and interest, shall be deposited into a trust and agency account to be
used for future awards. The Authority shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs of collection and attorney fees in
the event of default. Students receiving contract space support prior to fiscal year 2027-2028 shall not be subject to
this service requirement.
(8) Optometry Scholarship Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is $814,500 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $789,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Optometry Scholarship Program. For students
receiving an initial award in fiscal year 2027-2028 or thereafter, as a condition of the scholarship each recipient shall
enter into a written agreement with the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority to practice optometry in the
Commonwealth of Kentucky for at least one year for each year the scholarship is received. If a recipient fails to

CHAPTER 168 55
complete the required service requirement within the timeframe established by the Authority, the scholarship shall be
converted to a loan and be shall repaid to the Commonwealth. For any scholarship converted to a loan, interest shall
be assessed and shall accrue on the principal balance beginning on the date of the first disbursement. The rate of
interest shall be determined by the Authority through the promulgation of administrative regulations. All repayments,
including principal and interest, shall be deposited into a trust and agency account to be used for future awards. The
Authority shall be entitled to recover reasonable costs of collection and attorney fees in the event of default. Students
receiving the scholarship prior to fiscal year 2027-2028 shall not be subject to this service requirement.
(9) Use of Lottery Revenues: Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(3) and (4), lottery revenues in the amount
of $362,200,000 in each fiscal year are appropriated to the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority.
Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4) and any provisions of this Act to the contrary, if lottery receipts received by the
Commonwealth, excluding any unclaimed prize money received under Part III, 20. of this Act, exceed $370,000,000
in fiscal year 2025-2026 or $365,000,000 in each fiscal year of the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium, the additional excess
shall be transferred to a trust and agency account and shall not be expended or appropriated without the express
authority of the General Assembly.
(10) Redistribution of Resources: Notwithstanding KRS 164.740 to 164.764, 164.7890(11)(c),
164.7891(11)(b), and 164.7894, no General Fund is provided for Work Study, Coal County Pharmacy Scholarships,
Osteopathic Medicine Scholarships, and Coal County College Completion Scholarships in order to provide additional
funding to the College Access Program and Kentucky Tuition Grant Program.
(11) Teacher Scholarship Program: Included in the above appropriation is $1,015,000 in Restricted Funds
in each fiscal year for the Teacher Scholarship Program. The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority, in
coordination with the Council on Postsecondary Education, shall submit a report on the number of teacher
scholarships provided in each fiscal year, the program of study in which recipients are enrolled, recipient retention
rates, total number of applications, and the impact of the scholarships on recruitment. This report shall be submitted
to the Interim Joint Committee on Education by September 1 of each fiscal year.
(12) General Administration and Support: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$6,000,000 in each fiscal year to support general administration and support services.
(13) Teacher Recruitment Student Loan Forgiveness Pilot Program: Included in the above General
Fund appropriation is $4,800,000 in each fiscal year for the Teacher Recruitment Student Loan Forgiveness Pilot
Program. Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), of this amount $2,000,000 shall be allocated from lottery revenues.
(14) Innovative Scholarship Pilot Project: Notwithstanding KRS 154A.130(4), included in the above
General Fund appropriation is $675,500 in each fiscal year for the Innovative Scholarship Pilot Project. The
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall work in coordination with the Council on Postsecondary
Education to develop and implement the Innovative Scholarship pilot project.
3. EASTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 80,209,800 73,838,900
Restricted Funds 218,354,400 218,016,300
Federal Funds 135,500,000 135,500,000
TOTAL 434,064,200 427,355,200
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $4,571,900 in each fiscal year for the Model Laboratory School;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991, $4,454,900 in each fiscal year to support the university's share of the
anticipated retirement costs over the university's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline contribution as adjusted and posted
under the 2026 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission's website; and
(c) $2,423,200 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium.
(2) Air Traffic Control Training Program: Included in the above General Fund appropriation is
$6,500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the establishment and
operations of an air traffic control training program.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

56 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
4. KENTUCKY STATE UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 32,198,500 30,198,500
Restricted Funds 68,862,300 77,848,400
Federal Funds 40,680,600 44,031,000
TOTAL 141,741,400 152,077,900
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $10,381,000 in each fiscal year to fund the state match payments required of land-grant universities
under federal law;
(b) $473,600 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium; and
(c) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 for expansion of online offerings.
5. MOREHEAD STATE UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 46,356,100 46,873,100
Restricted Funds 113,586,900 113,586,900
Federal Funds 47,176,400 47,176,400
TOTAL 207,119,400 207,636,400
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $5,959,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $6,476,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Craft Academy for
Excellence in Science and Mathematics;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991, $2,456,500 in each fiscal year to support the university's share of the
anticipated retirement costs over the university's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline contribution as adjusted and posted
under the 2026 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission's website; and
(c) $1,274,400 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium.
6. MURRAY STATE UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 49,549,600 49,549,600
Restricted Funds 159,450,500 159,450,500
Federal Funds 26,494,600 26,494,600
TOTAL 235,494,700 235,494,700
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $4,034,200 in each fiscal year for the Breathitt Veterinary Center;
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991, $1,635,500 in each fiscal year to support the university's share of the
anticipated retirement costs over the university's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline contribution as adjusted and posted
under the 2026 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission's website; and
(c) $1,451,400 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium.
7. NORTHERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 56,453,800 57,249,300

CHAPTER 168 57
Restricted Funds 221,360,100 221,360,100
Federal Funds 15,450,500 15,450,500
TOTAL 293,264,400 294,059,900
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $1,323,900 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Center for Mathematics;
(b) $1,377,900 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium; and
(c) $1,800,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,600,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Votruba Young
Scholars Academy.
8. UNIVERSITY OF KENTUCKY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 500,000 1,500,000
General Fund 292,513,300 287,193,700
Restricted Funds 8,688,499,300 9,509,319,400
Federal Funds 315,770,000 333,769,000
TOTAL 9,297,282,600 10,131,782,100
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $35,420,800 in each fiscal year for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environment’s Cooperative
Extension Service. Of this amount, $4,145,500 in each fiscal year is provided to support extension agent
compensation;
(b) $31,434,100 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Agricultural Experiment Station;
(c) $10,176,200 in each fiscal year for the Center for Applied Energy Research;
(d) $4,076,300 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Geological Survey;
(e) $4,034,200 in each fiscal year for the Veterinary Diagnostic Laboratory;
(f) $2,040,500 in each fiscal year for the Sanders-Brown Center on Aging;
(g) $1,800,000 in each fiscal year for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environment’s Division of
Regulatory Services;
(h) $600,000 in each fiscal year for the College of Agriculture, Food and Environment’s Kentucky Small
Business Development Center;
(i) $586,300 in each fiscal year for the University Press of Kentucky;
(j) $500,000 in each fiscal year for the Human Development Institute for the Supported Higher Education
Project;
(k) $450,200 in each fiscal year for the Center of Excellence in Rural Health;
(l) $950,200 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Cancer Registry;
(m) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the Sports Medicine Research Institute; and
(n) $10,750,900 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth's Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
Premium.
(2) Nuclear Reactor Site Readiness Pilot Program: Costs associated with the procurement of an Early
Site Permit (10 C.F.R. secs. 52.12 et seq.), a Construction Permit (10 C.F.R. pt. 50), or a Combined Operating
License (10 C.F.R. secs. 52.71 et seq.) from the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission for up to three
projects under the Nuclear Reactor Site Readiness Pilot Program shall be deemed a necessary government expense
and shall be paid from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700) or the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account
(KRS 48.705) in an amount not to exceed $75,000,000 for the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium. Any such expenditure
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

58 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
shall be subject to the prior written approval of the State Budget Director and shall be limited to one-third of the
actual costs incurred per project, not to exceed $25,000,000 per project.
(3) Kindergarten Readiness Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to establish the Kindergarten Readiness
Performance-Based Child-Care Incentive Pilot Program. This appropriation is from the lapse and reallocation of
Early Childhood Development Fund appropriations set forth in Part X of this Act.
(4) Energy Planning and Inventory Commission: In fiscal year 2026-2027, $15,000,000 of the funds
authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 173, sec. 1, (207) shall be allocated to the Energy Planning and Inventory
Commission.
9. UNIVERSITY OF LOUISVILLE
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 2,750,000 -0-
General Fund 135,615,900 133,164,800
Restricted Funds 1,515,148,500 1,547,903,100
Federal Funds 196,365,300 200,610,300
TOTAL 1,849,879,700 1,881,678,200
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $695,200 in each fiscal year for the Rural Health Education Program;
(b) $150,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Autism Training Center;
(c) $100,000 in each fiscal year for the School of Dentistry to provide dental care to patients with dental
issues related to drug use;
(d) $150,000 in each fiscal year for the Mid-South REACH Grant; and
(e) $5,801,100 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium.
(2) Cancer Research: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $2,750,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 to fund cancer research at the Brown Cancer Center. This appropriation is from the lapse and
reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund appropriations set forth in Part X of this Act.
10. WESTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 80,142,600 79,202,300
Restricted Funds 279,343,600 280,343,600
Federal Funds 44,143,300 44,143,300
TOTAL 403,629,500 403,689,200
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $5,959,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $6,476,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Gatton Academy
of Mathematics and Science in Kentucky;
(b) $1,750,000 in each fiscal year for the Kentucky Mesonet;
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 61.5991, $1,412,000 in each fiscal year to support the university's share of the
anticipated retirement costs over the university's fiscal year 2019-2020 baseline contribution as adjusted and posted
under the 2026 Budget Bills tile on the Legislative Research Commission's website; and
(d) $1,866,900 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium.
11. KENTUCKY COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
2026-27 2027-28

CHAPTER 168 59
General Fund 179,381,700 176,089,000
Restricted Funds 556,045,700 561,002,400
Federal Funds 295,517,000 295,516,800
TOTAL 1,030,944,400 1,032,608,200
(1) Mandated Programs: Included in the above General Fund appropriation are the following:
(a) $6,000,000 in each fiscal year for KCTCS-TRAINS;
(b) $1,000,000 in each fiscal year for Adult Agriculture Education; and
(c) $3,164,800 in each fiscal year to support the Commonwealth’s Property and Casualty Insurance Fund
premium.
(2) Firefighters Foundation Program Fund: (a) Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$64,160,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $63,175,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Firefighters Foundation
Program Fund.
(b) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.250(1)(a), included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation are
sufficient funds for an incentive payment of $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028,
plus an amount equal to the required employer’s contribution on the supplement in each fiscal year for each qualified
professional firefighter under the Firefighters Foundation Program Fund. KRS 95A.250(1)(b) to (e) shall remain
applicable, except that the administrative expense reimbursement cap under KRS 95A.250(1)(e)(3) shall not exceed
$500,000.
(c) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.262(2), included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $15,300 in
each fiscal year for aid payments for each qualified volunteer fire department.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.200 to 95A.300, $18,800,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 shall be transferred
to support projects as set forth in Part II, Capital Projects Budget, of this Act.
(e) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.200 to 95A.300, included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$1,869,900 in each fiscal year for the State Fire Rescue Training mandated program.
(f) Notwithstanding KRS 95A.200 to 95A.300, included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$1,556,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to be transferred to the Replace Unsafe Fire Equipment capital project for the
Energy and Environment Cabinet as set forth in Part II, Capital Projects Budget, of this Act.
(3) Firefighters Training Center Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 95A.262(3), $1,000,000 in Restricted
Funds is provided in each fiscal year for the Firefighters Training Center Fund.
(4) Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts: Notwithstanding KRS 56.770 and 56.774,
guaranteed energy savings performance contracts may be executed for buildings operated by the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System under agreements governed by KRS 164.593.
(5) Disposition of KCTCS Property: Notwithstanding KRS 45.777, the KCTCS governing board may
elect to sell or dispose of real property or major equipment and proceeds that are surplus to its needs and retain the
proceeds of any sale.
(6) Other Postemployment Benefits Trust Fund: By October 1, 2026, the President of the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System (KCTCS) is directed to have determined the actuarial liabilities of the
KCTCS Other Postemployment Trust Fund effective December 31, 2026, and provide a report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. By January 1, 2027, with the assistance of the State Budget Director and
the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, the President of KCTCS shall submit a plan to the
Legislative Research Commission to have the difference between the balance of the KCTCS Other Postemployment
Benefits Trust Fund and the actuarial liabilities of the fund transferred to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account
(KRS 48.705). It is the intent of the 2026 General Assembly to take action on the plan submitted to the Legislative
Research Commission in the 2027 Regular Session.
(7) Commonwealth West Healthcare Workforce Innovation Center - Carry Forward of
Appropriation Balance: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, the Federal Fund appropriation balance from 2022 Ky. Acts
ch. 199, Part I, J., 11., (6) shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
12. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION PERFORMANCE FUND
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

60 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 115,000,000 115,000,000
TOTAL - POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) 9,415,900 7,245,500
General Fund 1,466,348,600 1,450,585,300
Restricted Funds 11,894,631,900 12,760,149,500
Federal Funds 1,123,312,500 1,148,968,000
TOTAL 14,493,708,900 15,366,948,300
L. PUBLIC PROTECTION CABINET
Budget Units
1. SECRETARY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 11,485,300 11,172,000
2. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 5,377,800 5,321,900
Federal Funds 204,700 204,700
TOTAL 5,582,500 5,526,600
(1) Additional Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $100,900 in fiscal year
2026-2027 and $100,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel.
(2) Real Property Boards: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and
carry out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 182.
3. BOXING AND WRESTLING AUTHORITY
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 326,400 325,000
(1) Additional Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $70,000 in each fiscal
year to support additional personnel.
4. ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CONTROL
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 9,177,600 8,636,500
Federal Funds 1,014,700 1,014,700
TOTAL 10,192,300 9,651,200
(1) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
(2) Special Temporary Nonprofit License: (a) Notwithstanding any provisions of KRS Chapters 241
to 244 or administrative regulations promulgated thereunder to the contrary, a special temporary nonprofit license
shall be issued to a nonprofit organization or the organizer or sponsor of a state, regional, or national conference for
its use at state, regional, or national conferences, which shall not include a political campaign fundraiser.
(b) A special temporary nonprofit license shall authorize the holder and its employees or agents to
purchase, transport, receive, possess, store, sell, donate, deliver, and serve alcoholic beverages, including wine, malt

CHAPTER 168 61
beverages, and distilled spirits, to be sold by the package or the drink, or to be served free of charge by the drink, in
person to attendees of state, regional, or national conferences, by auction, or by raffle, or sold or served free of charge
by the drink to attendees of state, regional, or national conferences, and to receive alcoholic beverages from distillers,
rectifiers, wineries, small farm wineries, brewers, microbreweries, wholesalers, distributors, retailers, or any other
person, by gift, donation, or delivery for its use at a state, regional, or national conference.
(c) The location at which the alcoholic beverages are auctioned, sold, raffled, served, or consumed under
the provisions of this subsection shall not constitute a public place for the purposes of KRS Chapter 222. Nonprofit
events, including state, regional, or national conferences, may be conducted on licensed or unlicensed premises.
(d) A special temporary nonprofit license shall not be issued for any period longer than 30 days.
(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of KRS Chapters 241 to 244, a distiller, rectifier, winery, small
farm winery, brewer, microbrewery, wholesaler, distributor, or retailer may donate, give away, or deliver any of its
products to a nonprofit organization or the organizer or sponsor of a state, regional, or national conference possessing
a special temporary nonprofit license.
(f) Nothing herein shall prohibit the employees of an entity that holds a special temporary nonprofit license
from serving or selling wine, malt beverages, and distilled spirits by the drink to attendees of state, regional, or
national conference.
(g) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the employees of retail drink licensees, including but not limited to
NQ1, NQ2, NQ3, and licensed caterers from serving or selling wine, malt beverages, and distilled spirits by the drink
at a state, regional, or national conference on the account of or on behalf of a nonprofit organization or the organizer
or sponsor of a state, regional, or national conference that holds a special temporary nonprofit license.
(3) Additional Tobacco, Nicotine, and Vapor Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $2,750,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,250,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional
personnel and vehicles.
5. FINANCIAL INSTITUTIONS
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 17,785,200 17,651,100
6. HOUSING, BUILDINGS AND CONSTRUCTION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 251,100 3,282,000
Restricted Funds 28,935,700 25,761,600
TOTAL 29,186,800 29,043,600
(1) Industrial or Business Project Plan Reviews and Inspections: Notwithstanding KRS 198B.060,
permit applicants may request local or state governments to perform plan review, inspection, and enforcement
responsibilities related to industrial or business projects.
(2) Inspectors and Reviewers Reporting Requirement: The Department of Housing, Buildings and
Construction shall submit a report to the Legislative Research Commission, Office of Budget Review, by December 1
of each fiscal year detailing the number of full-time inspectors and reviewers, in addition to the number of completed
inspections and plan reviews.
(3) Operations of the Department: Notwithstanding KRS 227A.050, included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $2,977,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to support of the operations of the Department of
Housing, Buildings and Construction, Division of General Inspections.
(4) School Building Plan Reviews and Inspections: Notwithstanding KRS 198B.060, local governments
may have jurisdiction for plan review, inspection, and enforcement responsibilities over buildings intended for
educational purposes, other than licensed day-care centers, at the discretion of the local school districts.
(5) Additional Plumbing Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $206,900 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $206,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel.
(6) Additional HVAC Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $198,800 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $198,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

62 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(7) Additional Hazardous Material Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is
$182,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $182,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel.
(8) Additional Electrical Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $531,900 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $530,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel.
(9) Additional Boiler Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $182,600 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $182,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional personnel.
(10) Additional Building Code Enforcement Personnel: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $299,700 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $298,700 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support additional
personnel.
7. INSURANCE
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 22,745,400 22,525,500
(1) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
(2) Property and Casualty Actuarial Contract Increase: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $225,000 in each fiscal year to support an increase in actuarial contracts.
(3) Financial Standards Actuarial Contract Increase: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriation is $750,000 in each fiscal year to support an increase in actuarial contracts.
(4) Restricted Funds Transfer for Medicaid Benefits: Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2), there is
hereby transferred $290,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in the
Department of Insurance to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705). It is the intent of the 2026
General Assembly to reserve $290,000,000 for potential appropriation for Medicaid Benefits in the 2027 Regular
Session if deemed necessary for claims and payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 or fiscal year 2027-2028.
(5) Local School District Insurance Coverage Evaluation: The Department of Insurance shall submit a
report using information reported by the Kentucky Department of Education pursuant to Part I., C., 2., (8) of this Act
to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue no later than November 1, 2026. The report shall
evaluate and determine the adequacy of insurance coverage for each local school district, as required under 702 KAR
3:030.
(6) Restricted Funds Transfer - Out of Home Care: Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2), there is hereby
transferred $22,000,000 in each fiscal year from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in the Department of Insurance
to the Out of Home Care Replacement Fund.
(7) Restricted Funds Transfer - Dental Services: Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2), there is hereby
transferred $8,000,000 in each fiscal year from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund in the Department of Insurance
to Medicaid Benefits.
8. CLAIMS AND APPEALS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,124,900 2,083,300
Restricted Funds 1,279,800 1,274,400
Federal Funds 771,900 773,500
TOTAL 4,176,600 4,131,200
(1) Administrative Expenses and Claims: Notwithstanding KRS 304.2-400(2), excess Restricted Funds
from the Department of Insurance shall be transferred to the Crime Victims' Compensation Fund and made available
to support administrative expenses and claims.
(2) Victims of Crime: Included in the above appropriations is sufficient funding to implement and carry
out the provisions of 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 67.
TOTAL - PUBLIC PROTECTION CABINET

CHAPTER 168 63
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 2,376,000 5,365,300
Restricted Funds 97,113,200 92,668,000
Federal Funds 1,991,300 1,992,900
TOTAL 101,480,500 100,026,200
M. TOURISM, ARTS AND HERITAGE CABINET
Budget Units
1. SECRETARY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,427,400 3,655,500
Restricted Funds 20,616,900 19,574,400
TOTAL 24,044,300 23,229,900
(1) Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority: Restricted Funds in the amount of $1,500,000
in each fiscal year shall be transferred to the Department for Local Government from taxes collected pursuant to KRS
142.400(2) to support the Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority.
2. ARTISANS CENTER
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,227,100 1,233,400
Restricted Funds 1,242,100 1,217,000
TOTAL 2,469,200 2,450,400
(1) Feasibility Study: The cabinet shall coordinate with the Transportation Cabinet to conduct a feasibility
study on the Kentucky Artisan Center’s sustainability and its potential acquisition by Berea College and the City of
Berea and provide a report regarding its findings to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by
July 1, 2027.
3. TOURISM
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 3,461,300 3,431,100
Restricted Funds 72,700 72,700
TOTAL 3,534,000 3,503,800
4. PARKS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 64,177,700 61,215,200
Restricted Funds 48,157,300 50,688,200
TOTAL 112,335,000 111,903,400
(1) Park Capital Maintenance and Renovation Fund: Notwithstanding KRS 148.810, no transfer to the
Park Capital Maintenance and Renovation Fund shall be made.
(2) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
(3) Parks Capital Project Tracking Plan and Report: The Department of Parks shall establish a project
tracking plan and prepare a report on capital projects authorized in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, K., 2., including
but not limited to the projects funded, the current status of each project and projected completion date, the amount
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

64 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
expended on each project, and filled positions associated with the projects. The Department of Parks shall submit this
report on a quarterly basis beginning August 1, 2024, to the Interim Joint Budget Review Subcommittee on
Economic Development, Tourism, and Environmental Protection.
5. HORSE PARK COMMISSION
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,701,300 1,666,900
Restricted Funds 12,801,700 12,964,300
TOTAL 14,503,000 14,631,200
(1) Training Incentive Payments: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in the above Restricted
Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for each participant for
training incentive payments.
6. STATE FAIR BOARD
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 6,761,700 6,856,800
Restricted Funds 58,050,000 60,317,600
TOTAL 64,811,700 67,174,400
(1) State Fair Board Property Improvements: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the State Fair
Board shall give preference to Kentucky businesses to make improvements to State Fair Board properties for hotel
development. The Board shall recommend the participation of Kentucky-based businesses and shall also recommend
the participation of other Kentucky-based businesses offering solutions to accomplish the goal of improving hotel
development. For the purposes of this subsection, "Kentucky-based business" means a business that has employees
working in Kentucky and that operates a principal executive office in Kentucky from which those employees, other
offices, and affiliated entities are directed and controlled.
(2) Public-Private Partnerships: Notwithstanding KRS 45A.077(8) and Part II, (8) of this Act, the
utilization of the public-private partnership delivery method for State Fair Board projects of at least $25,000,000 does
not need to be explicitly authorized by the General Assembly.
(3) Kentucky Exposition Center Facility Expansion & Staffing: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriations is $1,720,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $3,740,100 in 2027-2028 to support the Kentucky
Exposition Center facility expansion and staffing.
(4) Rental Services and Increased Contract Costs: Included in the above Restricted Funds
appropriations is $950,500 in each fiscal year to support rental services and increased contract costs.
7. FISH AND WILDLIFE RESOURCES
2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds 57,212,300 56,566,200
Federal Funds 27,415,400 27,769,800
TOTAL 84,627,700 84,336,000
(1) Fish and Wildlife Resources Peace Officers' Stipend: Notwithstanding KRS 15.460(1), included in
the above Restricted Funds appropriation is $4,653 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $4,746 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for
each participant for training incentive payments.
(2) Fees-in-Lieu-of Stream Mitigation Reporting: The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall
develop a report of all projects managed by the Fees-in-Lieu-of Stream Mitigation Program. The Department shall
present this report to the Interim Joint Committee on Tourism, Small Business, and Information Technology by
August 1 of each fiscal year.
8. HISTORICAL SOCIETY
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 7,752,700 7,826,500

CHAPTER 168 65
Restricted Funds 464,600 363,400
Federal Funds 122,000 122,000
TOTAL 8,339,300 8,311,900
9. ARTS COUNCIL
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,776,000 1,747,000
Restricted Funds 76,400 68,200
Federal Funds 827,800 834,800
TOTAL 2,680,200 2,650,000
10. HERITAGE COUNCIL
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 1,747,500 1,737,000
Restricted Funds 697,200 660,200
Federal Funds 1,054,700 1,070,400
TOTAL 3,499,400 3,467,600
(1) American Battlefield Trust: Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any unexpended balance from the
appropriation set forth in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part I, L., 10., (2) shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
11. KENTUCKY CENTER FOR THE ARTS
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 597,600 579,000
TOTAL - TOURISM, ARTS AND HERITAGE CABINET
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 92,630,300 89,948,400
Restricted Funds 199,391,200 202,492,200
Federal Funds 29,419,900 29,797,000
TOTAL 321,441,400 322,237,600
N. BUDGET RESERVE TRUST FUND
Budget Unit
1. BUDGET RESERVE TRUST FUND
2026-27 2027-28
General Fund 296,581,400 50,413,900
PART II
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
(1) Capital Construction Fund Appropriations and Reauthorizations: Moneys in the Capital
Construction Fund are appropriated for the following capital projects subject to the conditions and procedures in this
Act. Items listed without appropriated amounts are previously authorized for which no additional amount is required.
These items are listed in order to continue their current authorization into the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium. Unless
otherwise specified, reauthorized projects shall conform to the original authorization enacted by the General
Assembly.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

66 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(2) Expiration of Existing Line-Item Capital Construction Projects: All appropriations to existing line-
item capital construction and information technology projects expire on June 30, 2026, unless specifically
reauthorized in this Act with the following exceptions:
(a) A construction or purchase contract for the project shall have been awarded by June 30, 2026;
(b) Permanent financing or a short-term line of credit sufficient to cover the total authorized project scope
shall have been obtained in the case of projects authorized for bonds, if the authorized project completes an initial
draw on the line of credit within the fiscal biennium immediately subsequent to the original authorization; and
(c) Grant or loan agreements, if applicable, shall have been finalized and properly signed by all necessary
parties by June 30, 2026.
Notwithstanding the criteria set forth in this subsection and KRS 45.229 and 45.770(5)(d), funds appropriated
to 2022-2024 and 2024-2026 fiscal biennia maintenance pools shall not lapse and shall carry forward.
(3) Bond Proceeds Investment Income: Investment income earned from bond proceeds beyond that
which is required to satisfy Internal Revenue Service arbitrage rebates and penalties and excess bond proceeds upon
the completion of a bond-financed capital project shall be used to pay debt service according to the Internal Revenue
Service Code and accompanying regulations.
(4) Appropriations for Projects Not Line-Itemized: Inasmuch as the identification of specific projects in
a variety of areas of the state government cannot be ascertained with absolute certainty at this time, amounts are
appropriated for specific purposes to projects which are not individually identified in this Act in the following areas:
Kentucky Infrastructure Authority Water and Sewer projects; Flood Control projects; Repair of State-Owned Dams;
Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contract projects; Wetland and Stream Mitigation projects; maintenance
pools; Economic Development projects, which shall include authorization for the High-Tech Construction Pool and
the High-Tech Investment Pool; Postsecondary Education pools; Legacy System Modernization Pool; State Schools
HVAC Pool; State Schools Safety and Security Pool; State Parks Improvement; Fish and Wildlife Land Acquisition
Pool; Kentucky Exposition Center Paving Pool; Wastewater Treatment Upgrades Pool; State Parks Utility
Infrastructure Replacement Pool; and State Fair Board Property Improvements. Notwithstanding any statute to the
contrary, projects estimated to cost $1,000,000 and over and equipment estimated to cost $200,000 and over shall be
reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
(5) Capital Construction and Equipment Purchase Contingency Account: If funds in the Capital
Construction and Equipment Purchase Contingency Account are not sufficient, then expenditures of the fund are to
be paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700), if available, or from the Budget Reserve Trust
Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
(6) Emergency Repair, Maintenance, and Replacement Account: If funds in the Emergency Repair,
Maintenance, and Replacement Account are not sufficient, then up to $2,500,000 of expenditures of the fund are to
be paid first from the General Fund Surplus Account (KRS 48.700), if available, or from the Budget Reserve Trust
Fund Account (KRS 48.705), subject to the conditions and procedures provided in this Act.
(7) Appropriation-Supported Debt: To lower the cost of borrowing, the agencies identified in KRS
45A.850(1)(a) and (2)(a) are authorized to refinance appropriation-supported debt obligations that have previously
been issued and for which the Commonwealth is currently making lease-rental payments to meet the current debt
service requirements. Such action is authorized provided that the principal amount of any such debt obligation is not
increased and the term of the debt obligation is not extended. Any such refinancing shall still be subject to the
requirements of KRS 45.750 to 45.810 for reporting to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
(8) Public-Private Partnerships: Notwithstanding KRS 45.763(3) and 45A.077(8), the utilization of the
public-private partnership delivery method for projects of at least $1,000,000 shall be authorized by the General
Assembly.
A. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. VETERANS' AFFAIRS
001. Radcliff Veterans Center HVAC System Replacement Additional
Bond Funds 16,000,000 -0-
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028

CHAPTER 168 67
Investment Income 1,000,000 1,000,000
003. Expand Columbarium Wall - Kentucky Veterans Cemetery Northeast
Federal Funds -0- 2,000,000
2. KENTUCKY INFRASTRUCTURE AUTHORITY
001. KIA Fund A - Federally Assisted Wastewater Program
Federal Funds 75,502,000 20,223,000
Bond Funds 14,560,000 4,045,000
Agency Bonds 30,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 120,062,000 24,268,000
002. KIA Fund F - Drinking Water Revolving Loan Program
Federal Funds 109,906,000 18,294,000
Bond Funds 13,124,000 3,659,000
Agency Bonds 30,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 153,030,000 21,953,000
3. MILITARY AFFAIRS
001. Armory Installation Facility Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 4,000,000 4,000,000
002. Kentucky Youth Challenge Academies Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 1,000,000 1,000,000
003. Bluegrass Station Facility Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 1,000,000 1,000,000
004. Construct Wendell H. Ford Regional Training Center Unaccompanied Housing Advanced Skills
Training
Federal Funds 21,000,000 -0-
005. Construct Multi-Purpose Building Bluegrass Station
Other Funds 15,000,000 -0-
006. Construct Civil Support Team Facility Additional Reauthorization ($13,200,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds 11,400,000 -0-
007. Construct New Barracks at Wendell H. Ford Regional Training Center
Federal Funds 8,000,000 -0-
008. Construct Readiness Center Somerset Additional Reauthorization ($24,750,000 Federal Funds,
$8,259,000 Bond Funds)
Federal Funds -0- 4,898,000
Investment Income -0- 1,633,000
TOTAL -0- 6,531,000
009. Construct Jackson Field Maintenance Shop Additional Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds 5,000,000 -0-
010. Ashland Armory Restoration Phase 1
Federal Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

68 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Investment Income 2,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 4,000,000 -0-
011. Construct Armory 4 Frankfort Additional Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Federal Funds, $1,000,000 Bond
Funds)
Federal Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Investment Income 2,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 4,000,000 -0-
012. Demolish Bluegrass Station Boiler Plant
Restricted Funds 4,000,000 -0-
013. Construct and Extend Electric Bluegrass Station
Restricted Funds 3,500,000 -0-
014. Construct Fitness Center Facility Wendell H. Ford Regional Training Center Additional
Reauthorization ($5,000,000 Federal Funds)
Federal Funds 3,000,000 -0-
015. Kentucky Army National Guard Training Site Master Plan
Federal Funds 2,000,000 -0-
016. Construct Road Improvements Bluegrass Station
Restricted Funds 1,500,000 -0-
017. Construct New Barracks at Harold L. Disney Training Site Additional Reauthorization ($3,000,000
Federal Funds)
Federal Funds 1,000,000 -0-
018. Construct Harold L. Disney Training Site Drainage Improvements Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Federal
Funds)
019. Construct Improve Sewer System Bluegrass Station Reauthorization ($5,000,000 Restricted Funds)
020. Extension of Utilities Wendell H. Ford Regional Training Center Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Federal
Funds)
021. Construct Support Building Wendell H. Ford Regional Training Center Reauthorization ($3,000,000
Federal Funds)
4. DEPARTMENT FOR LOCAL GOVERNMENT
001. Flood Control Local Match
Investment Income 6,000,000 6,000,000
5. ATTORNEY GENERAL
001. Franklin County - Lease
002. Upgrade Technology Additional Reauthorization ($2,000,000 Bond Funds)
Investment Income 600,000 -0-
6. COMMONWEALTH'S ATTORNEYS
001. Jefferson County - Lease
7. TREASURY
001. Replace HVAC Leibert Units
Investment Income 354,000 -0-
002. Xerox Check Printer - Secondary

CHAPTER 168 69
Investment Income 66,000 -0-
8. AGRICULTURE
001. Large Capacity Scale Trucks
Restricted Funds 800,000 -0-
002. Franklin County - Lease
9. KENTUCKY PUBLIC PENSIONS AUTHORITY
001. Pension Administration System Technology Modernization - Planning - Phase I
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000
10. OCCUPATIONAL AND PROFESSIONAL BOARDS AND COMMISSIONS
a. Nursing
001. Jefferson County - Lease
11. KENTUCKY RIVER AUTHORITY
001. Renovate Lock 5
Restricted Funds -0- 4,200,000
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 2,000,000
003. Locks 2 and 3 Upper Guide Wall Repair Reauthorization ($4,131,000 Restricted Funds)
004. Design and Repair Dam 7 Reauthorization ($6,400,000 Restricted Funds)
12. SCHOOL FACILITIES CONSTRUCTION COMMISSION
001. Offers of Assistance - 2024-2026 Reauthorization and Reallocation ($16,309,000 Bond Funds)
Bond Funds 23,691,000 -0-
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above project is authorized from a reallocation of the projects
set forth in 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, A., 10., 005.
002. School Facilities Construction Commission Reauthorization ($89,710,000 Bond Funds)
B. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT
(1) Economic Development Bond Issues: Before any economic development bonds are issued, the
proposed bond issue shall be approved by the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the State
Property and Buildings Commission under KRS 56.440 to 56.590. In addition to the terms and conditions of KRS
154.12-100, administration of the Economic Development Bond Program by the Secretary of the Cabinet for
Economic Development is subject to the following guideline: project selection shall be documented when presented
to the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Included in the documentation shall be the rationale for
selection and expected economic development impact.
(2) Use of New Economy Funds: Notwithstanding KRS 154.12-100, 154.12-278(4) and (5), and 154.20-
035, the Secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development may use funds appropriated in the Economic
Development Fund Program, High-Tech Construction/Investment Pool, and the Kentucky Economic Development
Finance Authority Loan Pool interchangeably for economic development projects.
001. Economic Development Bond Programs - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 5,000,000 5,000,000
002. High-Tech Construction/Investment Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 5,000,000 5,000,000
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

70 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
003. Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority Loan Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds 5,000,000 5,000,000
C. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 2,000,000 1,100,000
2. LEARNING AND RESULTS SERVICES
001. State Schools Electrical Upgrades
Bond Funds 5,150,000 -0-
002. State Schools Lighting Upgrades
Bond Funds 2,066,000 -0-
D. EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 2,000,000 2,000,000
2. KENTUCKY EDUCATIONAL TELEVISION
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 750,000 750,000
002. KET Capitol Production Center Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 500,000 500,000
3. LIBRARIES AND ARCHIVES
a. General Operations
001. Franklin County - Lease
4. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 700,000 700,000
002. Hardin County - Lease
003. Kenton County - Lease
5. DISABILITY DETERMINATIONS
001. Franklin County - Lease
E. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. SECRETARY
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 500,000 500,000
2. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
001. State-Owned Dam Repair - 2026-2028

CHAPTER 168 71
Bond Funds 21,060,000 -0-
002. State Superfund Sites - 2026-2028
Investment Income 1,000,000 1,000,000
3. NATURAL RESOURCES
001. Replace Unsafe Fire Equipment
Restricted Funds 1,556,000 -0-
F. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. CONTROLLER
001. Upgrade & Enhancement eMARS Systems Additional
Bond Funds 3,765,000 -0-
2. FACILITIES AND SUPPORT SERVICES
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 7,500,000 7,500,000
002. Renovate Cabinet for Human Resources Phase 2
Investment Income 8,000,000 -0-
003. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
004. Restore Old State Capitol Annex
Bond Funds 37,100,000 -0-
005. Deferred Maintenance Historic Properties
Investment Income 3,000,000 -0-
006. Asphalt Pool
Investment Income 1,500,000 -0-
007. Roof Pool
Investment Income 2,000,000 -0-
008. Replace Capitol Parking Structure
Bond Funds 126,000,000 -0-
009. Replace Capitol Terraces
Bond Funds 42,000,000 -0-
010. Capitol Annex Renovation Additional Reauthorization ($168,000,000 Bond Funds)
Bond Funds 175,000,000 -0-
3. COMMONWEALTH OFFICE OF TECHNOLOGY
001. Kentucky from Above
Investment Income 6,000,000 6,000,000
002. Enterprise Application and AI Inventory System
Investment Income 4,000,000 2,000,000
003. Alternate Data Center - Lease
G. HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

72 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL ADMINISTRATION AND PROGRAM SUPPORT
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 10,700,000 10,700,000
2. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH, DEVELOPMENTAL AND INTELLECTUAL
DISABILITIES
001. Oakwood Renovate/Replace Cottages Phase IV
Investment Income 12,616,000 -0-
002. Western State Nursing Facility Renovations II
Investment Income 6,621,000 -0-
003. Hazelwood Upgrade Elevators
Investment Income 2,880,000 -0-
004. Western State Hospital Repair/Replace Cooling Towers
Investment Income 1,920,000 -0-
3. PUBLIC HEALTH
001. Jefferson County - Lease
4. COMMUNITY BASED SERVICES
001. Kenton County - Lease
002. Fayette County - Lease
003. Warren County - Lease
004. Daviess County - Lease
005. Perry County - Lease
006. Boone County - Lease
007. Hardin County - Lease
008. Boyd County - Lease
009. Campbell County - Lease
010. Johnson County - Lease
011. Floyd County - Lease
012. Shelby County - Lease
013. Greenup County - Lease
014. Muhlenberg County - Lease
015. Madison County - Lease
016. Marshall County - Lease
017. Harlan County - Lease
018. Pulaski County - Lease
019. Jefferson County - Lease
H. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. JUSTICE ADMINISTRATION

CHAPTER 168 73
001. Northern Kentucky Medical Examiners Office - Lease
2. CRIMINAL JUSTICE TRAINING
001. Construct New Flat Track - Madisonville
Restricted Funds -0- 13,101,000
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 4,500,000 4,500,000
3. JUVENILE JUSTICE
001. Design Female Detention Facility - Central Kentucky
Bond Funds -0- 4,500,000
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 7,200,000 7,200,000
003. Franklin County - Lease
4. STATE POLICE
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 6,500,000 6,500,000
002. Posts 7 (Richmond) and 10 (Harlan) Construction Additional
Investment Income 8,586,000 -0-
003. Northern Kentucky Crime Lab - Lease
5. CORRECTIONS
a. Adult Correctional Institutions
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 20,000,000 20,000,000
002. Mechanical, Electrical, Plumbing Upgrades and Replacement Pool
Investment Income 10,000,000 10,000,000
003. Demolition Kentucky State Reformatory Additional Reauthorization and Reallocation ($9,776,000
Bond Funds)
Bond Funds 17,010,000 -0-
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above project is authorized from a reallocation of the project
set forth in 2018 Ky. Acts ch. 169, Part II, H., 4., a., 003.
004. Replace Kentucky State Penitentiary - Utilities Infrastructure Additional
Investment Income 15,758,000 -0-
005. Repair Northpoint Training Center - Exterior Dorms Masonry Tuckpoint Additional
Bond Funds 11,787,000 -0-
006. Renovate Northpoint Training Center - Restricted Housing Unit Additional
Investment Income 3,500,000 -0-
007. Southeast State Correctional Complex - Lease
b. Community Services and Local Facilities
001. Campbell County - Lease
002. Fayette County - Lease
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

74 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
6. PUBLIC ADVOCACY
001. Franklin County - Lease
002. Fayette County - Lease
003. Jefferson County - Lease
I. PERSONNEL CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. GENERAL OPERATIONS
001. Enterprise Human Resources Information System Reauthorization and Reallocation ($10,351,800 Bond
Funds)
Bond Funds 9,848,000 130,869,000
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above project is authorized from a reallocation of the projects
set forth in 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 149, Part II, F., 1., 001 and 2024 Ky. Acts ch. 175, Part II, A., 11., 002.
J. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
(1) Postsecondary Education Asset Preservation Pool: The Postsecondary Education Asset Preservation
Pool provides funding for individual asset preservation, renovation, and maintenance projects at Kentucky’s public
postsecondary institutions in Education, General, and state-owned and operated residential housing facilities for fixed
asset pedestrian and student parking areas, and for the razing of university-owned buildings. Capital projects as
defined in KRS 45.750(1)(f) are hereby authorized from these funds or combination of funds thereof and shall be
reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee.
Budget Units 2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
1. KENTUCKY HIGHER EDUCATION STUDENT LOAN CORPORATION
001. Jefferson County - Lease
2. EASTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 8,189,000
002. Construct Health Innovations Center
Agency Bonds -0- 330,000,000 -0-
003. Construct University Hotel and Conference Center
Other Funds -0- 130,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
004. IT Hardware Software Networking Systems Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 24,000,000 -0-
005. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
006. Aviation Acquisition Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 15,000,000 -0-
007. Property Acquisitions Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 75
TOTAL -0- 10,000,000 -0-
008. Upgrade and Improve Residence Halls Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
009. Scientific and Research Equipment Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 2,200,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 2,200,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 8,400,000 -0-
010. Repurpose and Renovate Commonwealth Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
011. Natural Area Improvement Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 1,000,000 -0-
012. Improve Campus Pedestrian, Parking and Transportation Pool Reauthorization ($8,000,000 Agency
Bonds, $3,000,000 Restricted Funds, $3,000,000 Other Funds)
013. Athletics Capital Improvements Pool Reauthorization ($25,000,000 Agency Bonds, $25,000,000
Restricted Funds, $25,000,000 Other Funds)
014. Maintain/Expand Begley Building Reauthorization ($40,000,000 Agency Bonds)
015. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($8,222,000 Restricted Funds)
016. Lease - Madison County - Student Housing
017. Lease - Madison County - Land
018. Lease - Multi-Property-Multi-Use 1
019. Lease - Multi-Property-Multi-Use 2
020. Lease - New Housing Space
021. Lease - Aviation
022. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
3. KENTUCKY STATE UNIVERSITY
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 2,360,000
002. Construct Health Sciences Center
Federal Funds -0- -0- 4,000,000
Bond Funds -0- -0- 50,000,000
TOTAL -0- -0- 54,000,000
003. Acquire Land
Restricted Funds -0- 1,500,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 3,500,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 5,000,000 -0-
004. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($2,412,000 Restricted Funds)
4. MOREHEAD STATE UNIVERSITY
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

76 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 5,065,000
002. Construct New Applied Science Building
Bond Funds -0- -0- 79,400,000
003. Construct New Residence Hall #3
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 20,000,000 -0-
004. Construct New Residence Hall #2 Reauthorization ($40,350,000 Agency Bonds)
005. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
5. MURRAY STATE UNIVERSITY
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 7,073,000
002. Construct Emergency Veterinary and Teaching Clinic
Agency Bonds -0- 48,500,000 -0-
003. Construct/Renovate Dining Facility Additional Reauthorization ($30,000,000 Restricted Funds)
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
004. Construct Emergency Generator Docking Station(s) for Residence Halls
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
005. Replace Wilson Hall Roof
Restricted Funds -0- 1,100,000 -0-
006. Replace Alexander Hall Addition Roof
Restricted Funds -0- 1,100,000 -0-
007. Replace Racer Arena Roof
Restricted Funds -0- 1,100,000 -0-
008. Replace College Courts Apartments Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Agency Bonds)
009. Athletic Facilities Improvements Pool Reauthorization ($20,000,000 Restricted Funds, $20,000,000
Agency Bonds)
010. Asset Preservation Pool - Residence Halls Reauthorization ($6,000,000 Agency Bonds)
011. Acquire Agriculture Research Farm Land Reauthorization ($1,254,000 Restricted Funds)
012. Renovate Residence Hall Interior Reauthorization ($1,674,000 Agency Bonds)
013. Renovate Residence Hall Electrical System Reauthorization ($4,369,000 Agency Bonds)
014. Acquire Property Reauthorization ($4,180,000 Restricted Funds)
015. Replace Residence Hall Domestic Water Piping Reauthorization ($1,195,000 Agency Bonds)
016. Renovate Residence Hall HVAC System Reauthorization ($1,661,000 Agency Bonds)
017. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
6. NORTHERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 6,951,000
002. US 27 Mixed Use Development

CHAPTER 168 77
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45A.077.
003. Renovate Business Academic Center
Agency Bonds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 155,000,000 -0-
004. Construct Sports Complex
Other Funds -0- 98,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
005. Expand Multi-Purpose Events Center
Other Funds -0- 32,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
006. Enhance Online Programs Additional
Restricted Funds -0- 9,500,000 -0-
007. Upgrade IT Infrastructure Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 2,950,000 -0-
008. Replace Recreation Field Turf
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
009. Acquire Land/Master Plan 2010-2012 Reauthorization ($17,500,000 Agency Bonds, $4,000,000
Restricted Funds, $4,000,000 Other Funds)
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
010. Expand/Renovate Soccer Complex Reauthorization ($16,000,000 Agency Bonds, $36,000,000 Other
Funds)
011. Renovate Residence Halls Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Agency Bonds)
012. Renew/Renovate Landrum Academic Center Reauthorization ($49,000,000 Bond Funds, $3,000,000
Other Funds)
013. Renew/Repair Parking Garage Pool Reauthorization ($3,000,000 Agency Bonds)
014. Replace Event Center Technology Reauthorization ($4,500,000 Other Funds)
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
015. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($1,170,300 Restricted Funds)
016. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
7. UNIVERSITY OF KENTUCKY
(1) University of Kentucky Acquisitions: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, the University of
Kentucky or one of its affiliated corporations, for the benefit of the University’s multifaceted education, healthcare,
research, and service mission shall be permitted to assume any and all leases, debt instruments, and liabilities
associated with any mergers, acquisitions, or partnerships that are hereby authorized in the 2026-2028 Budget of the
Commonwealth. Assumption of leases and debt instruments shall be reported to the Capital Projects and Bond
Oversight Committee.
(2) Public-Private Partnerships: Notwithstanding Part II, (8) of this Act, and KRS 45A.077(8), the
utilization of the public-private partnership delivery method for projects of at least $25,000,000 does not need to be
explicitly authorized by the General Assembly. Pursuant to KRS 45.763(3), all capital projects utilizing the public-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

78 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
private partnership delivery method must be reviewed and approved by the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight
Committee after negotiations are complete but prior to beginning work on the project.
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 24,330,000
002. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 3 Phase 2
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000,000 -0-
003. Construct/Improve Hamburg Medical Park
Restricted Funds -0- 300,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 800,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
004. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 800,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
005. Construct/Improve Arts and Innovation Complex
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds -0- 175,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 775,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763 and 45A.077.
006. Construct Fan Experience Districts
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 625,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 700,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
007. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 8
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 600,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
008. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 7
Restricted Funds -0- 300,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 300,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 600,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
009. Construct Multi-Use Complex 1
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 79
Agency Bonds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 600,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
010. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 6
Other Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
011. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 5
Restricted Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
012. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 4
Restricted Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
013. Acquire/Partnership Medical System 2
Restricted Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
014. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 4
Restricted Funds -0- 500,000,000 -0-
015. Improve Central Plants/Utilities Infrastructure - Phase 2
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 500,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
016. Construct/Improve Student Housing
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 475,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
017. Construct/Improve Utilities Infrastructure Hamburg
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 400,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
018. Construct/Improve Utilities Infrastructure UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 400,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
019. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

80 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
TOTAL -0- 400,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
020. Improve UK HealthCare IT Systems II
Restricted Funds -0- 400,000,000 -0-
021. Construct Research Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 65,000,000 -0-
Bond Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 365,000,000 -0-
022. Acquire/Partnership Medical System 1
Restricted Funds -0- 350,000,000 -0-
023. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 10
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
024. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 1
Restricted Funds -0- 300,000,000 -0-
025. Improve Campus Parking and Transportation System
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 250,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
026. Construct/Improve Dining Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 300,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
027. Improve UK HealthCare Facilities - UK Chandler Hospital
Restricted Funds -0- 250,000,000 -0-
028. Construct/Improve Parking Facility 1
Restricted Funds -0- 125,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 125,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 250,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
029. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 250,000,000 -0-
030. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 1

CHAPTER 168 81
Restricted Funds -0- 250,000,000 -0-
031. Construct/Improve Research/Data Center
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
032. Expand UK HealthCare IT Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
033. Improve Utilities Infrastructure UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
034. Improve Parking/Transportation Systems UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
035. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 9
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
036. Construct/Improve Parking/Transportation System Hamburg
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
037. Improve Utilities Infrastructure UK King's Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
038. Improve UK King's Daughters Medical Campus
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
039. Improve Parking/Transportation Systems UK HealthCare
Other Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
040. Implement Land Use Plan 1
Restricted Funds -0- 200,000,000 -0-
041. Construct Recreation/Wellness Center
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

82 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Other Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
042. Construct/Improve Club Area - Kroger Field
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 200,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
043. Construct Digital Village Building 3
Restricted Funds -0- 95,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 95,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 190,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
044. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 1
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 185,000,000 -0-
045. Facilities Renewal and Modernization
Restricted Funds -0- 125,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds -0- 40,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 165,000,000 -0-
046. Construct/Improve UK St. Claire Main Campus
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
047. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 5
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
048. Construct Cancer/Ambulatory Facility Phase 3
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
049. Implement Land Use Plan 2
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
050. Acquire E&G Enterprise 2
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
051. Acquire E&G Enterprise 1
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
052. Construct Hotel/Conference Center
Other Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
053. Construct/Improve Wildcat Coal Lodge
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 83
TOTAL -0- 150,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
054. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
055. Construct West End Zone Club Space Additional Reauthorization ($50,000,000 Other Funds)
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 150,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
056. Improve Advanced Science and Technology Commercialization Center
Restricted Funds -0- 130,000,000 -0-
057. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 4
Restricted Funds -0- 130,000,000 -0-
058. Improve Singletary Center
Restricted Funds -0- 130,000,000 -0-
059. Construct/Improve Dental Sciences Building
Restricted Funds -0- 130,000,000 -0-
060. Construct/Improve Academic/Research Facility 3
Restricted Funds -0- 125,000,000 -0-
061. Construct/Improve Parking Facility 2
Other Funds -0- 125,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
062. Improve Coldstream Research Campus
Restricted Funds -0- 60,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 60,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 120,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
063. Construct Agriculture Federal Research Facility I
Federal Funds -0- 108,000,000 -0-
064. Improve State Street Medical Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
065. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure UK King's Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
066. Improve Building Systems UK King's Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
067. Construct/Improve Building Systems Hamburg
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
068. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems UK King's Daughters
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

84 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
069. Improve Parking/Transportation Systems UK King's Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
070. Improve Clinical/Ambulatory Services Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
071. Construct/Improve Recreation Services Space 1
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 100,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
072. Construct/Improve Research Space
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
073. Construct/Improve Athletics Facility 1
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 100,000,000 -0-
074. Improve Student Center Space 2
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 100,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
075. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 3
Restricted Funds -0- 100,000,000 -0-
076. Construct Equine/Horticulture Campus
Restricted Funds -0- 90,000,000 -0-
077. Improve Gatton Business and Economics Building
Restricted Funds -0- 45,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds -0- 45,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 90,000,000 -0-
078. Improve Oswald Building
Restricted Funds -0- 88,500,000 -0-
079. Improve Chemistry/Physics Building
Restricted Funds -0- 88,000,000 -0-
080. Improve 4-H Camps
Restricted Funds -0- 80,000,000 -0-
081. Improve Fine Arts Building
Restricted Funds -0- 80,000,000 -0-
082. Improve King Library
Restricted Funds -0- 80,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 85
083. Improve Patterson Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 80,000,000 -0-
084. Improve Kastle Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 80,000,000 -0-
085. Improve Taylor Education Building
Restricted Funds -0- 80,000,000 -0-
086. Acquire Furnishings/Equipment UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
087. Construct/Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure Hamburg
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
088. Construct/Improve Service Core Systems Hamburg
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
089. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
090. Improve Markey Cancer Center Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
091. Improve Building Systems UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
092. Construct Agriculture Research Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
093. Acquire Equipment/Furnishings Pool - Campus
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
094. Construct Agriculture Research Facility 3
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
095. Improve Center for Applied Energy Research Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
096. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 4
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
097. Upgrade/Renovate/Expand Research Labs
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
098. Improve Funkhouser Building
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
099. Construct/Improve Alumni Center
Restricted Funds -0- 75,000,000 -0-
100. Construct/Improve Greek Housing
Restricted Funds -0- 36,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 36,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 72,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

86 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
101. Improve Willard Medical Education/Science Building
Restricted Funds -0- 70,000,000 -0-
102. Improve Lexington Theological Seminary Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 70,000,000 -0-
103. Construct/Improve CAFE Farm 2
Restricted Funds -0- 60,000,000 -0-
104. Construct/Improve Childcare Development Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 55,000,000 -0-
105. Construct/Improve Administrative/Support Building
Restricted Funds -0- 55,000,000 -0-
106. Construct Tennis Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 27,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 27,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 54,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
107. Improve Campus Core Quadrangle Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 54,000,000 -0-
108. Acquire Land
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
109. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 6
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
110. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 7
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
111. Acquire/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 6
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
112. Improve Medical Pavilion UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
113. Improve IT/Enterprise Systems 1
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
114. Improve Business Services Center UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
115. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
116. Improve Building Systems UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
117. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
118. Improve UK Good Samaritan Hospital Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 87
119. Construct/Improve Ambulatory Care
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
120. Construct/Improve Patient Support Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
121. Construct Agriculture Research Facility - Phase 2
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
122. Improve Research Data Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
123. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 5
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
124. Improve Student Services Space
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
125. Improve Health Sciences Research Building
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
126. Improve Angliana Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
127. Improve Kroger Field 4
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
128. Purchase/Construct CO2 Capture Process Plant
Restricted Funds -0- 1,500,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 40,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 8,500,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
129. Improve Seaton Center
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
130. Decommission Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
131. Improve Kroger Field 3
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
132. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

88 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
133. Improve Arboretum Complex
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
134. Construct/Relocate/Replace Greenhouses
Restricted Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
135. Improve Jacobs Science Building
Restricted Funds -0- 48,000,000 -0-
136. Improve McVey Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 48,000,000 -0-
137. Improve Gray Design Building
Restricted Funds -0- 45,000,000 -0-
138. Improve Memorial Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 45,000,000 -0-
139. Research Equipment Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 45,000,000 -0-
140. Construct/Improve Library Depository Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 45,000,000 -0-
141. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Resource Planning System
Restricted Funds -0- 40,000,000 -0-
142. Construct/Improve Recreation Services Space 2
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 40,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
143. Construct/Improve Student Success/Academic Facility 1
Restricted Funds -0- 40,000,000 -0-
144. Improve Building Shell Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 40,000,000 -0-
145. Construct Teaching Pavilion
Restricted Funds -0- 38,000,000 -0-
146. Improve Academic Technical Building
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
147. Improve Whalen Building and Bay Facility (Kentucky Advanced Manufacturing)
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
148. Construct/Improve Recreation Quad
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
149. Construct Support Services Building
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 89
150. Improve Moloney Building
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
151. Improve Building Mechanical Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
152. Expand Kentucky Geological Survey Well Sample and Core Repository
Restricted Funds -0- 35,000,000 -0-
153. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 6
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
154. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 5
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
155. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 4
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
156. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 3
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
157. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 2
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
158. Lease/Purchase Medical Facility/Practice 1
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
159. Improve Medical Facility 9
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
160. Improve Medical Facility 6
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
161. Improve Medical Facility 5
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
162. Improve Medical Facility 4
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
163. Improve Medical Facility 8
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
164. Improve Medical Facility 18
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
165. Improve Medical Facility 17
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
166. Improve Medical Facility 16
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
167. Improve Medical Facility 15
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
168. Improve Medical Facility 14
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

90 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
169. Improve Medical Facility 13
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
170. Improve Medical Facility 12
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
171. Improve Medical Facility 11
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
172. Improve Medical Facility 10
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
173. Improve Medical Facility 7
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
174. Improve Stuckert Career Center
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
175. Construct/Improve CAFE Farm 1
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
176. Improve Enterprise Networking 1
Restricted Funds -0- 30,000,000 -0-
177. Improve Electrical Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 28,000,000 -0-
178. Improve Library Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 27,000,000 -0-
179. Improve Mechanical Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 26,000,000 -0-
180. Improve IT/Enterprise Systems 3
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
181. Improve IT/Enterprise Systems 2
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
182. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 5
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
183. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 4
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
184. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 3
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
185. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 2
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
186. Acquire/Improve Clinical Facility/Practice 1
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
187. Implement Patient Communication System
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
188. Construct/Improve Wellness Trial

CHAPTER 168 91
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
189. Construct Meats/Food Development Center Phase 2
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
190. Construct/Improve Transformative Learning Center
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
191. Improve Peterson Service Building
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
192. Improve Barnhart Building
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
193. Improve Enterprise Networking 2
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
194. Lease/Purchase Enterprise IT Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
195. Improve Student Center Space 3
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
196. Improve W.T. Young Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
197. Improve Critical Infrastructure Building Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
198. Improve Life Safety
Restricted Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
199. Improve Campus Security and Safety Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
200. Improve Health Park UK King's Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
201. Improve Site/Civil Infrastructure UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
202. Improve Medical Pavilion UK King's Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
203. Construct UK HealthCare Medical Transport Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
204. Improve Campus Security and Safety
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
205. Acquire/Improve Data/Infrastructure Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
206. Construct/Improve Recreation/Services Space 3
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

92 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
TOTAL -0- 20,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
207. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 2 Design
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
208. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 1 Design
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
209. Lease/Purchase Campus IT System
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
210. Construct/Improve Machine Lab
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
211. Improve White Hall Classroom Building
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
212. Improve Athletics Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
213. Acquire/Improve IT Systems/Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
214. Improve Academic Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
215. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Network Security
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
216. Construct Police Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
217. Acquire/Improve Service Core Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
218. Improve Hilary J. Boone Center
Restricted Funds -0- 18,000,000 -0-
219. Improve Lancaster Aquatic Center 1
Restricted Funds -0- 17,000,000 -0-
220. Improve Medical Center Library
Restricted Funds -0- 17,000,000 -0-
221. Construct/Improve Student Success/Academic Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
222. Construct/Improve UK HealthCare Hamburg Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
223. Acquire Data Center and Networking Hardware UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
224. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 3 Design
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
225. Improve Boone Tennis Center

CHAPTER 168 93
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
226. Construct/Improve Athletics Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
227. Acquire Equipment/Furnishings Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
228. Improve Spindletop Hall Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
229. Construct/Fit-up Retail Space
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 15,000,000 -0-
230. Improve Athletics Facility 3
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
231. Improve Multi-Disciplinary Science Building
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
232. Lease/Purchase High Performance Computer
Restricted Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
233. Improve CAFE Motor Pool Building
Restricted Funds -0- 14,000,000 -0-
234. Construct Agriculture Federal Research Facility II
Federal Funds -0- 14,000,000 -0-
235. Construct Metal Arts/Digital Media Building
Restricted Funds -0- 14,000,000 -0-
236. Improve Baseball Facility Phase II
Restricted Funds -0- 14,000,000 -0-
237. Improve Patterson Office Tower
Restricted Funds -0- 12,000,000 -0-
238. Improve University Storage Facility 1
Restricted Funds -0- 12,000,000 -0-
239. Acquire/Improve Clinical/Research Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 11,000,000 -0-
240. Acquire Telemedicine/Virtual Intensive Care Unit
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
241. Renovate/Improve Nursing Units UK HealthCare
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
242. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 4 Design
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
243. Improve Parking Structure 2 Enterprise Data Center
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

94 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
244. Improve University Storage Facility 2
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
245. Improve Soccer/Softball Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
246. Improve Campus Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
247. Improve Fume Hood Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
248. Improve Scovell Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
249. Improve Lancaster Aquatic Center 2
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
250. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
251. Improve Enterprise Cable Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
252. Improve Senior Center
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
253. Construct/Improve Gymnastics Practice Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
254. Improve Memorial Coliseum
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
255. Improve Athletics Facility 4
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
256. Improve Pence Hall
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
257. Improve Division of Laboratory Animal Resources Facilities
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
258. Improve Building Electrical Systems
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
259. ADA Compliance Pool
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
260. Improve Kroger Field 1 Additional Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Other Funds)
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
261. Improve Anderson Tower
Restricted Funds -0- 9,000,000 -0-
262. Improve Mineral Industries Building
Restricted Funds -0- 9,000,000 -0-

CHAPTER 168 95
263. Improve Carnahan House
Restricted Funds -0- 8,000,000 -0-
264. Acquire/Improve Golf Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 8,000,000 -0-
265. Construct/Improve Academic/Administrative Facility 5 Design
Restricted Funds -0- 7,500,000 -0-
266. Improve Medical Plaza
Restricted Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
267. Improve Nutter Training Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
268. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Voice Infrastructure
Restricted Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
269. Renovate Space for a Testing Center
Restricted Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
270. Improve Nursing Building
Restricted Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
271. Lease/Purchase Enterprise Call Center System
Restricted Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
272. Improve Medical Behavioral Science Building
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
273. Improve Athletics Facility 6
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
274. Improve Athletics Facility 5
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
275. Improve Joe Craft Center
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
276. Improve Joe Craft Football Practice Facility
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 6,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
277. Improve Cooper House
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
278. Acquire Data Center and Networking Hardware UK St. Claire
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
279. Acquire Data Center and Networking Hardware UK King’s Daughters
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
280. Construct/Improve Recreational Playing Surfaces
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

96 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
281. Construct Athletics Hall of Fame
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
282. Improve Sturgill Development Building
Restricted Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
283. Replace Basketball Playing Floors
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
284. Improve Athletics Facility 7
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
285. Acquire Transportation Buses
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
286. Improve Indoor/Outdoor Track
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
287. Construct Cross Country Trail
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
288. Construct/Improve Athletics Surfaces 2
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
289. Construct/Improve Athletics Surfaces 1
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
290. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 3 Reauthorization ($800,000,000 Agency Bonds)
291. Asset Preservation Pool - 2024-2026 Reauthorization ($30,862,000 Agency Bonds)
292. Construct Academic Building Reauthorization ($149,000,000 Restricted Funds)
293. Construct/Improve Medical/Administrative Facility 1 Reauthorization ($300,000,000 Restricted Funds,
$500,000,000 Other Funds)
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
294. Construct Health Education Building Reauthorization ($50,000,000 Agency Bonds)
295. Lease - Off Campus 1
296. Lease - Off Campus 3
297. Lease - Off Campus 4
298. Lease - Off Campus 5
299. Lease - Off Campus 6
300. Lease - Off Campus 7
301. Lease - Off Campus 11
302. Lease - Off Campus 12
303. Lease - Off Campus 13
304. Lease - Off Campus 14
305. Lease - Off Campus 15
306. Lease - Off Campus 16
307. Lease - Off Campus 17

CHAPTER 168 97
308. Lease - Off Campus 18
309. Lease - Off Campus 19
310. Lease - Off Campus 20
311. Lease - Off Campus 21
312. Lease - Off Campus 22
313. Lease - Off Campus 23
314. Lease - Off Campus 24
315. Lease - Off Campus 25
316. Lease - Off Campus 26
317. Lease - Off Campus Housing 1
318. Lease - Off Campus Housing 2
319. Lease - Health Science Colleges 1
320. Lease - Health Science Colleges 2
321. Lease - Health Science Colleges 3
322. Lease - Off Campus Athletics 1
323. Lease - Off Campus Athletics 2
324. Lease - Health Affairs Office 3
325. Lease - Health Affairs Office 4
326. Lease - Health Affairs Office 10
327. Lease - Health Affairs Office 12
328. Lease - Health Affairs Office 14
329. Lease - Health Affairs Office 15
330. Lease - Health Affairs Office 18
331. Lease - Health Affairs Office 19
332. Lease - Health Affairs Office 20
333. Lease - Health Affairs Office 21
334. Lease - Health Affairs Office 22
335. Lease - Health Affairs Office 24
336. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 2
337. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 3
338. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 5
339. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 12
340. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 13
341. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 14
342. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 15
343. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 16
344. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 17
345. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 18
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

98 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
346. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 19
347. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 20
348. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 21
349. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 22
350. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 23
351. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 24
352. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 25
353. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 26
354. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 27
355. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 28
356. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 29
357. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 30
358. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 31
359. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 32
360. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 33
361. Lease - Off Campus 2
362. Lease - College of Medicine 1
363. Lease - College of Medicine 2
364. Lease - Health Affairs Office 1
365. Lease - Health Affairs Office 2
366. Lease - Health Affairs Office 5
367. Lease - Health Affairs Office 6
368. Lease - Health Affairs Office 7
369. Lease - Health Affairs Office 8
370. Lease - Health Affairs Office 9
371. Lease - Health Affairs Office 11
372. Lease - Health Affairs Office 13
373. Lease - Health Affairs Office 16
374. Lease - Health Affairs Office 17
375. Lease - Health Affairs Office 23
376. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 1
377. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 4
378. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 6
379. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 7
380. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 8
381. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 9
382. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 10
383. Lease - UK HealthCare Off Campus Facility 11
384. Lease - Off Campus 8

CHAPTER 168 99
385. Lease - Off Campus 9
386. Lease - Off Campus 10
387. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 1
388. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 2
389. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 3
390. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 4
391. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 6
392. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 7
393. Lease - UK HealthCare Royal Blue Health 8
394. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts - UK HealthCare
395. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
8. UNIVERSITY OF LOUISVILLE
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 12,077,000
002. Construct Resident Hall Public-Private Partnership
Other Funds -0- 250,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763 and 45A.077.
003. Construct Athletics Village
Other Funds -0- 150,000,000 -0-
004. Construct STEM Building
Bond Funds -0- 142,000,000 -0-
005. Construct Medical Sciences Research Building
Other Funds -0- 70,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
006. Construct Center for Bioscience
Federal Funds -0- 70,000,000 -0-
007. Construct Center for Military Health/Biology
Federal Funds -0- 70,000,000 -0-
008. Construct Natatorium
Other Funds -0- 60,000,000 -0-
009. Renovate New Vision of Health Building
Federal Funds -0- 60,000,000 -0-
010. Construct Cybersecurity Center with Enhanced Internet Capabilities
Federal Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 60,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
011. Replace Building Mechanical, Electrical and Plumbing
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

100 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Other Funds -0- 50,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
012. Structural Improvement Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds -0- 40,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
013. Construct Center for AI Excellence
Other Funds -0- 29,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
014. Expand Basketball/Lacrosse Practice Facility
Other Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
015. Renovate Cardinal Football Stadium
Other Funds -0- 25,000,000 -0-
016. Construct Indoor Facility
Other Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
017. Expand Patterson Stadium/Construct Indoor Facility
Other Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
018. Construct Resident Hall and Visitor Development
Agency Bonds -0- 160,000,000 -0-
019. Purchase Land Additional Reauthorization ($10,000,000 Agency Bonds)
Other Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
020. Expand Ulmer Stadium/Construct Indoor Facility
Other Funds -0- 15,000,000 -0-
021. Construct Kentucky Center for Precision Medicine
Federal Funds -0- 12,500,000 -0-
022. Enhance Workday Financial Management Software
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
023. Enhance Research Computing Infrastructure
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
024. Enhance Content Management System
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
025. Renovate L&N Arena
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
026. Update, Replace Technology in Athletic Venues
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
027. Update Green Health Sciences Center Courtyard

CHAPTER 168 101
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
028. Campus Code Improvement Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
029. Replace Cardinal Stadium Seats
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
030. Renovate Cardinal Park
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
031. Expand and Renovate Wright Natatorium
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
032. Athletic Venue Capital Renewal Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
033. Expand and Renovate Marshall Center Complex
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
034. Replace Electronic Video Boards
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
035. Construct Defense Supply Chain Security System
Federal Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
036. Construct/Renovate Kentucky Center for Precision Medicine Data and Analytical Systems
Federal Funds -0- 9,326,000 -0-
037. Construct/Renovate Kentucky Center for Precision Medicine Equipment
Federal Funds -0- 8,000,000 -0-
038. Renovate Cardinal Stadium Club
Other Funds -0- 7,500,000 -0-
039. Construct Athletics Office Building
Other Funds -0- 7,500,000 -0-
040. Replace Seats in Athletic Venues
Other Funds -0- 7,000,000 -0-
041. Purchase Network System Enhancements
Other Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
042. Renovate and Update Student/Athlete Dormitory
Other Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
043. Enhance Security and Firewall System
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
044. Enhance Computer Processing and Storage
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

102 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
045. Expand and Renovate Tailgate Space
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
046. Expand and Renovate Athletic Parking Lots
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
047. Renovate Gross Anatomy Lab
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
048. Demolish and Construct Golf Maintenance/Chemical Building
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
049. Renovate Bass Rudd Tennis Center
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
050. Construct Practice Bubble
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
051. Renovate Lynn Soccer Stadium
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
052. Renovate Trager Football Practice Facility
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
053. Renovate Patterson Baseball Stadium
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
054. Renovate Thornton's Academic Center
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
055. Construct Athletic Grounds Building
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
056. Construct Football Practice Field Lighting
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
057. Upgrade Regional Biocontainment Laboratories
Federal Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
058. Construct Building for Self-Contained Internet Access Point
Federal Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
059. Construct Exit Ramp at Chestnut Street Garage
Other Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
060. Enhance Workday Human Resources Software
Other Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
061. Update and Replace Equipment in ACCN Studio
Other Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
062. Renovate and Expand ACCN Studio

CHAPTER 168 103
Other Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
063. Renovate Garvin Brown Boathouse
Other Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
064. Renovate Parking Structures
Other Funds -0- 3,600,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
065. Purchase Fiber Infrastructure
Other Funds -0- 3,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
066. Install Signage, Wayfinding, and Landscaping
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
067. Expand, Replace and Maintain Grass Practice Fields
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
068. Replace Fiber Pathway from ACCN Studio to Venues
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
069. Renovate and Expand Lee Street Facility
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
070. College of Education Academic Renovation Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
071. Renovate Golf Clubhouse - Shelby County
Other Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
072. Upgrade Plumbing and Sanitary Lines - Dental School
Other Funds -0- 2,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
073. Resurface and Repair Parking Lot
Other Funds -0- 2,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
074. Construct Belknap Stormwater Mitigation Improvements
Other Funds -0- 2,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
075. ADA Building Upgrade Pool - 2026-2028
Other Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
076. Build Out Space for UofL Departments
Other Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

104 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
077. Replace Artificial Turf Field V
Other Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
078. Replace Artificial Turf Field IV
Other Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
079. Renovate Interfaith Center
Other Funds -0- 1,500,000 -0-
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763.
080. Construct Belknap 3rd St & Brandeis Corridor Improvements
Restricted Funds -0- 1,112,000 -0-
081. Renovate Exterior Envelope Replacement - 55A Reauthorization ($20,000,000 Agency Bonds)
082. Construct Connector Speed School to Research Park Reauthorization ($10,000,000 Agency Bonds)
083. Renovate College of Business Academic Space Reauthorization ($15,000,000 Agency Bonds)
084. Asset Preservation - 2024-2026 Reauthorization ($8,638,000 Agency Bonds)
085. Construct Resident Hall Reauthorization ($80,000,000 Agency Bonds)
086. Construct Health Sciences Simulation Center and Collaboration Hub Reauthorization ($20,000,000
Agency Bonds)
087. Construct Student Commons and Recreational Fields Reauthorization ($12,000,000 Agency Bonds)
088. Modernize Steam and Chill Water Plant Reauthorization ($40,000,000 Agency Bonds)
089. Lease - Medical Center One
090. Lease - Nucleus 1 Building
091. Lease - University Point
092. Lease - Cardinal Towne
093. Lease - The Nine at Louisville
094. Lease - Province Apartments
095. Lease - Trager Institute
096. Lease - 1212 S 4th Street, Louisville, KY
097. Lease - Liberty Green Community Center
098. Lease - West Kentucky Community and Technical College
099. Lease - Denny Crum Hall
100. Lease - Soccer Stadium
101. Lease - Founders Square
102. Lease - Rowan Building - A&S Fine Arts
103. Lease - Academic Space 1
104. Lease - Academic Space 2
105. Lease - Arthur Street - Tafel Building
106. Lease - Athletic/Student Dormitory
107. Lease - Housing Facilities
108. Lease - Housing 1
109. Lease - Housing 2

CHAPTER 168 105
110. Lease - Housing 3
111. Lease - Housing 4
112. Lease - Jefferson County Clinic Space - State of Kentucky
113. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space 1
114. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space 2
115. Lease - Jefferson County - Clinic Space 3
116. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 1
117. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 2
118. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 3
119. Lease - Jefferson County - Office Space 4
120. Lease - Medical Center One 2
121. Lease - Nucleus 1 Building 2
122. Lease - Support Space 1
123. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
9. WESTERN KENTUCKY UNIVERSITY
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds- 0- 10,000,000 9,158,000
002. Residential Halls Public-Private Partnership
Other Funds 350,000,000 -0- 200,000,000
(1) Authorization: The above authorization is approved pursuant to KRS 45.763 and 45A.077.
003. Acquire Furniture, Fixtures, and Equipment - Media
Restricted Funds -0- 20,000,000 -0-
004. Renovate Center for Research and Development Phase I
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 12,000,000 -0-
005. Renovate Space for Exercise Science Program
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
006. Renovate and Expand Clinical Education Complex
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
007. Remove and Replace Student Housing at Farm
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
008. Install Additional Club Seating at Diddle Arena
Other Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
009. Capital Renewal Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
010. Construct Permanent Seating at Houchens Industries – L.T. Smith Stadium
Agency Bonds -0- 10,000,000 -0-
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

106 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
011. Acquire Fixtures, Furniture, and Equipment - College of Health and Human Services
Restricted Funds -0- 8,000,000 -0-
012. Expand Track and Field Facilities
Other Funds -0- 6,500,000 -0-
013. Renovate South Campus
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
014. Construct Baseball Grandstand
Other Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
015. Construct State Street Plaza
Restricted Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
016. Acquire Furniture, Fixtures, and Equipment Diddle Arena
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
017. Construct South Plaza
Other Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
018. Acquire Furniture, Fixtures, and Equipment Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
019. Upgrade Softball/Soccer Facilities and Field
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
Other Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 4,000,000 -0-
020. Renovate Owensboro Campus for the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist (CRNA) Program
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
021. Renovate Medical Center Health Complex for the Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist (CRNA)
Program
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
022. Purchase Property/Parking and Street Improvements
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
023. Purchase Property for Campus Expansion
Restricted Funds -0- 3,000,000 -0-
024. Renovate State/Normal Street Properties
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
025. Replace Retractable Seating at Diddle Arena
Restricted Funds -0- 1,000,000 -0-
026. Replace Field Lighting at Nick Denes Field
Restricted Funds -0- 1,000,000 -0-
027. Construct Parking Structure IV Reauthorization ($35,000,000 Agency Bonds)
028. Lease - Alumni Center
029. Lease - Parking Garage
030. Lease - Nursing/Physical Therapy

CHAPTER 168 107
031. Lease - Campus Flats
032. Guaranteed Energy Savings Performance Contracts
10. KENTUCKY COMMUNITY AND TECHNICAL COLLEGE SYSTEM
001. Asset Preservation Pool - 2026-2028
Bond Funds -0- 10,000,000 24,798,000
002. Construct Student Services Building Downtown Phase I - Jefferson CTC
Agency Bonds -0- 47,300,000 -0-
003. Construct Prison Education Program - Bluegrass CTC
Bond Funds -0- 42,000,000 -0-
004. Procure Aviation Equipment - Madisonville CC
Bond Funds -0- 6,000,000 -0-
005. Property Acquisition Pool - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
006. KCTCS Property Acquisition Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 5,000,000 -0-
007. KCTCS Equipment Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds -0- 2,500,000 -0-
Federal Funds -0- 2,500,000 -0-
TOTAL -0- 5,000,000 -0-
008. Construct District 4 Training Space - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds -0- 4,200,000 -0-
009. Construct District 5 Training Space - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds -0- 4,200,000 -0-
010. Acquire Harrison County ATC - Maysville CTC
Restricted Funds -0- 4,000,000 -0-
011. Construct District 14 Storage Space - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds -0- 3,400,000 -0-
012. Improve Exterior Southwest Phase I - Jefferson CTC
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
013. Procure Training Equipment - Fire Commission
Restricted Funds -0- 2,000,000 -0-
014. Install Exterior Signage - West Kentucky CTC
Restricted Funds -0- 1,200,000 -0-
015. Renovate Broadway Building Facade - Jefferson CTC
Restricted Funds -0- 1,200,000 -0-
016. Construct Multicultural Center Atrium Enclosure - Jefferson CTC Reauthorization ($3,000,000
Restricted Funds)
017. Asset Preservation Pool - 2022-2024 Reauthorization ($26,890,000 Restricted Funds)
018. Lease - Jefferson CTC - Bullitt County Campus
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

108 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
019. Lease - Jefferson CTC - Jefferson Education Center
K. PUBLIC PROTECTION CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
1. HOUSING, BUILDINGS AND CONSTRUCTION
001. Modernize Application System Reauthorization ($3,588,000 Restricted Funds)
L. TOURISM, ARTS AND HERITAGE CABINET
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
1. SECRETARY
001. Northern Kentucky Convention Center Renovation and Expansion
Restricted Funds 18,000,000 -0-
Agency Bonds 40,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 58,000,000 -0-
(1) Procurement Authority: Notwithstanding any statute or administrative regulation to the contrary, the
Northern Kentucky Convention Center Corporation, created under KRS 154.90-010, is authorized to act on behalf of
the Commonwealth in lieu of the Finance and Administration Cabinet for all planning, design, procurement,
construction execution and administration, and completion activities for the renovation and modernization for the
Northern Kentucky Convention Center. The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall maintain
authority to determine any protests or controversies under KRS 45A.285 with respect to the project.
2. ARTISANS CENTER
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 500,000 500,000
3. PARKS
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 10,000,000 10,000,000
002. JJ Audubon New Conference Center Reauthorization ($7,500,000 Bond Funds) and Reauthorization
and Reallocation ($2,800,000 Bond Funds)
(1) Reauthorization and Reallocation: The above Bond Funds in the amount of $2,800,000 are
authorized from a reauthorization and reallocation of the project set forth in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part II, J., 2., 002.
4. HORSE PARK COMMISSION
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 1,500,000 1,500,000
5. STATE FAIR BOARD
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 3,000,000 3,000,000
6. FISH AND WILDLIFE RESOURCES
001. Fees-in-Lieu-of Stream Mitigation Projects Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 64,500,000 48,600,000
002. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Restricted Funds 1,500,000 1,500,000
Federal Funds 1,500,000 1,500,000
TOTAL 3,000,000 3,000,000

CHAPTER 168 109
003. Construct Western Kentucky Fish Hatchery
Restricted Funds 33,528,000 -0-
004. Construct Indoor Gun Range and Law Enforcement Training Facility
Restricted Funds 2,000,000 -0-
Federal Funds 18,000,000 -0-
TOTAL 20,000,000 -0-
(1) Project Use: The facility shall be multi-use for all law enforcement agencies to the extent allowable by
federal law.
7. HISTORICAL SOCIETY
001. Kentucky Old State Capitol Preservation Additional Reauthorization ($2,185,000 Bond Funds,
$169,000 Other Funds)
Investment Income 5,023,000 -0-
8. KENTUCKY CENTER FOR THE ARTS
001. Maintenance Pool - 2026-2028
Investment Income 550,000 550,000
PART III
GENERAL PROVISIONS
1. Funds Designations: Restricted Funds designated in the biennial budget bills are classified in the state
financial records and reports as the Agency Revenue Fund, State Enterprise Funds (State Parks, State Fair Board,
Insurance Administration, and Kentucky Horse Park), Internal Services Funds (Fleet Management, Computer
Services, Correctional Industries, Central Printing, Risk Management, and Property Management), and selected
Fiduciary Funds (Other Expendable Trust Funds). Separate fund records and reports shall be maintained in a manner
consistent with the branch budget bills.
The sources of Restricted Funds appropriations in this Act shall include all fees (which includes fees for room
and board, athletics, and student activities) and rentals, admittances, sales, bond proceeds, licenses collected by law,
gifts, subventions, contributions, income from investments, and other miscellaneous receipts produced or received by
a budget unit, except as otherwise specifically provided, for the purposes, use, and benefit of the budget unit as
authorized by law. Restricted Funds receipts shall be credited and allotted to the respective fund or account out of
which a specified appropriation is made in this Act. All receipts of Restricted Funds shall be deposited in the State
Treasury and credited to the proper account as provided in KRS Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48.
The sources of Federal Funds appropriations in this Act shall include federal subventions, grants, contracts, or
other Federal Funds received, income from investments, other miscellaneous federal receipts received by a budget
unit, and the Unemployment Compensation Fund, except as otherwise provided, for the purposes, use, and benefit of
the budget unit as authorized by law. Federal Funds receipts shall be credited and allotted to the respective fund
account out of which a specified appropriation is made in this Act. All Federal Funds receipts shall be deposited in
the State Treasury and credited to the proper account as provided in KRS Chapters 12, 42, 45, and 48.
2. Expenditure of Excess Restricted Funds or Federal Funds Receipts: If receipts received or credited
to the Restricted Funds accounts or Federal Funds accounts of a budget unit during fiscal year 2026-2027 or fiscal
year 2027-2028, and any balance forwarded to the credit of these same accounts from the previous fiscal year, exceed
the appropriation made by a specific sum for these accounts of the budget unit as provided in Part I, Operating
Budget, of this Act, for the fiscal year in which the excess occurs, the excess funds in the accounts of the budget unit
shall become available for expenditure for the purpose of the account during the fiscal year only upon compliance
with the conditions and procedures specified in KRS 48.400, 48.500, 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, 48.630, 48.730,
and 48.800, and with the authorization of the State Budget Director and approval of the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet.
Prior to authorizing the appropriation of any excess, unbudgeted Restricted Funds pursuant to this section, the
State Budget Director and the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall review the adequacy of the
General Fund Surplus Account with respect to its availability to support authorized expenditures from the General
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

110 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Fund Surplus Account, known as Necessary Government Expenses. If General Fund Surplus Account moneys are
determined by this review to be adequate to meet known or anticipated Necessary Government Expenses during
fiscal year 2026-2027 or fiscal year 2027-2028, respectively, then the appropriation increase may be approved. If the
review indicates that there are insufficient funds available or reasonably estimated to become available to the General
Fund Surplus Account to meet known or projected Necessary Government Expenses for the fiscal years enumerated
above, the State Budget Director and the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may disapprove the
request for additional Restricted Funds expenditure authority and may direct the excess Restricted Funds identified to
the General Fund Surplus Account in order to meet Necessary Government Expense obligations. The results of any
review shall be reported to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue in accordance with KRS
48.400, 48.500, 48.600, 48.605, 48.610, 48.620, 48.630, 48.730, and 48.800.
Any request made by a budget unit pursuant to KRS 48.630 that relates to Restricted Funds or Federal Funds
shall include documentation showing a comparative statement of revised estimated receipts by fund source and the
proposed expenditures by proposed use, with the appropriated sums specified in the Budget of the Commonwealth,
and statements which explain the cause, source, and use for any variances which may exist.
Notwithstanding KRS 48.630(2), any request for allotment of unbudgeted appropriations from any fund source
shall be made in writing 30 days in advance of any allotment revision by the head of the budget unit and transmitted
simultaneously to the State Budget Director and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. The
State Budget Director shall report all approved revisions of unbudgeted appropriations to the Interim Joint Committee
on Appropriations and Revenue within 14 days of the revision. This report shall include analysis, including but not
limited to the amount, necessity, remaining unbudgeted funds, and anticipated future needs for unbudgeted funds.
Each budget unit shall submit its reports in print and electronic format consistent with the Restricted Funds
and Federal Funds records contained in the fiscal biennium 2026-2028 Branch Budget Request Manual and according
to the following schedule in each fiscal year: (a) on or before the beginning of each fiscal year; (b) on or before
October 1; (c) on or before January 1; and (d) on or before April 1.
3. Interim Appropriation Increases: No appropriation from any fund source shall exceed the sum
specified in this Act until the agency has documented the necessity, purpose, use, and source, and the documentation
has been submitted to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue at least 30 days in advance for its
review and action in accordance with KRS 48.630 and Section 2. of this Part. Proposed revisions to an appropriation
contained in the enacted State/Executive Branch Budget or allotment of an unbudgeted appropriation shall conform
to the conditions and procedures of KRS 48.630 and this Act.
4. Revision of Appropriation Allotments: Allotments within appropriated sums for the activities and
purposes contained in the enacted State/Executive Branch Budget shall conform to KRS 48.610 and may be revised
pursuant to KRS 48.605 and this Act.
5. Permitted Appropriation Obligations: No state agency, cabinet, department, office, or program shall
incur any obligation against the General Fund or Road Fund appropriations contained in this Act unless the obligation
may be reasonably determined to have been contemplated in the enacted State/Executive Branch Budget and is based
upon supporting documentation considered by the General Assembly and legislative and executive records.
6. Lapse of General Fund or Road Fund Appropriations Supplanted by Federal Funds:
Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any General Fund appropriation made in anticipation of a lack, loss, or reduction of
Federal Funds shall lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) to the extent the Federal Funds
otherwise become available. Any Road Fund appropriation made in anticipation of a lack, loss, or reduction of
Federal Funds shall lapse to the Road Fund Surplus Account to the extent the Federal Funds otherwise become
available.
7. Federally Funded Agencies: A state agency entitled to Federal Funds, which would represent 100
percent of the cost of a program, shall conform to KRS 48.730.
8. Lapse of General Fund or Road Fund Excess Debt Service Appropriations: Notwithstanding KRS
48.720, any excess General Fund debt service shall lapse to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705)
unless otherwise directed in this Act. Pursuant to KRS 48.720, any excess Road Fund debt service shall lapse to the
Road Fund Surplus Account unless otherwise directed in this Act.
9. Statutes in Conflict: All statutes and portions of statutes in conflict with any of the provisions of this
Act, to the extent of the conflict, are suspended unless otherwise provided by this Act, and any question arising shall
be decided by the Attorney General.

CHAPTER 168 111
10. Interpretation of Appropriations: Notwithstanding KRS 48.500, all questions that arise in
interpreting this Act and the Transportation Cabinet Budget shall be decided by the Attorney General, and the
decision of the Attorney General shall be final and conclusive.
11. Publication of the Budget of the Commonwealth: The State Budget Director shall cause the
Governor's Office for Policy and Management, within 60 days of adjournment of the 2026 Regular Session of the
General Assembly, to publish a final enacted budget document, styled the Budget of the Commonwealth, based upon
the Legislative Branch Budget, State/Executive Branch Budget, Transportation Cabinet Budget, and Judicial Branch
Budget as enacted by the 2026 Regular Session, as well as other Acts which contain appropriation provisions for the
2026-2028 fiscal biennium, and based upon supporting documentation and legislative records as considered by the
2026 Regular Session. This document shall include, for each agency and budget unit, a consolidated budget summary
statement of available regular and continuing appropriated revenue by fund source, corresponding appropriation
allocations by program or subprogram as appropriate, budget expenditures by principal budget class, and any other
fiscal data and commentary considered necessary for budget execution by the Governor's Office for Policy and
Management and oversight by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. The enacted
State/Executive Branch Budget and Transportation Cabinet Budget shall be revised or adjusted only upon approval
by the Governor's Office for Policy and Management as provided in each Part of this Act and by KRS 48.400 to
48.810, and upon review and approval by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
12. State Financial Condition: Pursuant to KRS 48.400, the State Budget Director shall monitor and
report on the financial condition of the Commonwealth.
13. Prorating Administrative Costs: The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet is
authorized to establish a system or formula or a combination of both for prorating the administrative costs of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, the Department of the Treasury, and the Office of the Attorney General relative
to the administration of programs in which there is joint participation by the state and federal governments for the
purpose of receiving the maximum amount of participation permitted under the appropriate federal laws and
regulations governing the programs. The receipts and allotments under this section shall be reported to the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue prior to any transfer of funds.
14. Construction of Budget Provisions Regarding Executive Reorganization Orders: Nothing in this
Act shall be construed to confirm or ratify, under KRS 12.028, any executive reorganization order unless the
executive order was confirmed or ratified by appropriate amendment to the Kentucky Revised Statutes in another Act
of the 2026 Regular Session of the General Assembly.
15. Executive Orders: (1) For the purpose of ensuring transparent government, the Governor shall
provide a comprehensive report to the Legislative Research Commission simultaneously with each and every
executive order issued pertaining to:
(a) Authorizing the expenditure of state funds over $10,000;
(b) Establishing or altering the organization of state agencies;
(c) Establishing or altering the services provided by state government; or
(d) Establishing a new program or altering an existing program administered by state government.
(2) The comprehensive report shall contain the following items:
(a) A complete statement of each essential fact upon which the order is based;
(b) A complete statement of each goal sought through issuance of the order;
(c) A comprehensive analysis explaining how the executive order achieves each stated goal with the least
burden placed upon the constitutional rights of the citizens of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and how each stated
goal is accomplished with the most efficient use of taxpayer money;
(d) A detailed estimate of the anticipated expenditures of all state funds and all state employee time
required for implementation or enforcement itemized in the smallest categories reasonably identifiable and stated in
weekly increments; and
(e) A detailed statement of all state funds and all state employee time actually expended for implementation
or enforcement of each and every prior executive order upon the same issue or event or substantially similar issue or
event itemized in the smallest categories reasonably identifiable and stated in weekly increments.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

112 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
Each comprehensive report shall be updated every 30 days subsequent to issuance of an executive order and
shall be provided to the Legislative Research Commission.
(3) Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, except as provided in this Act, no state funds or state
employee time shall be expended by any person or agency to implement or enforce any executive order issued other
than as authorized by KRS Chapters 39A to 39F, as amended by 2021 Regular Session SB 1 and further amended by
subsequent acts of the 2021 General Assembly, or other than as may be implemented or enforced for a total sum not
exceeding $100,000, inclusive of all state employee time and costs, or other than as may relate to an emergency order
issued relative to a natural disaster, or other than as may be approved by the General Assembly.
16. Tax Expenditure Revenue Loss Estimates: By September 1 of each fiscal year, the Office of State
Budget Director shall provide to each branch of government detailed estimates for the General Fund and Road Fund
for the current and next two fiscal years of the revenue loss resulting from tax expenditures. The Department of
Revenue shall provide assistance and furnish data, which is not restricted by KRS 131.190. "Tax expenditure" as used
in this section means an exemption, exclusion, or deduction from the base of a tax, a credit against the tax, a deferral
of a tax, or a preferential tax rate. The estimates shall include for each tax expenditure the amount of revenue loss, a
citation of the legal authority for the tax expenditure, the year in which it was enacted, and the tax year in which it
became effective.
17. Duplicate Appropriations: Any appropriation item and sum in Parts I to X of this Act and in an
appropriation provision in any Act of the 2026 Regular Session which constitutes a duplicate appropriation shall be
governed by KRS 48.312.
18. Priority of Individual Appropriations: KRS 48.313 shall control when a total or subtotal figure in
this Act conflicts with the sum of the appropriations of which it consists.
19. Severability of Budget Provisions: Appropriation items and sums in Parts I to X of this Act shall
conform to KRS 48.311. If any section, any subsection, or any provision is found by a court of competent jurisdiction
in a final, unappealable order to be invalid or unconstitutional, the decision of the courts shall not affect or impair any
of the remaining sections, subsections, or provisions.
20. Unclaimed Lottery Prize Money: For fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028, all unclaimed
lottery prize money under KRS 154A.110(3) shall be credited to the Kentucky Educational Excellence Scholarship
Reserve Account to be held as a subsidiary account within the Finance and Administration Cabinet for the purpose of
funding the KEES Program as appropriated in this Act. If the Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority
certifies to the State Budget Director that the appropriations in this Act for the KEES Program under the existing
award schedule are insufficient to meet funds required for eligible applicants, then the State Budget Director shall
provide the necessary allotment of funds in the balance of the KEES Reserve Account to fund the KEES Program.
Actions taken under this section shall be reported to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on
a timely basis.
21. Workers' Compensation: Notwithstanding KRS 342.340(1) and 803 KAR 25:021, Section 4, the
Personnel Cabinet shall be exempt from procuring excess risk insurance in fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year
2027-2028 for the Workers' Compensation Benefits and Reserve Program administered by the Cabinet.
22. Carry Forward and Undesignated General Fund and Road Fund Carry Forward:
Notwithstanding KRS 48.700 and 48.705, and other Parts of this Act, the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall determine and certify, within 30 days of the close of fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal
year 2026-2027, the actual amount of undesignated balance of the General Fund and the Road Fund for the year just
ended. The amounts from the undesignated fiscal year 2025-2026 and fiscal year 2026-2027 General Fund and Road
Fund balances that are designated and carried forward for budgeted purposes in the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium shall
be determined by the State Budget Director during the close of the respective fiscal year and shall be reported to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue within 30 days of the close of the fiscal year. Any General
Fund undesignated balance in excess of the amount designated for budgeted purposes under this section shall be
made available for the General Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan contained in Part VII of this Act unless otherwise
provided in this Act. The Road Fund undesignated balance in excess of the amount designated for budgeted purposes
under this section shall be made available for the Road Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan contained in Part IX of this
Act unless otherwise provided in this Act.
23. Budget Implementation: The General Assembly directs the Executive Branch to carry out all
appropriations and budgetary language provisions as contained in the State/Executive Branch Budget. The
Legislative Research Commission shall review quarterly expenditure data to determine if an agency is out of
compliance with this directive. If the Legislative Research Commission suspects that any entity has acted in non-

CHAPTER 168 113
conformity with this section, the Legislative Research Commission may order an audit or review at the agency's
expense. Such audit findings, reviews, and reports shall be subject to the Kentucky Open Records Act. The Secretary
of each Cabinet, the Commissioner of Education, or agency head shall provide, in the form and manner prescribed by
the Legislative Research Commission, a comprehensive annual report, beginning September 1, 2026, to the Interim
Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue detailing expenditures related to the appropriations contained within
the budgetary language provisions for each budget unit within their cabinet. If an agency does not expend the full
General Fund or Road Fund appropriations contained within a budgetary language provision, the unexpended funds
shall be transferred to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund Account (KRS 48.705) or the Road Fund Surplus Account
(KRS 48.710), respectively.
24. Appropriations Expenditure Purpose and Transfer Restrictions: Funds appropriated in this Act
shall be expended only for the purposes specified and authorized by the General Assembly in this Act. No funds
appropriated in this Act shall be transferred to or between any cabinet, department, board, commission, institution,
agency, or budget unit of state government unless specifically authorized by the General Assembly in this Act and
KRS 48.400 to 48.810. Semiannually, beginning February 1, 2027, the State Budget Director shall submit a letter to
the Legislative Research Commission certifying any known violations of any provision of this section for that six-
month period or any prior six-month period. Compliance with the provisions of this section shall be reviewed and
determined by the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.
25. Information Technology: All authorized computer information technology projects shall submit a
semiannual progress report to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee and the Information Technology
Oversight Committee. The reporting process shall begin six months after the project is authorized and shall continue
through completion of the project. The initial report shall establish a timeline for completion and cash disbursement
schedule. Each subsequent report shall update the timeline and budgetary status of the project and explain in detail
any issues with completion date and funding.
26. Equipment Service Contracts and Energy Efficiency Measures: The General Assembly mandates
that the Finance and Administration Cabinet review all equipment service contracts to maximize savings to the
Commonwealth to strictly adhere to the provisions of KRS 56.772, 56.782, and 56.784 in maximizing the use of
energy efficiency measures.
27. Debt Restructuring: Notwithstanding any other provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, no
General Fund or Road Fund debt restructuring transactions shall be undertaken during the 2026-2028 fiscal biennium.
28. Effects of Subsequent Legislation: If any measure enacted during the 2026 Regular Session of the
General Assembly subsequent to this Act contains an appropriation or is projected to increase or decrease General
Fund revenues, the amount in the Budget Reserve Trust Fund shall be revised to accommodate the appropriation or
the reduction or increase in projected revenues. Notwithstanding any provision of KRS 48.120(3) and (4) to the
contrary, the official enacted revenue estimates of the Commonwealth described in KRS 48.120(4) shall be adjusted
at the conclusion of the 2026 Regular Session of the General Assembly, respectively, to incorporate any projected
revenue increases or decreases that will occur as a result of actions taken by the General Assembly subsequent to the
passage of this Act by both chambers.
29. Permitted Use of Water and Sewer Bond Funds: Notwithstanding Part II, (3) of this Act and any
statute to the contrary, any balances remaining for either closed or open project grant agreements authorized pursuant
to bond pools set forth in 2003 Ky. Acts ch. 156, Part II, A., 3., d. Water and Sewer Resources Development Fund for
Tobacco Counties and e. Water and Sewer Resources Development Fund For Coal Producing Counties; 2005 Ky.
Acts ch. 173, Part II, A., 3., 003. Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Coal-Producing Counties and
004. Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Tobacco Counties; 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 252, Part II, A., 2.,
003. Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund for Non-Coal Producing Counties and 004. Infrastructure for
Economic Development Fund for Coal-Producing Counties; 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 123, Section 3., 004. Infrastructure for
Economic Development Fund for Coal-Producing Counties and 005. Infrastructure for Economic Development Fund
for Non-Coal Producing Counties; 2008 Ky. Acts ch. 174, Section 2.; and 2009 Ky. Acts ch. 87, Section 2. shall not
lapse and shall remain to the credit of projects previously authorized by the General Assembly unless expressly
reauthorized and reallocated by action of the General Assembly.
30. Approval of State Aircraft Travel: Notwithstanding KRS 45.101, 174.508, and any other statute or
administrative regulation to the contrary, the use of state aircraft by any secretary or other state official of any
Executive Branch cabinet for out-of-state travel shall be approved by the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall
only approve requests which document that the use of state aircraft is the lowest cost option as measured by both
travel costs and travel time. The State Treasurer shall not designate approval authority for out-of-state travel on state
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

114 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
aircraft by Executive Branch cabinet secretaries or other state officials to any other person. Any requests and
documentation regarding the use of state aircraft collected by the State Treasurer shall be subject to the Kentucky
Open Records Act, KRS 61.870 to 61.884.
31. Electronic Access to Budget Information: In accordance with KRS 48.950, the State Budget Director
shall continue to work cooperatively with the Legislative Research Commission to provide relevant budgetary
information in a timely manner. To ensure that this information is transmitted in its most useful format, the State
Budget Director shall provide electronic versions of all documents requested by the Legislative Research
Commission in an editable format in order for documents to be manipulated without the use of specialized software.
Electronic access shall also include the ability to access and view, but not edit, documents contained in KBUD and all
related or successor budgetary systems of record.
32. Motor Vehicles: Notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, no agency, department, air pollution
control district, or political subdivision of the Commonwealth, including the Transportation Cabinet, shall mandate
the purchase of electric vehicles, and no Request for Proposal shall limit purchasing of vehicles to solely electric
vehicles.
33. Fiscal Year 2027-2028 Funds Expenditure Restriction: Except in the case of a declared emergency,
the Governor, all agency heads, and all other constitutional officers shall not expend or encumber in the aggregate
more than 50 percent of the funds appropriated by this Act during the first half of fiscal year 2027-2028.
34. Operating Expense Reduction: (1) The State Auditor has identified that in fiscal year 2024-2025
the Executive Branch spent $365,118,727 on the following expense codes:
(a) Employee Training - State Employee Only (E133) $6,718,307;
(b) Advertising Services (E147) $9,362,940;
(c) Temporary Manpower Services (E191) $69,770,650;
(d) Advertising (E255) $29,692,913;
(e) Services Not Otherwise Classified (E257) $51,802,056;
(f) Expenses Related to Trade Shows (E259) $4,605,317;
(g) Food Products (E341) $5,369,478;
(h) Subscriptions (E353) $3,273,091;
(i) In-State Travel (E361) $23,278,869;
(j) Out of State Travel (E362) $7,438,490;
(k) Travel for Non-State Employees (E363) $3,983,338;
(l) Dues (E381) $10,336,469; and
(m) Other (E399) $118,383.22.
(2) The State Budget Director, the Secretary of the Executive Cabinet, and the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet shall take the necessary steps to reduce the expenses for the Executive Branch, in codes E361
and E362, in the fourth fiscal quarter of fiscal year 2025-2026. The State Budget Director shall also submit a written
report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue by August 1, 2026, concerning the Executive
Branch expenditures assigned to these codes for fiscal year 2025-2026.
(3) In order to implement the 2026 General Assembly's policy and fiscal directives of the contained in Part
I, Operating Budget, of this Act, it will be necessary for the Executive Branch to reduce the operating cost of each
agency. To accomplish this policy directive, unless otherwise directed by State or Federal Law or required by Court
Order, the State Budget Director, the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, and the Secretary of the
Personnel Cabinet shall take the necessary steps to reduce, modify, or eliminate the expenditures of state agencies in
the following priority order:
(a) Temporary Manpower Services personnel and contracts;
(b) Advertising Services and other advertising costs, by requiring that the prior written approval of the
Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet be secured before any expense is incurred in these code areas;
(c) Out-of-state travel should require and receive prior written approval of the Secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet;

CHAPTER 168 115
(d) Practice of providing food and meals that cost more than is set out in the in-state travel guideline
allowance for employees attending meetings, unless the prior written approval of the State Budget Director has been
secured;
(e) Prior written approval of the agency head for any conference, meeting, or event that will require in-state
travel of 20 employees or more;
(f) Prior written approval of the agency head for any expense that will be charged to the eMARS code
E257 (Services Not Otherwise Classified), code E399 (Other), or code E259 (Expenses Related to Trade Shows);
(g) Abolishment of positions that have remained vacant for six months;
(h) Moratorium on all discretionary salary increases; and
(i) Reduction, modification, or elimination of programs or services not required by state or federal law or
regulation.
(4) Quarterly, beginning June 15, 2026, the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the
State Budget Director shall provide a written report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue
on the actions taken to implement the policy and fiscal directives provided in this Part. That report shall contain at
least the following:
(a) A listing of all prior approvals granted that are required by subsection (3)(b), (c), (d), (e), and (f) of this
section;
(b) A comparison of the charges processed to the codes listed in subsection (1) of this section between the
past month of the current fiscal year and the same month of the previous fiscal year; and
(c) The identification of any other policy decisions, directives, or actions taken by the Executive Branch in
the past month to reduce the operating cost of programs, services, or activities of the Executive Branch.
35. Operational Expenditures Data: The head of each budget unit shall, by October 1, 2026, submit a
report to the Legislative Oversight and Investigations Committee and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations
and Revenue with the following information and data pertaining to the historical and projected operational
expenditures for each budget unit:
(1) Identifying information of the budget unit; and
(2) A description of each program, function, service, or benefit provided by the budget unit, including but
not limited to the following:
(a) Measurable outcome data for the program, function, service, or benefit provided in fiscal year 2025-
2026 and projected for fiscal years 2026–2027 and 2027–2028 for programs, functions, services, or benefits that are
statutorily mandated;
(b) Measurable outcome data for the program, function, service, or benefit provided in fiscal year 2025-
2026 and projected for fiscal years 2026–2027 and 2027–2028 for programs, functions, services, or benefits that are
not statutorily mandated;
(c) Identification of any contracts or grants with other state budget units or external providers engaged to
provide or assist in providing the program, function, service, or benefit in fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, or
2027-2028;
(d) The number of full-time, part-time, and other filled positions assigned to the program, function, service,
or benefit on July 1 of each fiscal year;
(e) The number and projected cost of all temporary manpower service personnel assigned to the program,
function, service, or benefit as of July 1 each fiscal year;
(f) The actual expenditures, by fund source, for each program, function, service, or benefit for fiscal year
2025-2026;
(g) The projected expenditures, by fund source, by fiscal year, for each program, function, service, or
benefit for fiscal years 2026-2027 and 2027-2028; and
(h) The actual balance of any Restricted Funds or Agency Trust Funds assigned to the program, function,
service, or benefit as of July 1, 2026, and projected to be on July 1, 2027, and July 1, 2028.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

116 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
The information shall be submitted only in a format prescribed by the Legislative Oversight and Investigations
Committee.
The head of each budget unit shall, within 30 days, provide any follow-up or additional information on the
programs, functions, services, or benefits provided by the budget unit requested by the Legislative Research
Commission or a subcommittee thereof.
36. Control of Deadly Weapons: Notwithstanding KRS 237.115, during the period of the 2026-2028 fiscal
biennium and the ongoing renovation of the State Capitol and associated facilities in Frankfort, the General Assembly
shall have the authority to regulate, restrict, or prohibit the carrying of deadly weapons, whether concealed or
unconcealed, within the buildings or portions of buildings controlled, occupied, or inhabited by the Legislative
Branch.
37. Quarter Horse Racing Acquisition and Infrastructure: The Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming
Corporation, with the approval of the Kentucky Quarter Horse Racing Association, may utilize funds as established
by KRS 230.405 and regulated by 810 KAR 7:080 to purchase the rights to a Grade I Quarter Horse race. Any race
acquired under this section shall be conducted at a licensed track or association within the Commonwealth of
Kentucky, and all rights shall vest in the Kentucky Quarter Horse Racing Association.
A track or association located within the Commonwealth of Kentucky that offers a Grade I Quarter Horse race
shall be authorized, upon approval by the Kentucky Quarter Horse Racing Association, to seek and receive funds
from the Kentucky Horse Racing and Gaming Corporation. These funds shall be utilized for infrastructure reasonably
necessary to ensure the safety and integrity of the race meets.
Total expenditures authorized under this section shall not exceed 20 percent of the total current receipts of the
fund established by KRS 230.405. All such funds shall be appropriated by the Corporation no later than March 1,
2027.
PART IV
STATE SALARY/COMPENSATION, BENEFIT, AND EMPLOYMENT POLICY
1. Authorized Personnel Complement: On July 1, 2026, and July 1, 2027, the Personnel Cabinet and the
Office of State Budget Director shall establish a record for each budget unit of authorized permanent full-time and
other positions based upon the enacted State/Executive Branch Budget of the Commonwealth and any adjustments
authorized by provisions in this Act. The total number of filled permanent full-time and all other positions shall not
exceed the authorized complements pursuant to this section. An agency head may request an increase in the number
of authorized positions to the State Budget Director. Upon approval of the State Budget Director, the Secretary of the
Personnel Cabinet may authorize the employment of individuals in addition to the authorized complement. A report
of the actions authorized in this section shall be provided to the Legislative Research Commission on a monthly
basis.
2. Salary Increment: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.355, relating to anniversary date, and notwithstanding
KRS 156.808(6)(e) and 163.032(1), a two percent salary increase is provided, effective July 1, 2026, and a two
percent salary increase is provided, effective July 1, 2027, on the base salary or wages of each eligible state
employee.
3. Employee Cross-Reference: The Personnel Cabinet may permit married couples who are both eligible
to participate in the state health insurance plan to be covered under one family health benefit plan.
4. Full-Time Positions: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.005(18)(a), full-time positions in the state parks,
where the work assigned is dependent upon fluctuations in tourism, may be assigned work hours from 25 hours per
week and remain in full-time positions.
5. Employer Retirement Contribution Rates: Notwithstanding KRS 61.565 and 61.702, the employer
contribution rates for Kentucky Employees Retirement System from July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2028, and except
as otherwise provided in this Act, shall be 18.83 percent, consisting of 18.83 percent for pension for hazardous duty
employees; for the same period, the employer contribution for employees of the State Police Retirement System shall
be 54.33 percent, consisting of 51.84 percent for pension and 2.49 percent for health insurance. Notwithstanding any
other provision of this Act or KRS 61.565 or 61.702 to the contrary, the initial actuarially accrued liability employer
contribution rate for fiscal year 2026-2027 and for fiscal year 2027-2028, for nonhazardous employees in the
Executive Branch departments shall be determined by the State Budget Director by May 1 prior to the beginning of
each fiscal year. The employer contribution rate shall include the normal cost contribution of 7.76 percent and be
sufficient to adhere to the prorated amount of the actuarially accrued liability to each individual nonhazardous
employer as determined by the Kentucky Employees Retirement System. The rates in this section apply to wages and

CHAPTER 168 117
salaries earned for work performed during the described period regardless of when the employee is paid for the time
worked.
6. Health Care Spending Account: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.2254(2)(a) and (b), if a public employee
waives coverage provided by his or her employer under the Public Employee Health Insurance Program, the
employer shall forward a monthly amount to be determined by the Secretary of the Personnel Cabinet for that
employee as an employer contribution to a health reimbursement account or a health flexible spending account, but
not less than $175 per month, subject to any conditions or limitations imposed by the Secretary of the Personnel
Cabinet to comply with applicable federal law. The administrative fees associated with a health reimbursement
account or health flexible spending account shall be an authorized expense to be charged to the Public Employee
Health Insurance Trust Fund.
7. State Group Health Insurance Plan - Transfer Between Plan Years: Notwithstanding KRS
18A.2254, the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Secretary of the Personnel Cabinet are
authorized to use the excess funds from any prior plan year to satisfy claims or expenses in Plan Year 2022, Plan
Year 2023, Plan Year 2024, and Plan Year 2025.
8. State Group Health Insurance Plan - Plan Year Closure: Notwithstanding KRS 18A.2254, Plan
Year 2021 shall be considered closed as of June 30, 2026, and the balance from that Plan Year shall be transferred to
Plan Year 2022. All other income and expenses attributable to the closed Plan Year shall be deposited in or charged
to the Plan Year 2022 account after that date.
9. Mandated Health Coverage: Employer and employee contributions made to the Kentucky Employees
Health Plan Trust Fund for Plan Years 2027 and 2028 are sufficient to implement and carry out the provisions of
2024 Ky. Acts ch. 75 and 97.
PART V
FUNDS TRANSFER
The General Assembly finds that the financial condition of state government requires the following action.
Notwithstanding the statutes or requirements of the Restricted Funds enumerated below, there is transferred to
the General Fund the following amounts in fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028:
2026-27 2027-28
A. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
1. Environmental Protection
Insurance Administration Fund 24,000,000 26,000,000
(KRS 224.60-130, 224.60-140, 224.60-145, and 224.60-150)
B. HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES CABINET
1. General Administration and Program Support
Medical Cannabis Agency Fund -0- 10,400,000
C. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
1. Criminal Justice Training
Criminal Justice Training 2,368,000 2,368,000
(KRS 15.430 and 136.392(2))
Notwithstanding KRS 15.430 and 136.392(2), these funds transfers to the General Fund support the General
Fund debt service for the capital project in 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Part II, H., 2., 002.
TOTAL - FUNDS TRANSFER 26,368,000 38,768,000
PART VI
GENERAL FUND BUDGET REDUCTION PLAN
Pursuant to KRS 48.130 and 48.600, a General Fund Budget Reduction Plan is enacted for state government in
the event of an actual or projected revenue shortfall in General Fund revenue receipts, excluding Tobacco Settlement
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

118 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
– Phase I receipts, of $15,498,900,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026, $15,882,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and
$16,232,200,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028, as modified pursuant to Part III, 28. of this Act and by related Acts and
actions of the General Assembly in any subsequent extraordinary or regular session. Notwithstanding KRS 48.130,
direct services, obligations essential to the minimum level of constitutional functions, and other items that may be
specified in this Act, are exempt from the requirements of this Plan. Each branch head shall prepare a specific plan to
address the proportionate share of the General Fund revenue shortfall applicable to the respective branch. No budget
revision action shall be taken by a branch head in excess of the actual or projected revenue shortfall.
The Governor, the Secretary of State, the Attorney General, the Treasurer, the Commissioner of Agriculture,
the Auditor of Public Accounts, the Chief Justice, and the Legislative Research Commission shall direct and
implement reductions in allotments and appropriations only for their respective branch budget units as may be
necessary, as well as take other measures which shall be consistent with the provisions of this Part and biennial
branch budget bills.
Pursuant to KRS 48.130(4), in the event of a revenue shortfall of five percent or less, the following General
Fund budget reduction actions shall be implemented:
(1) The Local Government Economic Assistance Fund and the Local Government Economic Development
Fund shall be adjusted by the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet to equal revised estimates of
receipts pursuant to KRS 42.4582 as modified by the provisions of this Act;
(2) Transfers of excess unappropriated Restricted Funds, notwithstanding any statutes to the contrary, other
than fiduciary funds, to the General Fund shall be applied as determined by the head of each branch for its respective
budget units. No transfers to the General Fund shall be made from the following:
(a) Local Government Economic Assistance Fund and Local Government Economic Development Fund;
(b) Unexpended debt service from the Tobacco-Settlement Phase I Funds, including but not limited to
unexpended debt service and the Tobacco Unbudgeted Interest Income-Rural Development Trust Fund, in either
fiscal year; and
(c) The Kentucky Permanent Pension Fund;
(3) Lapse unexpended debt service;
(4) Any unanticipated Phase I Master Settlement Agreement revenues in both fiscal years shall be
appropriated according to Part X of this Act and shall not be transferred to the General Fund;
(5) Use of the unappropriated balance of the General Fund surplus shall be applied;
(6) Any language provision that expresses legislative intent regarding a specific appropriation shall not be
reduced by a greater percentage than the reduction to the General Fund appropriation for that budget unit;
(7) Lapse contributions appropriated to pensions in excess of statutory requirements;
(8) Lapse contributions appropriated to pension insurance in excess of actuarially required contributions;
(9) Reduce General Fund appropriations in Executive Branch agencies' operating budget units by a
sufficient amount to balance either fiscal year. No reductions of General Fund appropriations shall be made from the
Local Government Economic Assistance Fund or the Local Government Economic Development Fund;
(10) Notwithstanding subsection (9) of this Part, no reductions shall be made to the Secretary of State, the
Attorney General, the Treasurer, the Commissioner of Agriculture, or the Auditor of Public Accounts, or their
offices, Commonwealth's Attorneys or their offices, or County Attorneys or their offices. The Governor may request
their participation in a budget reduction; however, the level of participation shall be at the discretion of the
Constitutional Officer or the Prosecutors Advisory Council, and shall not exceed the actual percentage of revenue
shortfall;
(11) Excess General Fund appropriations which accrue as a result of personnel vacancies and turnover, and
reduced requirements for operating expenses, grants, and capital outlay shall be determined and applied by the heads
of the executive, judicial, and legislative departments of state government for their respective branches. The branch
heads shall certify the available amounts which shall be applied to budget units within the respective branches and
shall promptly transmit the certification to the Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the
Legislative Research Commission. The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall execute the
certified actions as transmitted by the branch heads.

CHAPTER 168 119
Branch heads shall take care, by their respective actions, to protect, preserve, and advance the fundamental
health, safety, legal and social welfare, and educational well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth;
(12) Pursuant to KRS 48.130 and 48.600, if the actions contained in subsections (1) to (11) of this Part are
insufficient to eliminate an actual or projected General Fund revenue shortfall, then the Governor is empowered and
directed to take necessary actions with respect to the Executive Branch budget units to balance the budget by such
actions conforming with the criteria expressed in this Part; and
(13) Within 15 days of the enactment of a General Fund Budget Reduction Plan, the Secretary of each
cabinet, the Commissioner of Education, or the head of each agency, shall submit a report to the Interim Joint
Committee on Appropriations and Revenue detailing the plan for implementation of the reduction, including any
personnel actions, programmatic changes, or other measures necessary to achieve the required reduction.
PART VII
GENERAL FUND SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
(1) Notwithstanding KRS 48.130(7), 48.140(3), 48.700, and 48.705, there is established a plan for the
expenditure of General Fund surplus moneys pursuant to a General Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan contained in this
Part for fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-2028. Pursuant to the enactment of the Surplus Expenditure
Plan, General Fund moneys made available for the General Fund Surplus Expenditure Plan pursuant to Part III,
General Provisions, Section 22. of this Act are appropriated to the following:
(a) Expenditures without a sum-specific appropriation amount, known as Necessary Government Expenses,
as authorized in Part I of this Act;
(b) The entire remaining amount to the Budget Reserve Trust Fund; and
(c) No surplus moneys in any fiscal year shall be reserved for Necessary Government Expenses in a
subsequent fiscal year.
(2) The Secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall determine, within 30 days after the close
of each fiscal year, based on the official financial records of the Commonwealth, the amount of actual General Fund
undesignated fund balance for the General Fund Surplus Account that may be available for expenditure pursuant to
the Plan in fiscal year 2026-2027 and fiscal year 2027-2028. The Secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet shall certify the amount of actual General Fund undesignated fund balance available for expenditure to the
Legislative Research Commission.
PART VIII
ROAD FUND BUDGET REDUCTION PLAN
There is established a Road Fund Budget Reduction Plan for fiscal years 2025-2026, 2026-2027, and 2027-
2028. Notwithstanding KRS 48.130(1) and (3) relating to statutory appropriation adjustments related to the revenue
sharing of motor fuels taxes, in the event of an actual or projected revenue shortfall in Road Fund revenue receipts of
$1,844,000,000 in fiscal year 2025-2026, $1,836,000,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027, and $1,909,400,000 in fiscal year
2027-2028, as modified by related Acts and actions of the General Assembly in an extraordinary or regular session,
the Governor shall implement sufficient reductions as may be required to protect the highest possible level of service.
Within 15 days of the enactment of a Road Fund Budget Reduction Plan, the Secretary of each cabinet or the
head of each agency shall submit a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue detailing
the plan for implementation of the reduction, including any personnel actions, programmatic changes, or other
measures necessary to achieve the required reduction.
PART IX
ROAD FUND SURPLUS EXPENDITURE PLAN
Notwithstanding KRS 48.110, 48.140, and 48.710, there is established a plan for the expenditure of the Road
Fund Surplus Account. All moneys in the Road Fund Surplus Account shall be appropriated to the State Construction
Account within the Highways budget unit and utilized to support projects in the 2026-2028 Biennial Highway
Construction Program.
PART X
PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

120 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(1) General Purpose: This Part prescribes the policy implementing aspects of the national settlement
agreement between the tobacco industry and the collective states as described in KRS 248.701 to 248.727. In
furtherance of that agreement, the General Assembly recognizes that the Commonwealth of Kentucky is a party to the
Phase I Master Settlement Agreement (MSA) between the Participating Tobacco Manufacturers and 46 Settling
States which provides reimbursement to states for smoking-related expenditures made over time.
(2) State's MSA Share: The Commonwealth’s share of the MSA is equal to 1.7611586 percent of the total
settlement amount. Payments under the MSA are made to the states annually in April of each year.
(3) MSA Payment Amount Variables: The total settlement amount to be distributed on each payment
date is subject to change pursuant to several variables provided in the MSA, including inflation adjustments, volume
adjustments, previously settled states adjustments, and the nonparticipating manufacturers adjustment.
(4) Distinct Identity of MSA Payment Deposits: The General Assembly has determined that it shall be
the policy of the Commonwealth that all Phase I Tobacco Settlement payments shall be deposited to the credit of the
General Fund and shall maintain a distinct identity as Phase I Tobacco Settlement payments that shall not lapse to the
credit of the General Fund surplus but shall continue forward from each fiscal year to the next fiscal year to the extent
that any balance is unexpended.
(5) MSA Payment Estimates and Adjustments: Based on the official estimates of the Consensus
Forecasting Group, the amount of MSA payments expected to be received in fiscal year 2026-2027 is $82,800,000
and in fiscal year 2027-2028 is $77,400,000. It is recognized that payments to be received by the Commonwealth are
estimated and are subject to change. If MSA payments received are less than the official estimates, appropriation
reductions shall be applied as follows: after exempting appropriations for debt service, the Attorney General, and the
Department of Revenue, 50 percent to the Agricultural Development Fund, 30 percent to the Early Childhood
Development Fund, and 20 percent to the Health Care Improvement Fund. If MSA payments received exceed the
official estimates, appropriation increases shall be applied as follows: after exempting appropriations for debt service,
the Attorney General, and the Department of Revenue, 50 percent to the Agricultural Development Fund, 30 percent
to the Early Childhood Development Fund, and 20 percent to the Health Care Improvement Fund.
a. Lapse and Reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund Appropriations: Notwithstanding
KRS 194A.055, 200.151, 248.654, and any statute to the contrary, $6,500,000 in General Fund (Tobacco) settlement
agreement funds previously appropriated from the Early Childhood Development Fund to the General Administration
and Program Support budget unit within the Education and Labor Cabinet for the benefit of the Early Childhood
Advisory Council shall lapse to the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund established in KRS 248.654.
b. State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of $150,000 of the MSA
payments in each fiscal year is appropriated to the Attorney General for the state’s diligent enforcement of
noncompliant nonparticipating manufacturers.
c. State Enforcement: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), a total of $250,000 of the MSA
payments in each fiscal year is appropriated to the Finance and Administration Cabinet, Department of Revenue for
the state's diligent enforcement of noncompliant nonparticipating manufacturers.
d. Debt Service: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), $14,100,200 in MSA payments in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $13,880,900 in MSA payments in fiscal year 2027-2028 are appropriated to the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, Debt Service budget unit.
e. Agricultural Development Initiatives: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), $38,086,500 in
MSA payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $35,197,600 in MSA payments in fiscal year 2027-2028 are
appropriated to the Kentucky Agricultural Development Fund to be used for agricultural development initiatives as
specified in this Part.
f. Early Childhood Development Initiatives: Notwithstanding KRS 248.654, $21,018,100 in MSA
payments and lapsed funds from previously appropriated MSA payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $19,999,700
in MSA payments and lapsed funds from previously appropriated MSA payments in fiscal year 2027-2028 are
appropriated to the Early Childhood Development Initiatives as specified in this Part.
g. Health Care Initiatives: Notwithstanding KRS 164.476, 248.654, and 304.17B-003(5), $13,570,200 in
MSA payments and lapsed funds from previously appropriated MSA payments in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$10,046,800 in MSA payments and lapsed funds from previously appropriated MSA payments in fiscal year 2027-
2028 are appropriated to the Health Care Improvement Fund for health care initiatives as specified in this Part.
A. STATE ENFORCEMENT

CHAPTER 168 121
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), appropriations for state enforcement shall be as follows:
1. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Attorney General 150,000 150,000
2. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Revenue 250,000 250,000
B. DEBT SERVICE
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), appropriations for debt service shall be as follows:
1. FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Debt Service 14,100,200 13,880,900
(1) Debt Service: To the extent that revenues sufficient to support the required debt service appropriations
are received from the Tobacco Settlement Program, those revenues shall be made available from those accounts to
the appropriate account of the General Fund. All necessary debt service amounts shall be appropriated from the
General Fund and shall be fully paid regardless of whether there is a sufficient amount available to be transferred
from tobacco-supported funding program accounts to other accounts of the General Fund.
(2) Appropriation of Unexpended Tobacco Debt Service: Any unexpended balance from the fiscal year
2026-2027 or fiscal year 2027-2028 General Fund (Tobacco) debt service appropriation in the Finance and
Administration Cabinet, Debt Service budget unit, shall continue and be appropriated to the Department of
Agriculture, Kentucky Office of Agricultural Policy.
C. AGRICULTURAL DEVELOPMENT APPROPRIATIONS
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654 and 248.703(4), appropriations for Agricultural Development shall be as
follows:
1. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Agriculture 35,426,900 32,739,700
(1) Tobacco Settlement Funds - Allocations: Notwithstanding KRS 248.711(2), and from the allocation
provided therein, counties that are allocated in excess of $20,000 annually may provide up to four percent of the
individual county allocation, not to exceed $15,000 annually, to the county council in that county for administrative
costs.
(2) Counties Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $11,777,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $10,884,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the counties
account as specified in KRS 248.703(1)(a).
(3) State Account: Notwithstanding KRS 248.703(1), included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $21,876,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $20,216,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the state account
as specified in KRS 248.703(1)(b).
(4) Farms to Food Banks Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$886,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $819,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Farms to Food Banks
Program. The use of the moneys provided by this appropriation shall be restricted to purchases of Kentucky-grown
produce and protein from Kentucky farmers who participate in the Farms to Food Banks Program.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

122 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(5) Kentucky Rural Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety Program: Included in the
above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $886,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $819,300 in fiscal year 2027-
2028 to support the Kentucky Rural Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety Program known as the
Raising Hope Initiative. The Department of Agriculture shall enhance awareness of the National Suicide Prevention
Lifeline (988) in rural communities in Kentucky, improve access to information on rural mental health issues and
available treatment services, provide outreach, and provide other necessary services to improve the mental health
outcomes of rural communities in Kentucky. The Farm Safety and Rural Health Division, at its discretion, may
receive, accept, and solicit grants, contributions of money, property, labor, or other things of value from any
governmental agency, individual, nonprofit organization, or private business to be used for the Kentucky Rural
Mental Health, Suicide Prevention, and Farm Safety Program. The Department of Agriculture may utilize up to
$150,000 of the appropriation amount in each fiscal year for program administration purposes. The Department of
Agriculture shall coordinate with the Raising Hope Initiative to take custody of and maintain any intellectual property
assets that were created or developed by any state agency in connection with the Raising Hope Initiative.
The Department of Agriculture’s Office of Agricultural Marketing shall submit a comprehensive annual report
to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue and the Tobacco Settlement Agreement Fund
Oversight Committee no later than November 1 of each fiscal year. At a minimum, the report shall include:
(a) An accounting of all expenditures by fund source;
(b) A detailed accounting of all administrative expenses;
(c) The total amount expended on grants, loans, and benefits;
(d) A detailed accounting of all expenses not otherwise classified;
(e) Identification of any unexpended funds and the reason why the funds were not expended; and
(f) An explanation of how all expenditures align with program objectives.
The Division Director of the Farm Safety and Rural Health Division and the Executive Director of the
Kentucky Office of Agricultural Marketing shall provide a program update to the Tobacco Settlement Agreement
Fund Oversight Committee in November of each fiscal year.
2. ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENT CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Natural Resources 2,659,600 2,457,900
(1) Environmental Stewardship Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation
is $1,773,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,638,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Environmental Stewardship
Program.
(2) Conservation District Local Aid: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$886,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $819,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Division of Conservation to provide
direct aid to local conservation districts.
TOTAL - AGRICULTURAL 38,086,500 35,197,600
APPROPRIATIONS
D. EARLY CHILDHOOD DEVELOPMENT
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 248.654, appropriations for Early Childhood Development shall be as follows:
1. GENERAL GOVERNMENT
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Auditor of Public Accounts 500,000 -0-
(1) Certified Child Care Services Report: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 to study the applicable statutes, administrative regulations, and agency policies
and processes that directly impact the opening and operation of licensed and certified child care services in the
Commonwealth. This appropriation is from the lapse and reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund
appropriations.

CHAPTER 168 123
2. EDUCATION AND LABOR CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. General Administration and Program Support 1,063,800 983,200
(1) Early Childhood Development: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$1,063,800 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $983,200 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Early Childhood Advisory
Council.
3. CABINET FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
a. Community Based Services 10,195,200 9,421,900
(1) Early Childhood Development Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $8,422,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $7,783,300 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Early
Childhood Development Program.
(2) Early Childhood Adoption and Foster Care Supports: Included in the above General Fund
(Tobacco) appropriation is $1,773,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,638,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Early
Childhood Adoption and Foster Care Supports Program.
2026-27 2027-28
b. Public Health 7,606,600 7,029,500
(1) HANDS Program, Healthy Start, Early Childhood Mental Health, and Early Childhood Oral
Health: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $5,301,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and
$4,899,400 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Health Access Nurturing Development Services (HANDS) Program,
$620,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $573,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Healthy Start initiatives, $620,600 in
fiscal year 2026-2027 and $573,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Early Childhood Mental Health, $620,600 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 for Early Childhood Oral Health, and $443,300 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $983,100 in fiscal year
2027-2028 for Lung Cancer Screening.
c. Behavioral Health, Developmental and 2026-27 2027-28
Intellectual Disabilities Services 1,152,500 1,065,100
(1) Substance Abuse Prevention and Treatment: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco)
appropriation is $1,152,500 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,065,100 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for substance abuse
prevention and treatment for pregnant women with a history of substance abuse problems.
4. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. University of Kentucky 500,000 1,500,000
(1) Kindergarten Readiness Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$500,000 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,500,000 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to establish the Kindergarten Readiness
Performance-Based Child-Care Incentive Pilot Program. This appropriation is from the lapse and reallocation of
Early Childhood Development Fund appropriations.
TOTAL - EARLY CHILDHOOD 21,018,100 19,999,700
APPROPRIATIONS
E. HEALTH CARE IMPROVEMENT APPROPRIATIONS
GENERAL FUND - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT FUNDS
Notwithstanding KRS 164.476, 248.654 and 304.17B-003(5), appropriations for health care improvement shall
be as follows:
1. CABINET FOR HEALTH AND FAMILY SERVICES
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

124 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
a. Public Health 1,773,100 1,638,600
(1) Smoking Cessation Program: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$1,773,100 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $1,638,600 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for Smoking Cessation.
2. JUSTICE AND PUBLIC SAFETY CABINET
Budget Unit 2026-27 2027-28
a. Justice Administration 2,881,200 2,662,700
(1) Office of Drug Control Policy: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$2,659,600 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $2,457,900 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for the Office of Drug Control Policy.
(2) Restorative Justice: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $221,600 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 and $204,800 in fiscal year 2027-2028 to support the Restorative Justice Program administered by
the Volunteers of America.
3. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION
Budget Units 2026-27 2027-28
a. Council on Postsecondary Education 6,165,900 5,745,500
(1) Cancer Research and Screening: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is
$6,165,900 in fiscal year 2026-2027 and $5,745,500 in fiscal year 2027-2028 for cancer research and screening to be
shared equally between the University of Kentucky and the University of Louisville. Of these amounts, $625,000 in
each fiscal year is from the lapse and reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund appropriations.
b. University of Louisville 2,750,000 -0-
(1) Cancer Research: Included in the above General Fund (Tobacco) appropriation is $2,750,000 in fiscal
year 2026-2027 to fund cancer research at the Brown Cancer Center. This appropriation is from the lapse and
reallocation of Early Childhood Development Fund appropriations.
TOTAL - HEALTH CARE 13,570,200 10,046,800
TOTAL - PHASE I TOBACCO SETTLEMENT
FUNDING PROGRAM 87,175,000 79,525,000
PART XI
STATE/EXECUTIVE BRANCH BUDGET SUMMARY
OPERATING BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 86,675,000 79,524,900
General Fund -0- 15,416,488,000 15,693,139,800
Restricted Funds 167,270,800 16,693,897,000 17,383,278,100
Federal Funds 405,900,000 24,307,745,100 24,118,660,800
Road Fund -0- 55,582,600 57,940,100
SUBTOTAL 573,170,800 56,560,387,700 57,332,543,700
CAPITAL PROJECTS BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
Restricted Funds -0- 20,064,946,000 89,901,000
Federal Funds -0- 770,334,000 50,915,000
Bond Funds -0- 1,033,161,000 387,474,000
Agency Bonds -0- 1,250,800,000 -0-
Investment Income -0- 183,324,000 105,633,000

CHAPTER 168 125
Other Funds 350,000,000 9,427,800,000 200,000,000
SUBTOTAL 350,000,000 32,730,365,000 833,923,000
TOTAL - STATE/EXECUTIVE BUDGET
2025-26 2026-27 2027-28
General Fund (Tobacco) -0- 86,675,000 79,524,900
General Fund -0- 15,416,488,000 15,693,139,800
Restricted Funds 167,270,800 36,758,843,000 17,473,179,100
Federal Funds 405,900,000 25,078,079,100 24,169,575,800
Road Fund -0- 55,582,600 57,940,100
Bond Funds -0- 1,033,161,000 387,474,000
Agency Bonds -0- 1,250,800,000 -0-
Investment Income -0- 183,324,000 105,633,000
Other Funds 350,000,000 9,427,800,000 200,000,000
TOTAL FUNDS 923,170,800 89,290,752,700 58,166,466,700
Vetoed in Part and Overridden in Part April 14, 2026.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version